THE BRIDGE ON THE DRINA 



IVO ANDRIC 




THE BRIDGE 
ON 

THE DRINA 


Translated from the Serbo-Croat 


by 

LOVETT F, EDWARDS 


Ruskin House 

GEORGE ALLEN & UNWIN LTD 


MUSEUM STREET LONDON 



First published in English in 1959 
Second Impression 1962 

This book is copyright under the Berne Convention. 
Apart from any fair dealing for the purposes of 
private study, research, criticism or review, as 
permitted under the Copyright Act, i9s6, no 
portion may be reproduced by any process without 
written permission. Enquiry should be made to 
the publisher. 

This translation © George Allen and Unwin Ltd., 1959 


Translated from 
NA DRINI CUPRIJA 

(The Prosveta Publishing Company Belgrade 1945) 


PRINTED IN GREAT BRITAIN 

in 10 pt Tilgrim type 
BY BRADFORD AND DICKENS 
LONDON W.C 1 



TRANSLATOR’S FOREWORD 


T he customs and the minds of men alter less rapidly than the 
vagaries of political and ideological change. The visitor to 
Yugoslavia can still see the bridge on the Drina, whose fate is 
described in this book, though once again modernized and re- 
paired. But he will find ViSegrad itself less changed than he may ex- 
pect and will not find it hard to identify the types of Andris’s novel 
even under a national state and a communist administration. The 
Bosnian peasant faces the hazards of an egalitarian administration 
with the same incomprehension and imperturbability as he faced 
the novelties of the Austro-Hungarian occupation; he experienced 
the greater brutalities of the last war with the same courage and 
resignation as he faced those of World War I, and his relations 
with state controlled purchasing agencies differ mainly in degree 
from those of his fathers with the banks and merchants of the ViSe- 
grad market. The last war, in Bosnia especially, showed examples 
of horror and torment at least equal to those of Turkish times, while 
the idealism and fanaticism of youth, so well described in the con- 
versations on the kapia, have only changed slightly in direction, 
while retaining their essential mixture of practical politics and 
imaginative romanticism. 

Dr Ivo Andrid is himself a Serb and a Bosnian. These provincial 
and religious subtleties are still as important in present-day Yugo- 
slavia as they were in earlier times But in the case of Dr Andrid they 
have had an effect different from that on other Yugoslav writers and 
politicians. 

Instead of intensifying the local and religious conflicts that still 
bedevil Yugoslavia— as was only too tragically shown during the 
last war— they have resulted in a deep understanding of peoples and 
creeds other than his own. Bom near Travnik in Northern Bosnia in 
1892, Dr Andrid passed much of his childhood in ViSegrad. Not only 
is there truth, insight and sympathy in his varied range of ViSegrad 
portraits, there is certainly also a good deal of observed and critical 
biography. 

Dr Aniid’s books are almost all about Bosnia and Bosnians. But 
the peculiar position of Bosnia, a storm centre for centuries on the 
border of the Eastern and Western worlds, saves them from the curse 
of detailed provincialism and gives them an interest that extends 
far beyond its narrow borders. It would not be too much to say that 
the assassination of the Austrian Archduke Franz Ferdinand by 



Gavrilo Princip at Sarajevo in 1914 was the turning point of modern 
history. 

Dr Andris’s own career widened the field of his observations and 
his sympathies in a manner possible only in a vigorously growing 
society and a century of conflict He studied first at Sarajevo and 
later at the universities of Zagreb, Vienna, Cracow and Graz, where 
he took his degree. Of a poor artisan family, he made his way largely 
through his own ability. As other gifted students of his race and time, 
and as his own students m The Bridge on the Drina, he belonged to 
the National Revolutionary Youth Organization, and experienced 
the customary cycle of persecution and arrest. After the First World 
War he entered the Yugoslav diplomatic service and served in Rome, 
Bucharest, Trieste and Graz. At the outbreak of World War II he was 
Yugoslav Minister in Berlin, when Yugoslavia was desperately play- 
ing for time, hoping to postpone the invasion of Hitler and at the 
same time consolidate her forces to resist it when it inevitably came. 
I recall waiting tensely in Belgrade for Dr Andrid to return from Ber- 
lin, the one sure sign that an invasion was immediate. He came back 
only a few hours before the first bombs fell on Belgrade. My only 
contact with him was when the Yugoslav Government was already 
in flight. 

During the war. Dr Andrid lived in retirement in Belgrade, and 
during the German occupation took no part in public affairs Therein 
we are the gainers, for at that time he wrote his most important 
works, including what may be called his Bosnian trilogy: Miss, The 
Travnik Chronicle and, the greatest of them all. The Bridge on the 
Drina. 

The experiences of the war and the German occupation gave Dr 
Andrid sympathy with the Yugoslav Liberation Movement. Since 
the war, he has been associated with it and has been a member of the 
National Assembly for many years. 

The Bridge on the Drina is not a novel in the usual sense of the 
word. Its scope is too vast, its characters too numerous, its period of 
action too long: it covers three and a half centuries. Dr Andrid him- 
self calls it a chronicle; let us accept his word. 

It has been awarded the highest literary award of post-war Yugo- 
slavia and has been translated into several languages. 

It is always an invidious task for a translator to comment on an 
author’s style. It should be -and I hope it is— evident in the trans- 
lation. Andrid’s style has the sweep and surge of the sea, slow and 
yet profound, with occasional flashes of wit and irony. One subtlety 
cannot, however, be conveyed in translation; his use of var)dng dia- 
lects and localisms. I have conveyed them in the best manner that I 



could, since a literal use of dialect would, even were it possible, be 
pedantic, dull and cumbersome. For the information of purists, the 
occasional Turkish words that are used are used in their Bosnian 
sense and spelhng which often differs considerably from modern 
literary Turkish 

LOVETT F. EDWARDS 




NOTE 

on the pronunciation of Serbo-Croat names 

Andrid's novel is published both in the Cyrillic and Latin (Croat) 
alphabets I have used the Croatian spelling throughout. The 
language is strictly phonetic. One sound is almost always desig- 
nated by one letter or (in Croat) combination of letters. 

Generally speaking, the foreigner cannot go far wrong if he uses 
‘continental* vowels and English consonants, with the following 
exceptions: 

c is always ts, as in cats, 
c is ch as in church. 

6 is similar but softer, as t in the Cockney pronunciation of tube. 
Many family names end in d. For practical purposes, the foreigner 
may regard c and 6 as the same, 
d] is the English j in judge— the English j in fact, 
dz is practically the same, but harder. It is usually found in words 
of Turkish origin, 
j is always soft, the English y. 

r is sometimes a vowel, strongly rolled. Hence such strange look- 
ing words as vrh (summit), 

2 IS sh as in shake, 
z is zh as z in azure. 

Other variations do not occur in this book In a few cases I have 
left the conventionally accepted English spelling, instead of insisting 
pedantically on Serbo-Croat versions: e.g Sanjak (Serbo-Croat* 
Sandzak), Belgrade (Serbo-Croat* Beograd), etc In the case of purely 
Turkish names, I have sometimes transliterated them phonetically, 
as the Croat version is equally arbitrary. 

The use of the original names retains dignity and flavour 
Attempts to adapt them to English phonetics (in itself an ungrateful 
task) results in such monstrosities as Ts(e)rnche— for Crnde. 


LOVETT F EDWARDS 




I 




F or the greater part of its course the nver Dnna flows through 
narrow gorges between steep mountains or through deep 
ravines with precipitous banks. In a few places only the river 
banks spread out to form valleys with level or rolling stretches 
of fertile land suitable for cultivation and settlement on both sides. 
Such a place exists here at ViSegrad, where the Dnna breaks out in 
a sudden curve from the deep and narrow ravine formed by the 
Butkovo rocks and the Uzavnik mountains. The curve which the 
Dnna makes here is particularly sharp and the mountains on both 
sides are so steep and so close together that they look like a solid 
mass out of which the river flows directly as from a dark wall. Then 
the mountains suddenly widen into an irregular amphitheatre whose 
widest extent is not more than about ten miles as the crow flies. 

Here, where the Dnna flows with the whole force of its green and 
foaming waters from the apparently closed mass of the dark steep 
mountains, stands a great clean-cut stone bndge with eleven wide 
sweeping arches. From this bridge spreads fanlike the whole rolling 
valley with the little oriental town of Vi5egrad and all its surround- 
ings, with hamlets nestling in the folds of the hills, covered with 
meadows, pastures and plum-orchards, and criss-crossed with walls 
and fences and dotted with shaws and occasional clumps of ever- 
greens Looked at from a distance through the broad arches of the 
white bridge it seems as if one can see not only the green Drina, but 
all that fertile and cultivated countryside and the southern sky above. 

On the right bank of the river, starting from the bridge itself, lay 
the centre of the town, with the market-place, partly on the level 
and partly on the hillside. On the other side of the bndge, along the 
left bank, stretched the Maluhino Polje, with a few scattered houses 
along the road which led to Sarajevo. Thus the bridge, uniting the 
two parts of the Sarajevo road, linked the town with its surrounding 
villages. 

Actually, to say ‘linked’ was just as true as to say that the sun 
rises in the morning so that men may see around them and finish 


13 



their daily tasks, and sets in the evening that they may be able to 
sleep and rest from the labours of the day For this great stone bridge, 
a rare stiucture of unique beauty, such as many richer and busier 
towns do not possess (There are only two others such as this in the 
whole Empire,’ they used to say in olden times) was the one real and 
permanent crossing in the whole middle and upper course of the 
Dnna and an indispensable link on the road between Bosnia and 
Serbia and further, beyond Serbia, with other parts of the Turkish 
Empire, all the way to Stambul. The town and its outskirts were 
only the settlements which always and inevitably grow up around 
an important centre of communications and on either side of great 
and important bridges 

Here also in time the houses crowded together and the settlements 
multiplied at both ends of the bridge The town owed its existence 
to the bridge and grew out of it as if from an imperishable root. 

In order to see a picture of the town and understand it and its 
relation to the bridge clearly, it must be said that there was another 
bridge in the town and another river. This was the river Rzav, with 
a wooden bridge across it. At the very end of the town the Rzav 
flows into the Dnna, so that the centre and at the same time the 
main part of the town lay on a sandy tongue of land between two 
rivers, the great and the small, which met there and its scattered 
outskirts stretched out from both sides of the bridges, along the 
left bank of the Dnna and the right bank of the Rzav. It was a town 
on the water But even though another river existed and another 
bndge, the words ‘on the bridge’ never meant on the Rzav bridge, 
a simple wooden structuie without beauty and without history, 
that had no reason for its existence save to serve the townspeople 
and their animals as a crossing, but only and uniquely the stone 
bridge over the Dnna. 

The bridge was about two hundred and fifty paces long and about 
ten paces wide save in the middle where it widened out into two 
completely equal terraces placed symmetncally on either side of the 
roadway and making it twice its normal width. This was the part 
of the bridge known as the kapia. Two buttresses had been built 
on each side of the central pier which had been splayed out towards 
the top, so that to right and left of the roadway there were two 
terraces daringly and harmoniously projecting outwards from the 
straight hne of the bridge over the noisy green waters far below. 
The two terraces were about five paces long and the same in width 
and were bordered, as was the whole length of the bridge, by a stone 
parapet Otherwise, they were open and uncovered. That on the right 
as one came from the town was called the sofa. It was raised by 

H 



two steps and bordered by benches for which the parapet served as 
a back, steps, benches and parapet were all made of the same shining 
stone That on the left, opposite the sola, was similar but without 
benches In the middle of the parapet, the stone rose higher than a 
man and in it, near the top, was inserted a plaque of white marble 
with a rich Turkish inscription, a tank, with a carved chronogram 
which told m thirteen verses the name of the man who built the 
bridge and the year m which it was built. Near the foot of this stone 
was a fountain, a thin stream of water flowing from the mouth of 
a stone snake. On this part of the terrace a coffee-maker had installed 
himself with his copper vessels and Turkish cups and ever-lighted 
charcoal brazier, and an apprentice who took the coffee over the 
way to the guests on the sola Such was the kapia. 

On the bridge and its kapia, about it or in connection with it, 
flowed and developed, as we shall see, the life of the townsmen. In 
all tales about personal, family or public events the words ‘on the 
bridge' could always be heard Indeed on the bridge over the Drina 
were the first steps of childhood and the first games of boyhood 
The Christian children, born on the left bank of the Dnna, crossed 
the bridge at once in the first days of their lives, for they were always 
taken across in their first week to be christened But all the other 
children, those who were born on the right bank and the Moslem 
children who were not christened at all, passed, as had once their 
fathers and their grandfathers, the mam part of their childhood on 
or around the bridge They fished around it or hunted doves under 
its arches From their very earliest years, their eyes grew accustomed 
to the lovely lines of this great stone structure built of shining porous 
stone, regularly and faultlessly cut. They knew all the bosses and 
concavities of the masons, as well as all the tales and legends 
associated with the existence and building of the bridge, m which 
reality and imagination, waking and dream, were wonderfully and 
inextncably mingled. They had always known these things as if 
they had come into the world with them, even as they knew their 
prayers, but could not remember from whom they had learnt them 
nor when they had first heard them. 

They knew that the bridge had been built by the Grand Vezir, 
Mehmed Pasha, who had been born in the nearby village of Soko- 
lovi<5i, just on the far side of one of those mountains which encircled 
the bridge and the town. Only a Vezir could have given all that was 
needed to build this lasting wonder of stone (a Vezir —to the children*s 
minds that was something fabulous, immense, terrible and far from 
clear). It was built by Rade the Mason, who must have lived for 
hundreds of years to have been able to build all that was lovely 


15 



and lasting in the Serbian lands, that legendary and in fact nameless 
master whom all people desire and dream of, since they do not want 
to have to remember or be indebted to too many, even m memory. 
They knew that the vile of the boatmen had hindered its building, as 
always and everywhere there is someone to hinder building, destroy- 
ing by night what had been built by day, until ‘something’ had 
whispered from the waters and counselled Rade the Mason to find 
two infant children, twins, brother and sister, named Stoja and 
Ostoja, and wall them into the central pier of the bridge. A reward 
was promised to whoever found them and brought them hither. 

At last the guards found such twins, still at the breast, in a distant 
village and the Vezir’s men took them away by force; but when they 
were taking them away, their mother would not be parted from them 
and, weeping and wailing, msensible to blows and to curses, 
stumbled after them as far as ViSegrad itself, where she succeeded in 
forcing her way to Rade the Mason. 

The children were walled into the pier, for it could not be other- 
wise, but Rade, they say, had pity on them and left openings in the 
pier through which the unhappy mother could feed her sacrificed 
children. Those are the finely carved blind windows, narrow as loop- 
holes, in which the wild doves now nest. In memory of that, the 
mother’s milk has flowed from those walls for hundreds of years 
That is the thin white stream which, at certain times of year, flows 
from that faultless masonry and leaves an indelible mark on the 
stone. (The idea of woman’s milk stirs in the childish mind a feeling 
at once too intimate and too close, yet at the same time vague and 
mysterious like Vezirs and masons, which disturbs and repulses 
them.) Men scrape those milky traces off the piers and sell them as 
medicinal powder to women who have no milk after giving birth. 

In the central pier of the bridge, below the kapia, there is a larger 
opening, a long narrow gateway without gates, like a gigantic loop- 
hole. In that pier, they say, is a great room, a gloomy hall, in w'hich 
a black Arab lives. All the children know this. In their dreams and in 
their fancies he plays a great role. If he should appear to anyone, that 
man must die. Not a single child has seen him yet, for children do not 
die. But Hamid, the asthmatic porter, with bloodshot eyes, con- 
tinually drunk or suffering from a hangover, saw him one night and 
that very same night he died, over there by the wall. It is true that he 
was blind drunk at the time and passed the night on the bridge under 
the open sky in a temperature of — I5®C. The children used to gaze 
from the bank into that dark opening as into a gulf which is both 
terrible and fascinating. They would agree to look at it without blink- 
ing and whoever first saw anything should cry out Open-mouthed 

i6 



they would peer into that deep dark hole, quivering with curiosity 
and fear, until it seemed to some anaemic child that the opening be- 
gan to sway and to move like a black curtain, or until one of them, 
mocking and inconsiderate (there is always at least one such), 
shouted The Arab’ and pretended to run away. That spoilt the game 
and aroused disillusion and indignation amongst those who loved 
the play of imagination, hated irony and believed that by looking 
intently they could actually see and feel something At night, in their 
sleep, many of them would toss and fight with the Arab from the 
bridge as with fate until their mother woke them and so freed them 
from this nightmare Then she would give them cold water to drink 
‘to chase away the fear* and make them say the name of God, and 
the child, overtaxed with daytime childish games, would fall asleep 
again into the deep sleep of childhood where terrors can no longer 
take shape or last for long 

Up river from the bridge, in the steep banks of grey chalk, on both 
sides of the river, can be seen rounded hollows, always in pairs at 
regular intervals, as if cut in the stone were the hoofpnnts of some 
horse of supernatural size; they led downwards from the Old Fort- 
ress, descended the scarp towards the river and then appeared again 
on the farther bank, where they were lost m the dark earth and 
undergrowth 

The children who fished for tiddlers all day in the summer along 
these stony banks knew that these were hoofpnnts of ancient days 
and long dead warriors. Great heroes lived on earth in those days, 
when the stone had not yet hardened and was soft as the earth and 
the horses, like the warriors, were of colossal growth Only for the 
Serbian children these were the prints of the hooves of Sarac, the 
horse of Kraljevid Marko, which had remained there from the time 
when Kraljevid Marko himself was in prison up there in the Old Fort- 
ress and escaped, flying down the slope and leaping the Drina, for at 
that time there was no bridge. But the Turkish children knew that it 
had not been Kraljevid Marko, nor could it have been (for whence 
could a bastard Christian dog have had such strength or such a 
horse’) any but Djerzelez Alija on his winged charger which, as 
everyone knew, despised ferries and ferrymen and leapt over rivers 
as if they were watercourses. They did not even squabble about this, 
so convinced were both sides in their own belief. And there was never 
an instance of any one of them being able to convince another, or 
that any one had changed his belief. 

In these depressions which were round and as wide and deep as 
rather large soup-bowls, water still remained long after rain, as 
though in stone vessels The children called these pits, filled with 


17 



tepid rainwater, wells and, without distinction of faith, kept the 
tiddlers there which they caught on their lines 

On the left bank, standing alone, immediately above the road, 
there was a fairly large earthen barrow, formed of some kind of hard 
earth, grey and almost like stone On it nothing grew or blossomed 
save some short grass, hard and prickly as barbed wire That tumulus 
was the end and frontier of all the childien’s games around the 
bridge That was the spot which at one time was called Radisav’s 
tomb. They used to tell that he was some sort of Serbian hei o, a man 
of power. When the Vezir, Mehmed Pasha, had first thought of 
building the bridge on the Drina and sent his men here, everyone sub- 
mitted and was summoned to forced labour. Only this man, Radisav, 
stirred up the people to revolt and told the Vezir not to continue with 
this work for he would meet with great difficulties in building a bridge 
across the Dnna. And the Vezir had many troubles before he suc- 
ceeded m overcoming Radisav for he was a man greater than other 
men; there was no rifle or sword that could harm him, nor was there 
rope or chain that could bind him. He broke all of them like thread, 
so great was the power of the talisman that he had with him And 
who knows what might have happened and whether the Vezir would 
ever have been able to build the bridge, had he not found some of 
his men who were wise and skilful, who bribed and questioned 
Radisav’s servant. Then they took Radisav by surprise and di owned 
him while he was asleep, binding him with silken ropes for against 
silk his talisman could not help him The Serbian women believe that 
there is one night of the year when a strong white light can be seen 
falling on that tumulus direct from heaven, and that takes place 
sometime m autumn between the greater and lesser feasts of the 
Virgin. But the children who, torn between belief and unbelief, re- 
mained on vigil by the windows overlooking Radisav’s tomb have 
never managed to see this heavenly fire, for they were all overcome 
by sleep before midnight came. But there had been travellers, who 
knew nothing of this, who had seen a white light falling on the 
tumulus above the bridge as they returned to the town by night. 

The Turks in the town, on the other hand, have long told that on 
that spot a certain dervish, by name Sheik Turhanija, died as a 
martyr to the faith. He was a great hero and defended on this spot 
the crossing of the Drina against an infidel army. And that on this 
spot there is neither memorial nor tomb, for such was the wish of the 
dervish himself, for he wanted to be buried vnthout mark or sign, so 
that no one should know who was there. For, if ever again some in- 
fidel army should invade by this route, then he would arise from 
under his tumulus and hold them in check, as he had once done, so 



that they should be able to advance no farther than the bridge at 
Vilegrad. And therefore heaven now and again shed its light upon 
his tomb 

Thus the life of the children of the town was played out under 
and about the bridge in innocent games and childish fancies With 
the first years of maturity, when life’s cares and struggles and duties 
had already begun, this life was transferred to the bridge itself, right 
to the kapia, where youthful imagination found other food and new 
fields. 

At and around the kapia were the first stirrings of love, the first 
passing glances, flirtations and whisperings There too were the first 
deals and bargains, quarrels and reconciliations, meetings and wait- 
ings There, on the stone parapet of the bridge, were laid out for sale 
the first cherries and melons, the early morning salep and hot rolls. 
There too gathered the beggars, the maimed and the lepers, as well 
as the young and healthy who wanted to see and be seen, and all 
those who had something remarkable to show in produce, clothes or 
weapons There too the elders of the town often sat to discuss public 
matters and common troubles, but even more often young men who 
only knew how to sing and ]oke. There, on great occasions or times 
of change, were posted proclamations and public notices (on the 
raised wall below the marble plaque with the Turkish inscription 
and above the fountain), but there too, right up to 1878, hung or 
were exposed on stakes the heads of all those who for whatever 
reason had been executed, and executions in that frontier town, 
especially in years of unrest, were frequent and in some years, as 
we shall see, almost of daily occurrence. 

Weddings or funerals could not cross the bridge without stopping 
at the kapia There the wedding guests would usually preen them- 
selves and get into their ranks before entenng the market-place If 
the times were peaceful and carefree they would hand the plum- 
brandy around, sing, dance the kolo and often delay there fai longer 
than they had intended And for funerals, those who earned the bier 
would put It down to rest for a little there on the kapia where the 
dead man had in any case passed a good part of his life. 

The kapia was the most important part of the bridge, even as the 
bridge was the most important part of the town, or as a Turkish 
traveller, to whom the people of ViSegrad had been very hospitable, 
wrote in his account of his travels: ‘their kapia is the heart of the 
bridge, which is the heart of the town, which must remain in every- 
one’s heart’ It showed that the old masons, who according to the 
old tales had struggled with vilas and every sort of wonder and had 
been compelled to wall up living children, had a feeling not only for 


19 



the permanence and beauty of their work but also for the benefit and 
convenience which the most distant generations were to derive from 
it. When one knows well everyday life here in the town and thinks 
it over carefully, then one must say to oneself that there are really 
only a very small number of people in this Bosnia of ours who have 
so much pleasure and enjoyment as does each and every townsman 
on the kapia. 

Naturally winter should not be taken into account, for then only 
whoever was forced to do so would cross the bndge, and then he 
would lengthen his pace and bend his head before the chill wind that 
blew uninterruptedly over the river. Then, it was understood, there 
was no loitering on the open terraces of the kapia. But at every other 
time of year the kapia was a real boon for great and small. Then 
every citizen could, at any time of day or night, go out to the kapia 
and sit on the sofa, or hang about it on business or in conversation. 
Suspended some fifteen metres above the green boisterous waters, 
this stone sofa floated in space over the water, with dark green hills 
on three sides, the heavens, filled with clouds or stars, above and 
the open view down river like a narrow amphitheatre bounded by 
the dark blue mountains behind. 

How many Vezirs or rich men are there in the world who could 
indulge their joy or their cares, their moods or their delights in such 
a spot? Few, very few. But how many of our townsmen have, in the 
course of centuries and the passage of generations, sat here in the 
dawn or twilight or evening hours and unconsciously measured the 
whole starry vault above' Many and many of us have sat there, head 
in hands, leaning on the well-cut smooth stone, watching the eternal 
play of light on the mountains and the clouds m the sky, and have 
unravelled the threads of our small-town destinies, eternally the 
same yet eternally tangled in some new manner. Someone affirmed 
long ago (it is true that he was a foreigner and spoke in jest) that this 
kapia had had an influence on the fate of the town and even on the 
character of its citizens. In those endless sessions, the stranger said, 
one must search for the key to the inclination of many of our towns- 
men to reflection and dreaming and one of the main re'‘3ons for that 
melancholic serenity for which the inhabicants of the town are 
renowned. 

In any case, it cannot be denied that the people of ViSegrad have 
from olden times been considered, in comparison with the people of 
other towns, as easy-going men, prone to pleasure and free with their 
money. Their town is well placed, the villages around it are rich and 
fertile, and money, it is true, passes in abundance through ViSegrad, 
but it does not stay there long. If one finds there some thrifty and 



economical citizen without any sort of vices, then he is certainly 
some newcomer; but the waters and the air of Visegrad are such that 
his children grow up with open hands and widespread fingers and 
fall victims to the general contagion of the spendthrift and carefree 
life of the town with its motto. ‘Another day another gam ' 

They tell the tale that Starina Novak, when he felt his strength 
failing and was compelled to give up his role as highwayman in the 
Romania Mountains, thus taught the young man Grujic who was to 
succeed him: 

‘When you are sitting in ambush look well at the traveller who 
comes If you see that he rides proudly and that he wears a red cor- 
selet and silver bosses and white gaiters, then he is from Foca. Strike 
at once, for he has wealth both on him and in his saddlebags. If you 
see a poorly dressed traveller, with bowed head, hunched on his 
horse as if he were going out to beg, then strike freely, for he is a 
man of Rogatica. They are all alike, misers and tight-fisted but as full 
of money as a pomegranate But if you see some mad fellow, with 
legs crossed over the saddlebow, beating on a drum and singing at 
the top of his voice, don't strike and do not soil your hands for 
nothing Let the rascal go his way He is from Visegrad and he has 
nothing, for money does not stick to such men ' 

All this goes to confirm the opinion of that foreigner But none the 
less it would be hard to say with certainty that this opinion is cor- 
rect As in so many other things, here too it is not easy to determine 
what IS cause and w^hat effect. Has the kapia made them what they 
are, or on the contrary was it imagined in their souls and under- 
standings and built for them according to their needs and customs^ 
It is a vain and superfluous question There are no buildings that have 
been built by chance, remote from the human society where they 
have grown and its needs, hopes and understandings, even as there 
are no arbitrary lines and motiveless forms in the work of the 
masons The life and existence of every great, beautiful and useful 
building, as well as its relation to the place where it has been built, 
often bears within itself complex and mysterious drama and history. 
However, one thing is clear; that between the life of the townsmen 
and that bridge, there existed a centuries-old bond. Their fates were 
so intertwined that they could not be imagined separately and could 
not be told separately. Therefore the story of the foundation and 
destiny of the bridge is at the same time the story of the life of the 
town and of its people, from generation to generation, even as 
through all the tales about the town stretches the line of the stone 
bridge with its eleven arches and the kapia in the middle, like a 
crown 


21 



II 




N ow we must go back to the time when there was not even 
a thought of a bridge at that spot, let alone such a bridge 
as this. 

Perhaps even in those far-off times, some traveller pass- 
ing this way, tired and drenched, wished that by some miracle this 
wide and turbulent river were bridged, so that he could reach his 
goal more easily and quickly. For there is no doubt that men had 
always, ever since they first travelled here and overcame the ob- 
stacles along the way, thought how to make a crossing at this spot, 
even as all travellers at all times have dreamed of a good road, safe 
travelling companions and a warm inn Only not every wish bears 
fruit, nor has everyone the will and the power to turn his dreams into 
reality. 

The first idea of the bridge, which was destined to be realized, 
flashed, at first naturally confused and foggy, across the imagination 
of a ten year old boy from the nearby village of Sokolovidi, one 
morning in 1516 when he was being taken along the road from his 
village to far-off, shining and terrible Stambul. 

Then this same green and awe-inspiring Drina, this mountain river 
‘which often grew angry’, clamoured there between barren and 
naked, stony and sandy banks. The town even then existed, but in 
another form and of different dimensions. On the right bank of the 
river, on the crest of a precipitous hill, where now there are ruins, 
rose the well preserved Old Fortress, with widespread fortifications 
dating from the time of the flowering of the Bosnian kingdom, with 
casements and ramparts, the work of one of the powerful Pavlovid 
nobles. On the slopes below this fortress and under its protection 
stood the Christian settlements, Mejdan and Bikovac, and the 
recently converted Turkish hamlet of Du§( 5 e. Down on the level 
ground between the Drina and the Rzav, where the real town later 
spread, were only the town meadows, with a road running through 
them, beside which was an old-fashioned inn and a few huts and 
water-mills. 


22 



Where the Drina intersected the road was the famous ViSegrad 
ferry That was a black old-fashioned ferryboat and on it a surly, 
slow old ferryman called Jamak, whom it was harder to summon 
when awake than any other man from the deepest sleep. He was a 
man of giant stature and extraordinary strength, but he had suffered 
in the many wars in which he had won renown. He had only one 
eye, one ear and one leg (the other was wooden) Without greeting 
and without a smile, he would moodily ferry across goods and 
passengers in his own good time, but honestly and safely, so that 
tales were told of his reliability and his honesty as often as of his 
slowness and obstinacy He would not talk with the passengers 
whom he took across nor would he touch them. Men threw the 
copper coins that they paid for the crossing into the bottom of the 
black boat where they lay all day m the sand and water, and only 
in the evening would the ferryman collect them carelessly in the 
wooden scoop which he used to bale out the boat and take them 
to his hut on the river bank 

The ferry only worked when the current and height of the river 
were normal or a little higher than normal, but as soon as the river 
ran cloudy or rose above certain limits, Jamak hauled out his clumsy 
bark, moored it firmly in a backwater and the Drina remained as 
impassable as the greatest of oceans Jamak then became deaf even 
in his one sound ear or simply went up to the Fortress to work in his 
field Then, all day long, there could be seen travellers coming from 
Bosnia who stood on the farther bank in desperation, frozen and 
drenched, vainly watching the ferry and the ferryman and from 
time to time yelling long drawn summonses: 

c) o-o-o-o. . Jama-a-a-k . . 

No one would reply and no one would appear until the waters 
fell, and that moment was decided by Jamak himself, dark and unre- 
lenting, without discussion or explanation. 

The town, which was then little more than a hamlet, stood on the 
right bank of the Drina on the slopes of the steep hill below the ruins 
of the one-time fortress, for then it did not have the size and shape 
it was to have later when the bridge was built and communications 
and trade developed. 

On that November day a long convoy of laden horses arrived on 
the left back of the river and halted there to spend the night The 
aga of the janissaries, with armed escort, was returning to Stambul 
after collecting from the villages of eastern Bosnia the appointed 
number of Christian children for the blood tribute. 

It was already the sixth year since the last collection of this 
tribute of blood, and so this time the choice had been easy and rich; 


23 



the necessary number of healthy, bright and good-looking lads 
between ten and fifteen years old had been found without difficulty, 
even though many parents had hidden their children in the forests, 
taught them how to appear half-witted, clothed them in rags and 
let them get filthy, to avoid the aga’s choice Some went so far as to 
maim their own children, cutting off one of their fingers with an axe. 

The chosen children were laden on to little Bosnian horses in a 
long convoy On each horse were two plaited panniers, like those for 
fruit, one on each side, and in every pannier was put a child, each 
with a small bundle and a round cake, the last thing they were to 
take from their parents’ homes From these panniers, which 
balanced and creaked in unison, peered out the fresh and frightened 
faces of the kidnapped children. Some of them gazed calmly across 
the horses’ cruppers, looking as long as they could at their native 
land, others ate and wept at the same time, while others slept with 
heads resting on the^pack-saddles. 

A little way behind the last horses in that strange convoy 
straggled, dishevelled and exhausted, many parents and relatives of 
those children who were being carried away for ever to a foreign 
world, where they would be circumcized, become Turkish and, 
forgetting their faith, their country and their origin, would pass 
their lives in the ranks of the janissaries or in some other, higher, 
service of the Empire They were for the most part women, mothers, 
grandmothers and sisters of the stolen children. 

When they came too close, the aga’s horsemen would drive them 
away with whips, urging their horses at them with loud cries to 
Allah Then they would fly in all directions and hide in the forests 
along the roadsides, only to gather again a little later behind the 
convoy and strive with tear-filled eyes to see once again over the 
panniers the heads of the children who were being taken from 
them. The mothers were especially persistent and hard to restrain. 
Some would rush forward not locking where they were going, with 
bare breasts, and dishevelled hair, forgetting ever^hing about them, 
wailing and lamenting as at a burial, while others almost out of 
their minds moaned as if their wombs were being tom by birth- 
pangs, and blinded with tears ran right on to the horsemen’s whips 
and replied to every blow with the fruitless question: ‘Where are 
you taking him? Why are you taking him from me?’ Some tried to 
speak clearly to their children and to give them some last part of 
themselves, as much as might be said in a couple of words, some 
recommendation or advice for the way 

‘Rade, my son, don’t forget your mother. . . .’ 

‘Ilija, Ilija, Ilija!' screamed another woman, searching desperately 


24 



with her glances for the dear well-known head and repeating this 
incessantly as if she wished to carve into the child’s memory that 
name which would in a day or two be taken from him forever. 

But the way was long, the earth hard, the body weak and the 
Osmanlis powerful and pitiless Little by little the women dropped 
back exhausted by the march and the blows, and one after the other 
abandoned their vain effort. Here, at the ViJegrad ferry, even the 
most enduring had to halt for they were not allowed on the ferry 
and were unable to cross the water Now they could sit in peace 
on the bank and weep, for no one persecuted them any longer. 
There they waited as if turned to stone and sat, insensible to 
hunger, thirst and cold, until on the farther bank of the river they 
could see once more the long drawn out convoy of horses and 
riders as it moved onward towards Dubrina, and tried once more to 
catch a last glimpse of the children who were disappearing from 
their sight. 

On that November day in one of those countless panniers a 
dark-skinned boy of about ten years old from the mountain village 
of Sokolovidi sat silent and looked about him with dry eyes In a 
chilled and reddened hand he held a small curved knife with which 
he absent-mindedly whittled at the edges of his pannier, but at the 
same time looked about him He was to remember that stony bank 
overgrown with sparse, bare and dull grey willows, the surly ferry- 
man and the dry water-mill full of draughts and spiders’ webs 
where they had to spend the night before it was possible to transport 
all of them across the troubled waters of the Drina over which the 
ravens were croaking Somewhere within himself he felt a sharp 
stabbing pain which from time to time seemed suddenly to cut his 
chest in two and hurt terribly, which was always associated with 
the memory of that place where the road broke off, where desola- 
tion and despair were extinguished and remained on the stony 
banks of the river, across which the passage was so difficult, so 
expensive and so unsafe. It was here, at this particularly painful 
spot in that hilly and poverty-stricken district, in which misfortune 
was open and evident, that man was halted by powers stronger 
than he and, ashamed of his powerlessness, was forced to recognize 
more clearly his own misery and that of others, his own backward- 
ness and that of others. 

All this was summed up in that physical discomfort that the boy 
felt on that November day and which never completely left him, 
though he changed his way of life, his faith, his name and his 
country. 

What this boy in the pannier was later to become has been told 



in all histories in all languages and is better known in the world 
outside than it is amongst us In time he became a young and 
brave officer at the Sultan’s court, then Great Admiral of the Fleet, 
then the Sultan’s son-in-law, a general and statesman of world 
renown, Mehmed Pasha Sokolli, who waged wars that were for the 
most part victorious on three continents and extended the frontiers 
of the Ottoman Empire, making it safe abroad and by good adminis- 
tration consolidated it from wiihin For these sixty odd years he 
served three Sultans, experienced both good and evil as only rare 
and chosen persons may experience them, and raised himself to 
heights of power and authority unknown to us, which few men 
reach and few men keep. This new man that he had become in a 
foreign world where we could not follow even in our thoughts, 
must have forgotten all that he had left behind in the country 
whence they had once brought him He surely forgot too the cross- 
ing of the Dnna at Visegrad, the bare banks on which travellers 
shivered with cold and uncertainty, the slow and worm-eaten ferry, 
the strange ferryman, and the hungry ravens above the troubled 
waters. But that feeling of discomfort which had remained in him 
had never completely disappeared On the other hand, with years 
and with age it appeared more and more often; always the same 
black pain which cut into his breast with that special well-known 
childhood pang which was clearly distinguishable from all the ills 
and pains that life later brought to him With closed eyes, the 
Vezir would wait until that black knife-like pang passed and the pain 
diminished In one of those moments he thought that he might be 
able to free himself from this discomfort if he could do away with 
that ferry on the distant Drina, around which so much misery and 
inconvenience gathered and increased incessantly, and bridge the 
steep banks and the evil water between them, join the two ends of 
the road which was broken by the Drina and thus link safely and for 
ever Bosnia and the East, the place of his origin and the places of his 
life. Thus it was he who first, in a single moment behind closed 
eyelids, saw the firm graceful silhouette of the great stone bridge 
which was to be built there. 

That very same year, by the Vezir’s order and at the Vezir’s 
expense, the building of the great bridge on the Drina began. It 
lasted five years. That must have been an exceptionally lively and 
important time for the town and the whole district, full of change 
and of events great and small. But for a wonder, in the town which 
remembered for centuries and discussed every sort of event, includ- 
ing all those directly connected with the bridge, not many details of 
the commencement of the operation were preserved. 


26 



The common people remember and tell of what they are able to 
grasp and what they are able to transform into legend. Anything 
else passes them by without deeper trace, with the dumb indif- 
ference of nameless natural phenomena, which do not touch the 
imagination or remain in the memory. This hard and long building 
process was for them a foreign task undertaken at another’s ex- 
pense. Only when, as the fruit of this effort, the great bridge arose, 
men began to remember details and to embroider the creation of a 
real, skilfully built and lasting bridge with fabulous tales which they 
well knew how to weave and to remember. 


27 



in 




I n the spring of that year when the Vezir had made his decision to 
build, his men arrived m the town to prepare everything neces- 
sary for the construction work on the bridge There were many 
of them, with horses, carts, various tools and tents All this ex- 
cited fear and apprehension in the little town and the surrounding 
villages, especially among the Christians. 

At the head of this group was Abidaga, who was responsible to the 
Vezir for building the bridge; with him was the mason, Tosun 
Effendi. (There had already been tales about this Abidaga, saying 
that he was a man who stopped at nothing, harsh and pitiless 
beyond measure ) As soon as they had settled in their tents below 
Mejdan, Abidaga summoned the local leaders and all the principal 
Turks for a discussion. But there was not much of a discussion, for 
only one man spoke and he was Abidaga. Those who had been sum- 
moned saw a powerfully built man, with green eyes and an un- 
healthy reddish face, dressed in nch Stambul clothes, with a reddish 
beard and wonderfully upturned moustaches in the Magyar fashion. 
The speech which this violent man delivered to the notables 
astonished them even more than his appearance- 'It is more than 
likely that you have heard tales about me even before I came here 
and I know without asking that those tales could not have been 
pleasant or favourable. Probably you have heard that I demand 
work and obedience from everyone, and that I will beat and kill 
anyone who does not work as he should and does not obey without 
argument; that I do not know the meaning of “I cannot” or ‘‘There 
isn’t any”, that wherever I am heads will roll at the slightest word, 
and that in short I am a bloodthirsty and hard man. I want to tell 
you that those tales are neither imaginary nor exaggerated. Under 
my linden tree there is no shade. I have won this reputation over 
long years of service in which I have devotedly carried out the 
orders of the Grand Vezir. I trust in God that I shall carry out this 
work for which I was sent and when at the completion of the work 
I go hence, I hope that even harsher and darker tales will go before 

28 



me than those which have already reached you/ 

After this unusual introduction to which all listened in silence and 
with downcast eyes, Abidaga explained that it was a matter of a 
building of great importance, such as did not exist even in richer 
lands, that the work would last five, perhaps six, years, but that the 
Vezir’s will would be carried out to the fineness of a hair and 
punctual to a minute. Then he laid down his first requirements and 
what he therefore expected from the local Turks and demanded 
from the rayah— the Christian serfs. 

Beside him sat Tosun Effendi, a small, pale, yellowish renegade, 
born in the Greek islands, a mason who had built many of Mehmed 
Pasha’s bequests in StambuL He remained quiet and indifferent, as if 
he were not hearing or did not understand Abidaga’s speech. He 
gazed at his hands and only looked up from time to time. Then they 
could see his big black eyes, beautiful and short-sighted eyes with a 
velvety sheen, the eyes of a man who only looks to his work and 
does not see, does not feel and does not understand anything else in 
life or in the world. 

The notables filed out of the small stuffy tent, troubled and down- 
cast. They felt as if they were sweating under their new ceremonial 
clothes and each one of them felt fear and anxiety taking root in 
him. 

A great and incomprehensible disaster had fallen upon the town 
and the whole of the district, a catastrophe whose end could not be 
foreseen. First of all began the felling of the forests and the transport 
of the timber. So great a mass of scaffolding arose on both banks of 
the Drina that for long the people thought that the bridge would be 
built of wood. Then the earthworks began, the excavations, the 
revetting of the chalky banks. These were mostly carried out by 
forced labour. So everything went on until the late autumn, when 
work was temporarily stopped and the first part of the construction 
completed. 

All this was carried out under Abidaga’s supervision and that of 
his long green staff which has passed into legend. Whomever he 
pointed at with this staff, having noticed that he was malingering or 
not working as he should, the guards seized; they beat him on the 
spot and then poured water over his bleeding and unconscious 
body and sent him back to work again. When in late autumn 
Abidaga left the town, he again sent for the notables and told them 
that he was going away to another place for the winter, but that his 
eye would still be on them. All would be responsible for everything. 
If it were found that any part of the work had been damaged, 
if a single stick were missing from the scaffolding, he would fine the 


29 



whole town When they ventured to say that damage might be 
caused by floods, he replied coldly and without hesitation that this 
was their district and the river too was theirs as well as whatever 
damage it might cause 

All the winter the townsmen guarded the material and watched 
the construction works like the eyes in their head. And when with 
the spring Abidaga once again appeared, with Tosun Effendi, there 
came with them Dalmatian stone-masons, whom the people called 
‘Latin masters’ At first there were about thirty of them, led by a 
certain Mastro Antonio, a Christian from Ulcinj He was a tall, 
handsome man of keen eye, bold glance and hooked nose, with fair 
hair falling to his shoulders and dressed like a noble in the western 
manner His assistant was a negro, a real negro, a young and merry 
man whom the whole town and all the workmen soon nicknamed 
‘the Arab’ 

If in the previous year, judging from the mass of scaffolding, it 
seemed as if Abidaga had intended to build the bridge of wood, it 
now seemed to everyone that he wanted to build a new Stambul 
here on the Drina. Then began the hauling of stone from the 
quarries which had already been opened up in the hills near Banja, 
an hour’s walk from the town. 

Next year a most unusual spring broke near the ViSegrad ferry. 
Besides all that which sprang up and flowered every year at that 
time, there arose out of the earth a whole settlement of huts: new 
roads made their appearance and new approaches to the water’s 
edge Countless oxcarts and packhorses swarmed on all sides. The 
men from Mejdan and OkoliSte saw how every day, like a sort of 
harvest, there grew there by the river a restless swarm of men, 
beasts and building material of every kind. 

On the steep banks worked the master stone-masons. The whole 
area took on a sort of yellowish colour from the stone-dust. And a 
little farther along, on the sandy plain, local workers were slaking 
lime and moving, ragged and pale, through the white smoke which 
rose high from the kilns. The roads were tom to pieces by the 
overloaded carts. The ferry worked all day, taking from one bank 
to the other building material, overseers and workmen. Wading in 
the spring waters up to their waists, special workmen drove in piles 
and stakes and put in position gabions filled with clay, intended to 
break the current. 

All this was watched by those who up till then had lived peace- 
fully in their scattered houses on the slopes near the Drina ferry. 
And it would have been well for them had they been able only to 
watch, but the work soon became so extensive and its impetus so 


30 



great that it drew into the whirlpool everything alive or dead, not 
only in the town but also from great distances away. With the 
second year the number of workers had grown to such an extent 
that they equalled all the male inhabitants of the town. All carts, 
all horses and oxen worked only for the bridge. Everything that 
could creep or roll was taken and pressed into service, sometimes 
paid but sometimes by force. There was more money than before, 
but high prices and shortages increased more rapidly than the money 
flowed in, so that when it reached men’s hands it was already half 
eaten away. Even worse than the rise in prices and the shortages 
was the unrest, disorder and insecurity which now enveloped the 
town as a consequence of the incursion of so many workmen from 
the outer world. Despite all Abidaga’s severity, there were frequent 
clashes among the workers, and many thefts from the gardens and 
courtyards. The Moslem women had to keep their faces veiled even 
when they went into their own yards, for the gaze of the countless 
workers, local and foreign, might come from anywhere and the 
Turks of the town kept the practices of Islam very strictly, the 
more so since they were all recently converted and there was 
scarcely one of them who did not remember either a father or a 
grandfather who was a Christian or a recently converted Turk. 
Because of this the older persons who followed the law of Islam 
were openly indignant and turned their backs on this chaotic mass 
of workers, draft animals, wood, earth and stone which grew ever 
larger and more complicated on both sides of the ferry and which, 
in the underpinning operations, broke into their streets, their court- 
yards and their gardens. 

At first they had all been proud of the great bequest which the 
Vezir was to erect in their district. Then they had not realized, as 
they now saw with their own eyes, that these glorious buildings 
involved so much disorder and unrest, effort and expense. It was a 
fine thing, they thought, to belong to the pure ruling faith; it was a 
fine thing to have as a countryman the Vezir in Stambul, and still 
finer to imagine the strong, costly bridge across the river, but what 
was happening now m no way resembled this. Their town had been 
turned into a hell, a devil’s dance of incomprehensible works, of 
smoke, dust, shouts and tumult. The years passed, the work ex- 
tended and grew greater, but there was no end or thought of end to 
be seen. It looked like anything you like, but not a bridge. 

So thought the recently converted Turks of the town and, in 
private among themselves, avowed that they were fed up to the 
teeth with lordship and pride and future glory and had had more 
than enough of the bridge and the Vezir. They only prayed Allah to 


31 



deliver them from this disaster and restore to them and their homes 
their former peace and the quietness of their humble lives beside the 
old-fashioned ferry on the nver. 

All this affected the Turks, but even more it affected the Christian 
rayah of the whole ViSegrad district, with this difference, that no 
one asked their opinion about anything, nor were they even able to 
express their indignation. It was now the third year since the people 
had been on forced labour for the new bridge, they themselves and 
all their horses and oxen. And that too not only for the local rayah 
but also all those from the nearby districts. Everywhere Abidaga’s 
guards and horsemen seized the rayah from the villages and even 
the towns and drove them away to work on the bridge. Usually 
they surprised them while sleeping and pinioned them like chickens 
Through all Bosnia, traveller told traveller not to go to the Drina, 
for whoever went there was seized, without question of who or 
what he was or where he was going, and was forced to work for at 
least a few days. The young men in the villages tried to run away 
into the forests, but the guards took hostages from their houses, 
often women, in place of those who fled. 

This was the third autumn that the people had been forced to 
labour on the bridge and in no way could it be seen that the work 
was progressing or that the end of their misfortune was in sight. 
Autumn was already in full spate; the roads were breaking up from 
the rams, the Drina was rising and troubled, and the bare stubble 
full of slow-winged ravens. But Abidaga did not halt the work. 
Under the wan November sun the peasants dragged wood and stone, 
waded with bare feet or in sandals of freshly slaughtered hide along 
the muddy roads, sweating with strain or chilled by the wind, 
folding around themselves cloaks full of new holes and old patches, 
and knotting up the ragged ends of their single shirts of coarse linen, 
blackened by ram, mud and smoke, which they dared not wash lest 
they fall to pieces in the water. Over all of them hovered Abidaga’s 
green staff, for Abidaga visited both the quarries at Banja and the 
works around the bridge several times each day. He was filled with 
rage and fury against the whole world because the days were 
growing shorter and the work had not progressed as quickly as he 
wished. In a heavy surcoat of Russian fur and high boots, he climbed, 
with red congested face, over the scaffolding of such piers as already 
arose from the waters, visited forges, barracks and workers’ huts 
and swore at everyone he came across, overseers and contractors 
alike. 

The days are short. Always shorter. You sons of bitches, you are 
eating your bread for nothing!’ 


32 



He burst out in fury, as if they were to blame because it dawned 
late and darkened early Before twilight, that relentless and implac- 
able Visegrad twilight, when the steep hills seemed to close in over 
the town and each night fell quickly, as heavy and deaf as the last, 
Abidaga’s fury rose to its height; and having no one left on whom 
to vent his wrath, he turned it on himself and could not sleep for 
thinking of so much work not being done and so many people 
malingering and wasting time. He ground his teeth. He summoned 
the overseers and worked out how, from then on, it would be pos- 
sible to make better use of the daylight and exploit the workers more 
effectively. 

The people were sleeping in their huts and stables, resting and 
restoring their forces But all did not sleep; they too knew how to 
keep vigil, to their own profit and in their own manner. In a dry 
and spacious stable a fire was burning, or more exactly had been 
burning, for now only a few embers glowing in the half-lit space 
remained The whole stable was filled with smoke and the heavy, 
sour smell of wet clothes and sandals and the exhalations of about 
thirteen human bodies They were all pressed men, peasants from 
the neighbourhood, Christian rayah. All were muddy and wet 
through, exhausted and careworn They resented this unpaid and 
pointless forced labour while up there in the villages their fields 
awaited the autumn ploughing in vain. The greater number were 
still awake They were drying their gaiters by the fire, plaiting 
sandals or only gazing at the embers. Amongst them was a certain 
Montenegrin, no one knew from where, whom the guards had 
seized on the road and had pressed for labour for several days, 
though he kept telling them and proving to them how wearisome 
and hard this work was for him and how his honour could not 
endure this work for slaves. 

Most of the wakeful peasants, especially the younger ones, gathered 
around him. From the deep pocket of his cloak the Montenegrin 
drew out a gusle, a tiny primitive fiddle, clumsy and as small as 
the palm of a man*s hand, and a short bow. One of the peasants 
went outside and mounted guard before the stable lest some Turk 
should chance to come along. All looked at the Montenegrin as if 
they saw him for the first time and at the gusle which seemed to 
disappear in his huge hands. He bent over, the gusle in his lap, and 
pressed its head under his chin, greased the string with resin and 
breathed heavily on the bow; everything was moist and slack. 
While he occupied himself with these petty tasks, calmly and self- 
confidently as if he were alone in the world, they all looked at him 
without a movement. At last the first notes wailed out, sharp and 


B 


53 



uneven The excitement rose The Montenegrin found the key and 
began to sing thiough his nose and accompany himself with the 
gusle Everyone was intent, awaiting the w^onderful tale Then, 
suddenly, after he had more or less attuned his voice to the gusle, 
the Montenegrin threw back his head proudly and violently so that 
his Adam’s apple stood out m his scrawny neck and his sharp profile 
was outlined in the firelight, and sang in a strangled and constrained 
voice: A-a>a-a- a-a-a-a- and then all at once in a clear and ringing 
tone: 

The Serbian Tsar Stefan 
Drank wine m fertile Prizren, 

By him sat the old patriarchs, 

Foui of them, the old patriarchs; 

Next them were nine bishops 

And a score of three-tailed Vezirs 

And the ranks of Serbian nobles 

Wine was served by Michael the cup-bearer 

And on the breast of his sister Kandosia 

Shone the light of precious stones . / 

The peasants pressed closer and closer around the singer but with- 
out making the slightest noise; their very breathing could be heard. 
They half closed their eyes, carried away with wonder Thrills ran 
up and down their spines, their backs straigntened up, their breasts 
expanded, their eyes shone, their fingers opened and shut and their 
jaw muscles tightened. The Montenegrin developed his melody more 
and more rapidly, even more beautiful and bolder, while the wet 
and sleepless workmen, earned away and insensible to all else, fol- 
lowed the tale as if it were their own more beautiful and more 
glorious destiny. 

Among the countless peasants pressed for hard labour was a cer- 
tain Radisav from UniSte, a small village quite close to the town. 
He was a smallish man, dark-faced, with restless eyes, a little bent, 
and walked quickly, spreading out his legs and moving his head and 
shoulders from left to right, right to left, as if sowing wheat. He was 
not as poor as he appeared to be, nor as simple as he made himself 
out. His family were known as the Heraci; they had good land and 
there were many males in the house, but almost the whole village 
had been converted to Islam over the past forty years so that they 
were lonely and isolated. This small, bowed Radisav had been 
scurrying about from one stable to the next these autumn nights 
‘sowing’ revolt and had insinuated himself among the peasants like 
an eel, whispering and counselling with one only at a time. What he 
said was roughly this: 

‘Brother, we have had enough of this. We must defend ourselves. 

34 



You can see for yourself that this building work will be the death of 
all of us; It will eat us all up. Even our children will have to do forced 
labour on the bridge, if there are any of us left. For us this work 
means extermination and nothing less. A bridge is no good to the 
poor and to the rayah, but only for the Turks; we can neither raise 
armies nor carry on trade. For us the ferry is more than enough So a 
few of us have agreed among ourselves to go by night, at the darkest 
hour, and break down and spoil as much as possible of what has been 
done, and to spread the rumour that it is a Vila, a fairy, who is de- 
stroying the works at the bridge and who does not want any bridge 
over the Drina. We shall see if this will be of any help. We have no 
other way and something must be done.’ 

There were, as always, some who were fainthearted and un- 
reliable, who thought this to be a sterile idea; since the cunning and 
powerful Turks would not be turned away from their intention they 
would have to do forced labour even longer since God so willed. They 
should not make bad worse. But there were also those who felt that 
anything was better than to go on slaving and to wait until even the 
last rag of clothing fell from a man and the last ounce of strength be 
wasted by the heavy labour and Abidaga’s short commons; and that 
they must follow anyone who was willing to go to extremes. These 
were for the most part young men, but there were also serious mar- 
ried men, with families, who agreed, though without enthusiasm or 
fire, and who said worriedly: 

*Come and let’s break it down; may his blood eat him up before he 
eats us up And if that does not help . . .’ 

And at that point they waved their hands in desperate resolution. 

So in these first autumn days the rumour began to spread, first 
among the workers and then in the town itself, that the vila of the 
waters had intervened in the work on the bridge, that she destroyed 
and pulled down overnight what had been built by day and that the 
whole scheme would come to nothing. At the same time, inex- 
plicable damage began to appear over night in the revetments and 
even in the masonry itself The tools which the masons had up till 
then left on the piers began to get lost and disappear, the revetments 
to break down and be carried away by the waters. 

The rumour that the bridge would never be finished spread far 
afield. Both Turks and Christians spread it and little by little it took 
form as a firm belief. The Christian rayah were jubilant, whispering 
it stealthily and soundlessly but from a full heart. The local Turks, 
who had earlier looked on the Vezir’s building work with pride, be- 
gan to wink disdainfully and wave their hands. Many of the con- 
verted Turks who, in changing faith, had not found what they had 

35 



hoped for, but had continued to sit down to a meagre supper and go 
about with patched elbows, heard the rumour and repeated with en- 
joyment the story of the great lack of success and found some sort of 
proud satisfaction in the thought that not e\en Vezirs could carry 
out everything they had a mind to do It was alreadj’ being said that 
the foreign maestri weie preparing to lea\e and that theie would be 
no bridge there where no bridge had ever been befoie and where it 
should never have been begun All these tales blended and spread 
quickly. 

The common people easily make up fables and spread them 
quickly, wherein reality is strangely and inextricably mixed and 
interwoven with legend The peasants who listened at night to the 
gusle player said that the Vila who was destroying the bridge had 
told Abidaga that she would not cease her work of destruction until 
twin children, Stoja and Ostoja by name, should be walled into the 
foundations. Many swore that they had seen the guards who were 
searching for such a pair of children in the villages (the guards were 
indeed going around the villages but they were not looking for chil- 
dren but listening for rumours and interrogating the people in order 
to try and find out who were those unknown persons who were de- 
stroying the bndge). 

A short time before, it had happened that in a village above 
ViSegrad a poor stuttering half-witted girl, who was a servant, be- 
came pregnant, she herself would not say, or could not say, by 
whom. It was a rare and almost unheard of event that a girl, and such 
a girl, should conceive and still more so that the father should remain 
unknown. The story was noised far abroad. In good time the girl gave 
birth, in some stable or other, to twins, both stillborn. The women 
from the village who helped her at the birth, which was exception- 
ally difficult, at once buned the children in a plum orchard. But on 
the third day after, the unfortunate mother got up and began to look 
for her children everywhere in the village. In vain they explained to 
her that the children had been born dead and had been buried 
Finally, in order to be rid of her incessant questionings, they told 
her, or rather explained to her by gestures, that her children had been 
taken away to the town, down there where the Turks were building 
the bridge. Weak and distraught, she wandered down into the town 
and began to range around the ferry and the construction works, 
looking fearfully into the eyes of the men there and asking in incom- 
prehensible stutterings for her children. The men looked at her in 
amazement or drove her away so that she should not hinder them at 
their work. Seeing that they did not understand what she wanted, she 
unbuttoned her coarse peasant shift and showed them her breasts, 

36 



painful and swollen, on which the nipples had already begun to 
crack and showed all bloody from the milk that flowed from them 
irresistibly No one know how to help her and explain to her that 
her children had not been walled up in the bridge, for to all kind 
words and assurances, curses and threats, she only stuttered miser- 
ably and with sharp distrustful glances peered into every corner. 
Finally they gave up persecuting her and allowed her to wander 
about the construction work, avoiding her with a sorrowful com- 
passion The cooks gave her some of the workers' porridge which 
had got burnt at the bottom of the cauldrons. They called her mad 
Ilinka and, after them, the whole town did so Even Abidaga himself 
passed by her without cursing her, turning his head away super- 
stitiously, and ordered that she be given alms. So she went on living 
there, a harmless idiot, by the construction works And because of 
her the story remained that the Turks had walled her children into 
the bridge Some believed it and others not, but none the less it was 
repeated all the more and noised afar 

Meanwhile the damage went on, now less now more, and parallel 
with it the rumours spread even more obstinately that the vilas 
would not permit a bridge to be built across the Drina. 

Abidaga was furious It enraged him that anyone could be found 
who dared to undertake anything against his work or his intentions 
despite his proverbial harshness which he cultivated as a special sub- 
ject for pride Also all these people disgusted him, the Moslems as 
much as the Christians; slow and unskilled in their work, they were 
quick enough for raillery and lack of respect and knew only too well 
how to find mocking and corrosive words for everything they did 
not understand or did not know how to do He posted guards on 
both banks of the river The damage to the earthworks then ceased, 
but damage to the construction work in the river itself continued. 
Only on moonlit nights was there no damage. That confirmed 
Abidaga, who did not believe in the Vila, in his belief that this parti- 
cular Vila was not invisible and did not descend from on high. For a 
long time he would not, or could not, believe those who said it was 
due to peasant cunning, but now he was convinced that that was 
exactly what it was And that excited him to still greater fury But 
he none the less knew that he must appear calm and hide his fury if 
he wanted to snare these pests and finish once and for all with these 
tales about vilas and about stopping work on the bridge, which 
might become dangerous. He summoned the chief of the guards, a 
certain man from Plevlje, who had grown up in Stambul, a pale and 
unhealthy man. 

The two men were instinctively hostile to one another, but at the; 

37 



same time were continually drawn together and came into conflict. 
Between them incomprehensible feelings of hatred, repulsion, fear 
and distrust were woven permanently. Abidaga, who was mild and 
pleasant towards no one, displayed an unconcealed repulsion to- 
wards this pale-faced renegade All that he did or said drove Abidaga 
into a frenzy and provoked him to curse and humiliate him, but the 
more that the man from Plevlje abased himself and was obsequious, 
the greater grew Abidaga’s repulsion From the first day of their 
meeting the leader of the guards was superstitiously and terribly 
afraid of Abidaga and this fear became in time an oppressive night- 
mare which never left him At every step and movement, often in his 
dreams, he would think- what will Abidaga say about this’ In vain 
he tried to please him and do what he wished Everything that came 
from him Abidaga accepted with disdain And that incomprehen- 
sible hatred hampered and disconcerted the man from Plevlje and 
made him still stiffer and clumsier. He believed that, because of 
Abidaga, he would one day lose not only his job and his position, but 
also his head Therefore he lived in a state of permanent agitation 
and passed from dull discouragement to a feverish and cruel zeal 
When now, pale and stiff, he stood before Abidaga, the latter spoke 
to him in a voice hoarse with anger. 

‘Listen, blockhead, you are clever with these sons of sows, you 
know their language and all their monkey-tricks. Yet for all that you 
are incapable of finding out what scab it is who has dared to spoil the 
Vezir’s work. That is because you are a scab yourself, the same as 
they are, and the only worse scab is whoever made you leader and 
a chief and has found nobody to reward you as you deserve. So I will 
do so, since there is no other. Know that I will put you under the 
earth so that you will not throw as much shadow as even the tiniest 
blade of grass. If all damage to the works does not cease within three 
days, if you do not catch whoever is doing this and do not put an 
end to all these silly stories about vilas and about stopping the work, 
then I will put you living on a stake on the highest part of the staging, 
that all may see you and take fright and get some sense into then- 
heads. I swear this by my life and my faith, which I do not swear by 
lightly. Today is Thursday. You have till Sunday. Now go to the 
devil who sent you to me. Go! March!’ 

Even without this oath the man from Plevlje would have believed 
Abidaga’s threat, for even in his dreams he used to shudder at his 
words and at his glance. Now he went out in one of his fits of panic- 
stricken terror and at once set desperately to work. He summoned 
his own men and, passing suddenly from dull torpor to mad rage, he 
began to curse them. 


38 



‘Blind good-for-nothings!' raged the man from Plevlje, as if he 
were already placed alive upon the stake and yelling in the face of 
each of the guards. ‘Is it thus that you keep watch and look after the 
Sultan's interests? You are quick and lively enough when you go to 
the cooking pots, but when you are on duty your legs are leaden and 
your wits are dull. My face burns because of you But you will do no 
more slacking in my employ. I will massacre all of you, not a single 
one of you will keep his head on his shoulders if in two days this busi- 
ness does not end and if you do not seize and kill these bastards You 
have still two days to live. I swear it by my faith and the Koran!' 

He went on shouting in this way for a long time. Then, not know- 
ing what else to say to them or with what more to threaten them, he 
spat at them one by one. But when he had played himself out and 
freed himself from the pressure of his fear (which had taken the 
form of rage) he set to work at once with desperate energy He spent 
the night cruising up and down the banks with his men At one time 
during the night it seemed to them that something was knocking at 
that part of the staging which was farthest out in the river and they 
rushed thither. They heard a plank crack and a stone fall into the 
river, but when they got to the spot they indeed found some broken 
scaffolding and a part of the masonry torn away but no trace of the 
miscreants Faced with that ghostly emptiness the guards shivered 
fi om superstitious fright and from the darkness and moisture of the 
night They called to one another, peered into the blackness, waved 
lighted torches, but all in vain The damage had been done again, and 
they who had done it had not been caught and killed, as though in 
very truth they were invisible. 

The next night the man from Plevlje arranged his ambush better. 
He sent some of his men over to the farther bank also and when night 
fell he hid guards in the scaffolding right out to the end and he him- 
self with two others sat in a boat which he had drawn unnoticed in 
the darkness to the left bank. Thence in a few strokes they could be 
at one of the two piers on which construction had begun. In this way 
he could fall on the miscreants from two sides, so that they could not 
escape unless they had wings or could go under water. 

All that long cold night the man from Plevlje lay in the boat 
covered with sheepskins, tormented by the dark thoughts whirling 
in his head; would Abidaga really carry out his threat and take his 
life which, under such a chief, was in any case no life but only terror 
and torment? But along the whole of the construction works not a 
murmur could be heard except the monotonous lapping and lisping 
of the unseen waters. Thus it dawned and the man from Plevlje felt 
in all his stiffened body that his life was darkening and shortening. 


39 



On the next, the third and last night, there was the same vigil, the 
same arrangements, the same fearful listening Midnight passed The 
man from Plevlje was seized with a mortal apathy Then he heard a 
slight splash and then, louder, a blow on the oak beams which were 
placed in the river and on which the staging rested There was a sharp 
whistle. But the leader’s boat had already moved Standing upright, 
he peered into the darkness, waving his hands and shouting in a 
hoarse voice: 

‘Row, row 

The men, half awake, rowed vigorously, but a strong current 
caught the boat earlier than it should have Instead of reaching the 
staging, the boat turned down river They were unable to make way 
against the current and it would have swept them far away had not 
something unexpectedly checked them. 

There, right in the middle of the main current, where there were 
neither beams nor scaffolding, their boat struck something heavy 
and wooden which echoed dully Only then did they realize that on 
the scaffolding above them the guards were struggling with some- 
thing The guards, local renegades, were all shouting at once: they 
fell over one another in the darkness in a medley of broken and in- 
comprehensible cries: 

'Hold there, don’t let go!’ 

‘Hey, fellows, here!’ 

‘It’s me! . . .’ 

Between the shouts some heavy object or human body could be 
heard splashing into the water. 

The man from Plevlje was for some moments uncertain where he 
was or what was happening, but as soon as he had come to his senses 
he began to pull with an iron hook at the end of a long pole at the 
beams on which his boat had struck and succeeded in pulling the 
boat upstream nearer and nearer the scaffolding Soon he was up to 
the oak piles and, taking heart, shouted at the top of his voice: 

‘Lights! Light a torch there! Throw me a rope!’ 

At first no one answered. ’Then, after much shouting, in which no 
one listened to or could understand anyone else, a weak torch glim- 
mered uncertainly and fitfully above This first spark of light only 
confused the eyes even more and mingled in an uneasy whirl, men, 
things and their shadows with the red reflections on the water. But 
then another torch flamed in another hand. The light steadied and 
men began to pull themselves together and recognize one another. 
Soon everything became clear and explicable. 

Between the boat of the man from Plevlje and the scaffolding lay 
a small raft made of only three planks; at the front was an oar, a real 


40 



raftsman^s oar, only shorter and weaker. The raft was moored with 
a bark cord to one of the beams under the scaffolding and was held 
thus against the swift waters which splashed about it and tried with 
all their force to pull it away downstream. The guards on the staging 
helped their leader to cross the raft and climb up to them All were 
haggard and out of breath. On the planks a Christian peasant was 
lying His breast was heaving quickly and violently and his eyes, 
starting out of his head, showed fear-stricken whites 

The oldest of the four guards explained to their excited leader that 
they had been keeping watch at various points on the staging. When 
they heard the sound of oars in the darkness, they had thought it was 
their leader’s boat, but they had been clever enough not to show 
themselves and to wait and see what would happen. Then they saw 
two peasants who approached the piers and with some difficulty 
moored their raft to one of them They let them climb up and come 
among them and then they attacked them with axes, overcame them 
and bound them One, who had been struck unconscious by a blow 
from an axe, they had bound easily, but the other one, after pretend- 
ing to be half-dead, had slipped from their grasp like a fish through 
the planks into the water The frightened guard halted in his story 
and the man from Plevlje screamed- 

'Who let him go^ Tell me who let him go, or I shall chop you all 
into small pieces, all of you ' 

The men stood silently and blinked at the red flickering light while 
then leader kept turning around as if searching the darkness, and 
shouting insults at them such as they had never heard him use by 
day Then, suddenly, he started, leant over the bound peasant as if 
over a precious hoard, and began to mutter through his teeth in a 
thin lachrymose voice* 

'Guard him, guard him well* You bastards, if you let him go, not a 
single one of you will keep his head on his shoulders ’ 

The guards crowded round the peasant Two more hurried to join 
them, crossing the ferry from the farther bank The man from 
Plevlje ordered them to bind the prisoner more securely. So they car- 
ried him like a corpse slowly and carefully to the bank. The man 
from Plevlje went with them, not looking where he was treading and 
never taking his eyes from the bound man It seemed to him that he 
was growing in stature with every step, that only from that moment 
was he beginning to live. 

On the bank new torches were lighted and began to flare up The 
captive peasant was taken into one of the workmen’s barracks where 
there was a fire, and was bound tightly to a post with ropes and 
chains taken from the hearth. 


4 ^ 



It was Radisav of UniSte himself. 

The man from Plevlje calmed down a little; he no longer screamed 
or swore, but he was unable to keep still. He sent guards along the 
banks to look for the other peasant who had leapt into the water, 
though it was clear that on so dark a night, if he had not drowned. 
It would be impossible to find or catch him He gave order after 
order, went out, came in again and then once again went back, 
drunk with excitement. He began to interrogate the bound 
peasant, but soon left oft doing that also. All that he did was only to 
master and conceal his nervousness, for in fact he had only one 
thought in his head, he was waiting for Abidaga He had not long 
to wait. 

As soon as he had slept out his first sleep Abidaga, as was his habit, 
waked shortly after midnight and, no longer able to sleep, stood by 
his window and looked out into the darkness By day he could see 
from his balcony at Bikavac the whole river valley and all the con- 
struction works, with the barracks, mills, stables and all that deva- 
stated and littered space around them. Now in the darkness he sensed 
their presence and thought with bitterness how slowly the work was 
proceeding and how, sooner or later, this must reach the Vezir's ears. 
Someone would be sure to see to that If no one else, then that 
smooth, cold and crafty Tosun Effendi Then it might chance that he 
might fall into disgrace with the Vezir That was what prevented 
him from sleeping, and even when he did fall asleep he trembled in 
his dreams. His food seemed poison to him, men seemed odious and 
his life dark when he even thought of it Disgrace —that meant that 
he would be exiled from the Vezir’s presence, that his enemies would 
laugh at him (Ah* Anything but that*), that he would be nothing 
and nobody, no more than a rag, a good for nothing, not only m the 
eyes of others but also m his own It would mean giving up his hard 
won fortune or, if he managed to keep it, to eke it out stealthily, 
far from Stambul, somewhere in the obscure provinces, forgotten, 
superfluous, ridiculous, wretched. No, anything but that! Better not 
to see the sun, not to breathe the air. It would be a hundred times 
better to be nobody and to have nothing. That was the thought that 
always came back to him and several times a day forced the blood 
to beat painfully in his skull and his temples, but even at other 
times never completely left him but lay like a black cloud within 
him. That was what disgrace meant to him, and disgrace was possible 
every day, every hour, since everyone was working to bring it on 
him. Only he alone worked against it and defended himself; it was 
one man against everyone and everything That had now lasted fif- 
teen years, from the first time that the Vezir had entrusted him with 


42 



a great and important task. Who could endure it? Who could sleep 
and be at peace? 

Although It was a cold damp autumn night, Abidaga opened the 
casement and looked into the darkness, for the closed room seemed 
stifling to him Then he noticed that there were lights and move- 
ments on the scaffolding and along the banks When he saw that 
there were more and more of them, he thought that something 
unusual must have happened, dressed and woke his servant. Thus 
he arrived at the lighted stable just at the moment when the man 
from Plevlje no longer knew what further insults to use, whom to 
order and what to do to shorten the time 

The unexpected arrival of Abidaga completely bewildered him. 
So much had he longed for this moment, yet now that it had come 
he did not know how to profit from it as he had hoped He stuttered 
in excitement and forgot all about the bound peasant. Abidaga 
only gazed through him disdainfully and went straight up to the 
prisoner. 

In the stable they had built up a big fire to which the guards kept 
adding fresh faggots so that even the most distant corner was lit up. 

Abidaga stood looking down at the bound peasant for he was 
much the taller man He was calm and thoughtful Everyone waited 
for him to speak, while he thought to himself; so this is the one with 
whom I have had to struggle and fight, this is what my position and 
my fate depended upon, this wretched half-witted renegade from 
Plevlje and the incomprehensible and obdurate opposition of this 
louse from the rayah. Then he shook himself and began to give 
orders and to question the peasant. 

The stable filled with guards, and outside could be heard the 
voices of the awakened overseers and workmen Abidaga put his 
questions through the man from Plevlje 

Radisav first said that he and another man had decided to run 
away and that therefore they had prepared a small raft and set off 
downstream. When they pointed out to him the senselessness of 
this story since it was impossible in the darkness to go down 
the turbulent river full of whirlpools, rocks and shoals, and that 
those who want to run away do not climb on the scaffolding and 
damage the works, he fell silent and only muttered sullenly. 

‘Well, I am in your hands Do what you like.* 

‘You will soon find out what we like,* Abidaga retorted briskly. 

The guards took away the chains and stripped the peasant to 
the buff They threw the chains into the heart of the fire and waited. 
As the chains were covered with soot, their hands were blackened 
and great patches were left on themselves and on the half-naked 


43 



peasant. When the chains were almost red hot, Merdjan the Gipsy 
came up and took one end of them in a long pair of tongs, while one 
of the guards took the other end. 

The man from Plevlje translated Abidaga’s words. 

‘Perhaps now you will tell the whole truth.’ 

‘What have I got to tell you’ You know everything and can do 
what you like.’ 

The two men brought the chains and wrapped them round the 
the peasant’s broad hairy chest. The scorched hair began to sizzle 
His mouth contracted, the veins in his neck swelled, his ribs seemed 
to stand out and his stomach muscles to contract and relax as 
when a man vomits He groaned from the pain, strained at the ropes 
which bound him and writhed and twisted in vain to lessen the 
contact of his body with the red hot iron. His eyes closed and the 
tears flowed down his cheeks They took the chain away 

That was only a beginning. Isn’t it better to talk without that?’ 

The peasant only breathed heavily through his nose, and remained 
silent. 

‘Who was with you’’ 

‘His name was Jovan, but I do not know either his house or his 
village.’ 

They brought the chains again and the burning hair and skin 
sizzled Coughing from the smoke and writhing from the pain, the 
peasant began to speak jerkily 

Those two alone had come to an agreement to destroy the work 
on the bridge They thought that it had to be done and they had 
done It. No one else had known anything about it or had taken 
part in it. At first they had set out from the banks in various places 
and been quite successful, but when they saw that there were guards 
on the scaffolding and along the banks, they had thought of binding 
three planks together to make a raft and thus, unnoticed, approach 
the work from the river. That had been three days ago On the first 
night they had nearly been caught They only ]ust got away. So 
the next night they had not gone out at all When they tried again 
that same night with the raft, there had happened what had 
happened. 

‘That is all. So it was, and so we worked. Now do what you will ’ 

‘No, no, that is not what we want. Tell us who made you do this' 
What you have suffered up till now is nothing to what you will 
get later on!’ 

‘Well, do what you like.’ 

Merdjan then came nearer with a pair of pincers. He knelt in 
front of the bound man and began to tear the nails off his naked feet. 


44 



The peasant remained silent and clenched his teeth but a strange 
trembling shook his whole body up to the waist even though he was 
bound which showed that the pain must have been exceptionally 
great After a few moments the peasant forced a few muttered words 
through his teeth The man from Plevlje, who had been hanging 
on his every word and waiting eagerly for some sort of admission, 
made a sign with his hand to the gipsy to stop and at once asked: 

‘What was that? What did you say?’ 

‘Nothing I only said, why in the name of God do you waste your 
time torturing me?’ 

‘Tell us who made you do it^* 

‘Who made me do it? Why, the devil.’ 

‘The devil?’ 

‘The devil Certainly that same devil who made you come here 
and build the bridge!’ 

The peasant spoke softly, but clearly and decisively. 

The devil! A strange word, said so bitterly in so unusual a situ- 
ation. The devil' The devil is certainly somewhere in this thought 
the man from Plevlje, standing with bowed head as if the bound 
man were questioning him and not he the bound man. The words 
touched him on a sensitive spot and awoke in him all of a sudden 
all his anxieties and fears, in all their strength and terror, as if they 
had never been swept away by the capture of the culprit. Perhaps 
indeed all this, with Abidaga and the building of the bridge and 
this mad peasant, was the devil’s work. The devil! Perhaps he was 
the only one to fear The man from Plevlje shivered and shook him- 
self At that moment the loud and angry voice of Abidaga brought 
him to himself. 

‘What’s the matter with you’ Are you asleep, good-for-nothing?’ 
shouted Abidaga, striking his right boot with his short leather 
whip 

The gipsy was still kneeling with the pincers in his hand and 
looking upwards with black shining eyes, frightened and humble, 
at the tall figure of Abidaga. The guards piled up the fire which 
was already roaring The whole place shone; it was like a furnace 
but somehow solemn. What that evening had seemed a gloomy and 
undistinguished building all at once was transformed, became larger, 
widened out. In the stable and around it reigned a sort of solemn 
emotion and a special silence as there is in places where one extracts 
the truth, a living man is tortured or where fateful things occur. 
Abidaga, the man from Plevlje and the bound man moved and spoke 
like actors and all the others went on tiptoe with lowered eyes, not 
speaking save when forced to and then only in a whisper. Everyone 


45 



wished to be somewhere else, only not to be in this place nor at 
this work, but since that was not possible, they all lowered their 
voices and moved as little as they could, as if to get as far away as 
possible from this affair. 

Seeing that the interrogation was going slowly and did not give 
any hope of results, Abidaga with impatient movements and loud 
oaths went out of the stable. After him reeled the man from Plevlje, 
followed by the guards 

Outside It was growing light. The sun had not yet risen, but the 
whole horizon was clear. Deep among the hills the clouds lay in 
long dull purple bands and between them could be seen the clear 
sky almost green in colour Scattered patches of mist lay over the 
moist earth out of which peeked the tops of the fruit trees with 
sparse yellowish leaves Still striking at his boot with his whip, 
Abidaga gave orders. The criminal should continue to be interro- 
gated, especially about those who had helped him, but he should 
not be tortured beyond endurance lest he die. Everything must be 
made ready so that at noon that same day he should be impaled alive 
on the outermost part of the construction work at its highest point, 
so that the whole town and all the workers should be able to see 
him from the banks of the river; Merdjan was to get everything 
ready and the town-crier to announce the execution through all 
the quarters of the town, so that at midday all the people might see 
what happened to those who hindered the building of the bridge, 
and that the whole male population, both Turks and rayah, from 
children to old men, must gather on one or other of the banks to 
witness it. 

The day which was dawning was a Sunday On Sunday work 
went on as on any other day, but this day even the overseers were 
distrait. As soon as it was broad daylight, the news spread about 
the capture of the criminal, his torture and his execution which was 
to take place at midday The hushed and solemn mood of the stable 
spread over the whole area about the building works. The men on 
forced labour worked silently, each one avoided looking his neigh- 
bour in the eyes, and each man looked only to the work before 
him as if that were the beginning and the end of his world 

An hour before noon the people of the town, for the most part 
Turks, had collected on a level space near the bridge Children were 
hoisted on to high blocks of building stone which were lying about. 
The workmen swarmed around the narrow benches where the 
meagre rations which kept them alive were usually distributed. 
Chewing at them, they were silent and looked uneasily about them. 
A little later Abidaga appeared, accompanied by Tosun Fffpindi, 

46 



Mastro Antonio and one or two of the more prominent Turks. 
All stood on a small dry hummock between the bridge and the stable 
where the condemned man was. Abidaga went once more to the 
stable, where he was told that everything was ready; lying there 
was an oak stake about eight feet long, pointed as was necessary 
and tipped with iron, quite thin and sharp, and all well greased 
with lard On the scaffolding were the blocks between which the 
stake w'ould be embedded and nailed, a wooden mallet for the 
impalement, ropes and everything else that was needed. 

The man from Plevlje was distraught, his face earthen in colour 
and hjs eyes bloodshot Even now he was not able to endure 
Abidaga's flaming glances 

‘Listen, you’ If everything is not as it should be and if you disgrace 
me m public, neither you nor your bastard of a gipsy will ever 
appeal before me again, for I will drown you both in the Drina like 
a pair of blind puppies.’ 

Then, turning to the shivering gipsy, he said more kindly: 

‘You will get SIX grosh for the job, and another six if he stays 
alive till nightfall See to it!’ 

The hod]a called out from the main mosque in the market-place 
in a clear sharp voice. Uneasiness spread among the assembled 
people and a few' moments later the door of the stable opened Ten 
guards were drawn up in two ranks, five on either side. Between 
them was Radislav, barefooted and bareheaded, alert and stooping 
as ever, but he no longer ‘sowed’ as he walked but marched strangely 
with short steps, almost skipping on his mutilated feet with bleeding 
holes where the nails had been; on his shoulders he carried a long 
white sharpened stake Behind him was Merdjan with two other 
gipsies who were to be his helpers in the execution of the sentence. 
Suddenly from somewhere or other the man from Plevlje appeared 
on his bay and took his place at the head of the procession, which 
only had to go about a hundred paces to reach the first scaffolding. 

The people craned their necks and stood on tiptoe to see the man 
who had hatched the plot and destroyed the building work. They 
were all astonished at the poor miserable appearance of the man 
they had imagined to be quite different Naturally, none of them 
knew' why he hopped in so droll a manner and took abrupt little 
steps, and none of them could see the burns from the chains which 
crossed his chest like great belts, for his shirt and cloak hid them. 
Therefore he seemed to all those there too wretched and too insigni- 
ficant to have done the deed which now brought him to execution. 
Only the long white stake gave a sort of gruesome grandeur to the 
scene and kept everyone’s eyes fixed on it. 


47 



When they reached the spot on the bank where the excavation 
work began, the man from Plevlje dismounted and with a sort of 
solemn and theatrical air gave the reins to a groom, then disappeared 
with the others in the steep muddy track w^hich led down to the 
water's edge A little later the people saw them again as they 
appeared in the same order on the staging, climbing upwards slowly 
and carefully On the narrow passages made of planks and beams 
the guards closely surrounded Radisav and kept him very near them 
lest he should leap into the river They dragged their way along 
slowly and climbed even higher till they reached the top There, 
high above the water, was a boarded space about the size of a small 
room On it, as on a raised stage, they took their places, Radisav, 
the man from Plevlje and the three gipsies, with the rest of the 
guards posted around them on the staging 
The people watchmg moved uneasily and shifted about. Only 
a hundred paces separated them from those planks, so that they 
could see every man and every movement, but could not hear words 
or distinguish details. The people and the workmen on the left bank 
were about three times farther away, and moved around as much 
as they could and made every effort to try to see and hear better. 
But they could hear nothing and what they could see seemed 
at first only too ordinary and uninteresting and at the end so terrible 
that they turned their heads away and many quickly went home, 
regretting that they had ever come. 

When they ordered Radisav to he down, he hesitated a moment 
and then, looking past the gipsies and guards as if they were not 
there, came close up to the man from Plevlje and said almost con- 
fidentially as if speaking to a friend, softly and heavily* 

‘Listen, by this world and the next, do your best to pierce me well 
so that I may not suffer like a dog.’ 

The man from Plevlje started and shouted at him, as if defending 
himself from that too intimate approach: 

‘March, Vlachl You who are so great a hero as to destroy the 
Sultan’s work now beg for mercy like a woman. It will be as it has 
been ordered and as you have deserved.' 

Radisav bent his head still lower and the gipsies came up and 
began to strip off his cloak and his shirt. On his chest the wounds 
from the chains stood out, red and swollen. Without another word 
the peasant lay down as he had been ordered, face downward. The 
gipsies approached and the first bound his hands behind his back; 
then they attached a cord to each of his legs, around the ankles. 
Then they pulled outwards and to the side, stretching his legs wide 
apart. Meanwhile Merdjan placed the stake on two small wooden 

48 



chocks so that it pointed between the peasant’s legs Then he took 
from his belt a short broad knife, knelt beside the stretched-out man 
and leant over him to cut away the cloth of his trousers and to 
widen the opening through which the stake would enter his body. 
This most terrible part of the bloody task was, luckily, invisible to 
the onlookers They could only see the bound body shudder at the 
short and unexpected prick of the knife, then half rise as if it were 
going to stand up, only to fall back again at once, striking dully 
against the planks As soon as he had finished, the gipsy leapt up, 
took the wooden mallet and with slow measured blows began to 
strike the lower blunt end of the stake Between each two blows he 
would stop for a moment and look first at the body in which the 
stake was penetrating and then at the two gipsies, reminding them 
to pull slowly and evenly. The body of the peasant, spreadeagled, 
writhed convulsively, at each blow of the mallet his spine 
twisted and bent, but the cords pulled at it and kept it straight The 
silence from both banks of the river was such that not only every 
blow but even its echo from somewhere along the steep bank could 
be clearly heard. Those nearest could hear how the man beat with 
his forehead against the planks and, even more, another and unusual 
sound, that was neither a scream, nor a wail, nor a groan, nor any- 
thing human, that stretched and twisted body emitted a sort of 
creaking and cracking like a fence that is breaking down or a tree 
that is being felled At every second blow the gipsy went over to 
the stretched-out body and leant over it to see whether the stake was 
going m the right direction and when he had satisfied himself that 
It had not touched any of the more important internal organs, he 
returned and went on with his work. 

From the banks all this could scarcely be heard and still less seen, 
but all stood there trembling, their faces blanched and their fingers 
chilled with cold 

For a moment the hammering ceased. Merdjan now saw that close 
to the right shoulder muscles the skin was stretched and swollen. He 
went forward quickly and cut the swollen place with two crossed 
cuts. Pale blood flowed out, at first slowly then faster and faster. Two 
or three more blows, light and careful, and the iron-shod point of the 
stake began to break through at the place where he had cut He 
struck a few more times until the point of the stake reached level 
with the right ear. The man was impaled on the stake as a lamb on 
the spit, only that the tip did not come through the mouth but in the 
back and had not seriously damaged the intestines, the heart or the 
lungs. Then Merdjan threw down the mallet and came nearer. He 
looked at the unmovmg body, avoiding the blood which poured out 


49 



of the places where the stake had enteied and had come out again 
and was gathering in little pools on the planks The two gipsies 
turned the stiffened body on its back and began to bind the legs to 
the foot of the stake Meanwhile Merdjan looked to see if the man 
were still alive and carefully examined the face that had suddenly 
become swollen, wider and larger The ejes were wide open and 
restless, but the eyelids were unmoving, the mouth was wide open 
but the two lips stiff and contracted and between them the clenched 
teeth shone white Since the man could no longer control some of 
his facial muscles the face looked like a mask But the heart beat 
heavily and the lungs worked with short, quickened breath The two 
gipsies began to lift him up like a sheep on a spit Merdjan shouted 
to them to take care and not shake the body, he himself went to help 
them. Then they embedded the lower, thicker end of the stake 
between two beams and fixed it there with huge nails and then 
behind, at the same height, buttressed the whole thing with a 
short strut which was nailed both to the stake and to a beam on the 
staging. 

When that too had been done, the gipsies climbed down and 
joined the guards, and on that open space, raised a full eight feet up- 
right, stiff and bare to the waist, the man on the stake remained alone. 
From a distance it could only be guessed that the stake to which his 
legs had been bound at the ankles passed right through his body So 
that the people saw him as a statue, high up in the air on the very 
edge of the staging, high above the river. 

A murmur and a wave of movement passed through the onlookers 
on the banks. Some lowered their eyes and others went quickly 
home without turning their heads But the majority looked dumbly 
at this human likeness, up there in space, unnaturally stiff and up- 
right. Fear chilled their entrails and their legs threatened to give way 
beneath them, but they were still unable to move away or take their 
eyes from the sight. And amid that terrified crowd mad Ilinka 
threaded her way, looking everyone in the eyes and trying to read 
their glances to find from them where her sacrificed and buried 
children were. 

Then the man from Plevlje, Merdjan and a pair of guards went up 
to the impaled man and began to examine him more closely Only a 
thin trickle of blood flowed down the stake. He was alive and con- 
scious. His ribs rose and fell, the veins in his neck pulsed and his 
eyes kept turning slowly but unceasingly Through the clenched 
teeth came a long drawn-out groaning in which a few words could 
with difficulty be distinguished 

Turks, Turks, . . .’ moaned the man on the stake, ‘Turks on the 



bridge . . may you die like dogs . . . like dogs ’ 

The gipsies picked up their tools and then, with the man from 
Plevlje, came down from the staging to the bank. The people made 
way for them and began to disperse Only the children on the high 
blocks of stone and the bare trees waited a little longer, not knowing 
if this weie the end or whether there would be more, to see what 
would happen next with that strange man who hovered over the 
waters as if suddenly frozen in the midst of a leap. 

The man from Plevlje approached Abidaga and reported that 
everything had been carried out correctly and satisfactorily, that the 
cnminal was still alive and that it seemed that he would go on living 
since his internal organs had not been damaged. Abidaga did not 
reply but only gave a sign with his hand to bring his horse and began 
to say goodbye to Tosun Effendi and Mastro Antonio. Everyone be- 
gan to disperse. Through the market-place the town-cner could be 
heard announcing that the sentence had been carried out and that 
the same or a worse punishment awaited anyone who would do the 
like in future. 

The man from Plevlje remained in perplexity on the level space 
which had now suddenly emptied His servant held his horse and the 
guards waited for orders. He felt that he ought to say something but 
was not able to because of the wave of feeling that only now began 
to rise within him and choke him Only now did he become conscious 
of all that he had forgotten since he had been too busy carrying out 
the sentence. He remembered Abidaga’s threat that it would have 
been he who would have been placed upon the stake had he not suc- 
ceeded in catching the criminal. He had escaped that horror, but only 
by a hair and only at the last moment. But things had turned out 
otherwise The sight of that man, who was hanging, bound and still 
alive, over the river filled him with terror and also with a sort of 
painful joy that such a fate had not been his and that his body was 
still undamaged, was free and able to move. At that thought burning 
pains shot through his chest and spread into his legs and arms and 
forced him to move about, to smile and to speak, just to prove to 
himself that he was healthy, that he could move freely, could speak 
and laugh aloud, could even sing if he so wished, and not merely 
mutter useless curses from a stake, awaiting death as the only happi- 
ness which could still be his. His hands and arms moved of their own 
volition, his lips opened and from them flowed unwittingly a 
strangled laugh and a copious flow of words: 

‘Ha, ha, ha, Radisav, thou mountain vtla, why so stiff? . . . Why not 
go on and undermine the bridge? . . . Why writhe and groan? Sing, 
vifa! Dance, vilaV 


51 



Astonished and bewildered, the guards w'atched their leader dance 
with outstretched arms, heard him sing and choice with laughter and 
with strange words, saw the white foam oozing more and more from 
the corners of his lips And his bay horse, in fear, cast sidelong 
glances at him 


52 



IV 




M 11 those who had been present at the execution of the sentence 

/\ spread terrible reports through the town and the surround- 
mg villages An indescribable fear gripped the townsmen and 
the workers. Slowly and gradually a full consciousness of 
what had happened in their midst in the course of a short November 
day came home to them. All conversation centred on the man who, 
high up there on the scaffolding, was still alive on the stake Every- 
one resolved not to speak of him; but what good was that when 
their thoughts turned continually to him and all glances centred on 
the spot’ 

The peasants coming from Banja carting stone in their bullock 
carts turned their eyes away and curtly ordered their oxen to make 
haste The workers at work along the banks and on the staging called 
to one another in hushed voices and as little as they could The over- 
seers themselves, with their wooden staves in their hands, were sub- 
dued and less brutal The Dalmatian stonemasons clenched their 
jaws, turned their backs on the bridge and struck angrily with their 
chisels which in the universal stillness sounded like a flock of wood- 
peckers. 

Twilight came quickly and the workers hurried to their hovels in 
the wish to get as far as possible from the staging Before it was quite 
dark, Merdjan and a trusted servant of Abidaga once more climbed 
the staging and definitely confirmed that Radisav was even then, 
four hours after the sentence had been carried out, alive and con- 
scious Consumed with fever, he rolled his eyes slowly and painfully, 
and when he saw the gipsy below him, he began to groan more 
loudly In this groaning, which showed his life was ebbing, it was 
possible to distinguish only a few isolated words; 

‘The Turks ... the Turks . the bridge!’ 

Having satisfied themselves, they returned to Abidaga’s house at 
Bikavac, telling everyone whom they met on their way that the 
criminal was still alive; and since he ground his teeth and spoke well 
and clearly from the stake there was every hope that he would live 


53 



until noon the next day Abidaga too was satisfied and gave orders 
that Merdjan was to be paid his promised reward 
That night everything living m the town and about the bridge 
slept in fear Or rather those who could slept but there were many 
to whom sleep would not come. 

The next day which was a Monday dawned a sunny November 
morning There was not an eye in the whole town or about the build- 
ing work that did not turn towards that intricate criss-cross of beams 
and planks over the waters, at the farther end of which, upright and 
apart, was the man on the stake Many who, on waking, had thought 
that they had dreamt all that had taken place the day before upon 
the bridge, now rose and with fixed eyes looked at the continuance 
of this nightmare which remained there stark in the sun 
Amongst the workers there was still that hush of the day before, 
filled with pity and bitterness In the towm there w^as still that whis- 
pering and anxiety Merdjan and that same servant of Abidaga's 
climbed up the scaffolding once more and examined the condemned 
man; they spoke to each other, lifted their eyes and looked upwards 
into the face of the peasant and then, suddenly, Merdjan pulled at 
his trousers From the way in which they made their way down- 
wards to the bank and walked silently through the men at work, 
everyone realized that the peasant had at last died Those who were 
Serbs felt a certain easing of the spirit, as at an invisible victory. 

Now they looked more boldly up at the scaffolding and the man 
who had been condemned They felt as if fate, m their continual 
wrestling and measuring of forces with the Turks, had now inclined 
to their side. Death was the greatest trump in the game. Mouths till 
then contracted in fear now began to open Muddy, wet, unshaven 
and pale, rolling great blocks of Banja stone with pinewood levers, 
they halted for a moment to spit on their palms and say to each other 
in hushed voices: 

‘May God pardon him and have mercy upon him!’ 

‘Ah, the martyr! It is hard for such as we!* 

‘Don’t you see that he has become a saint?* 

And everyone glanced up at the dead man who stayed there as up- 
right as if he had been marching at the head of a company. Up there, 
so high, he no longer seemed terrible or pitiful to them. On the other 
hand, it was now clear to all of them how he was exalted and set 
apart. He no longer stood on the earth, his hands held to nothing, he 
did not swim, did not fly; he no longer had any weight Freed from 
all earthly ties and burdens, he was no longer a prey to troubles; no 
one could do anything more against him, neither rifle nor sword, nor 
evil thoughts, nor men’s words, nor Turkish courts. Naked to the 


54 



waist, with arms and legs bound, his head thrown back against the 
stake, that figure no longer seemed to bear any likeness to a h uman 
body which grows and then rots away, but seemed to be raised on 
high, hard and imper’‘:l'^’'lc rs ? statue which would remain there 
forever. 

The men on foiled .abcur turned and crossed themselves 
stealthily. 

In Mejdan the women hurried through the courtyards to whisper 
to each other for a moment or so and weep, and then at once rushed 
back to see if the luncheon had burnt. One of them lighted an ikon- 
lamp Quickly, in all the houses, ikon-lamps hidden away in the 
corners of the rooms began to glow The children, blinking in this 
solemn atmosphere, looked at the brightness and listened to the 
broken and incomprehensible sentences of their elders: ‘Defend us, 0 
Lord, and protect us!’, ‘Ah, martyr, he is chosen before God as if he 
had built the greatest of churches!’, ‘Help us, 0 Lord, Thou Holy 
One, drive away the enemy and do not let him rule longer over us!’; 
and incessantly asked who was the martyr and who was building a 
church and where. The small boys were especially inquisitive. Their 
mothers hushed them- 

‘Be quiet, my soul' Be quiet and listen to mother. As long as you 
are alive keep away from those accursed Turks.’ 

Before it began to darken, Abidaga once more went around the 
construction work and, satisfied with the result of this terrible 
example, ordered that the peasant be taken down from the stake. 

‘Throw the dog to the dogs!’ 

That night, which fell suddenly as soft and moist as spring, there 
began an incomprehensible murmuring, a coming and going among 
the workers. Even those who had not wanted to hear of destruction 
and resistance were now ready to make sacrifices and do all that 
they could The man on the stake had become an object of general 
attention as if he had been holy. Some hundreds of exhausted men, 
moved by an inner force made up of pity and ancient custom, in- 
stinctively joined in an effort to get the corpse of the martyred man, 
to prevent it from being profaned and to give it Christian burial. 
After cautious whispered consultations in the huts and stables, the 
men on forced labour collected among themselves the considerable 
sum of seven grosh with which to bribe Merdjan. To carry out this 
work they chose three of the craftiest among them and succeeded in 
getting in touch with the executioner Wet and tired from their 
labours, the three peasants bargained, slowly and cunningly, going 
round and round the point. Frowning, scratching his head and stut- 
tering intentionally, the oldest of the peasants said to the gipsy: 


SS 



Well It's all over now It was so fated Still, you know^ it is, a 
human being, one of God’s creations it shouldn’t you know 
what I mean . it shouldn’t be eaten by beasts or torn to bits by 
dogs’ 

Merdjan, who knew well enough what was in the wind, defended 
himself, more sorrowfully than obstinately 
'No Don’t even speak of it You’ll get me well roasted You don’t 
know what a Ivnx that Abidaga is‘’ 

The peasant was troubled, frowned and thought to himself* 'He is 
a gipsy, a thing without cross or soul, one cannot call him either 
friend or brother, and one cannot take his word by anything in 
heaven or earth’, and held his hand in the shallow pocket of his 
cloak tightly grasping the seven grosh. 

'I know that very well We all know that it is not easy for you 
Only, no one can blame you Here we have got together four grosh 
for you which, as we see it, should be enough. . ’ 

'No, no, my life is dearer to me than all the treasure in the world. 
Abidaga would never let me live; that one sees everything, even 
when he is asleep. I am dead at the mere thought of it’’ 

'Four grosh, even five, but that’s all we can do’ We could even find 
that much,’ went on the peasant, paying no heed to the gipsy’s 
laments. 

'I dare not, I dare not . ’ 

'Very well then Since you have got your orders to throw 
the the body to the to the dogs, you will throw it. But what 
happens after that is none of your affair, nor wnll anyone ask you 
about It So you see if we, for example, should take that that 
body and should bury it somewhere according to our law but, let 
us say, stealthily so that not a living soul will know . . . then you 
will, for example, say next day that the dogs have . . . have carried 
away that . that body No one will be any the worse and you will 
have got your share ’ 

The peasant spoke carefully and with circumspection, only he 

halted with a strange uneasiness before the word 'body* 

'Am I to lose my head for five grosh? No, no, n-o-o- * 

'For six,’ added the peasant calmly. 

The gipsy drew himself up, spread out his arms, and assumed an 
expression of moving sincerity, as only men who do not distinguish 
truth from lies can do He stood before the peasant as though he were 
the judge and the peasant the criminal. 

'Let it be on my head, since that is my fate, and let my chai remain 
a widow and my children beggars; if you give me seven grosh, take 
the body away, but no one must see and no one must know.* 

56 



The peasant shook his head, regretting deeply that this scab must 
get everything right down to the last farthing, as if the gipsy had 
been able to see into his closed fist! 

Then they came to an agreement, down to the last detail Merdjan 
was to bring the corpse, when he had taken it from the scaffolding, 
to the left bank of the river and there, as soon as it grew dark, was 
to throw It down on a stony patch near the road, so that it could be 
seen both by Abidaga’s servants and by anyone who might be pass- 
ing by The three peasants would be hidden in a thicket, a little far- 
ther on As soon as darkness fell, they would take the corpse, carry 
it away and bury it, but m a hidden place and without any visible 
trace, so that it would seem quite likely that the dogs had dragged it 
away overnight and eaten it Three grosh were to be paid m advance 
and four more when the job was finished. 

That same night everything was carried out according to the 
agreement. 

At twilight Merdjan brought the corpse and threw it on the road- 
side. (It no longer resembled that body which all had looked at for 
the past two days, upright and stiff upon the stake; this was once 
again the old Radisav, small and bowed, only now without blood or 
life.) Then he went back at once with his assistants by the ferry to 
the town on the other bank. The peasants waited in the thicket. One 
or two late workers passed, and a Turk on his way home to the town. 
Then the whole countryside became quite still and dark Dogs began 
to appear, those powerful, mangy, hungry cowardly curs without 
masters or homes. The peasants concealed in the undergrowth threw 
stones at them and drove them away. They ran with tails between 
their legs but only for twelve paces or so from the corpse where they 
waited to see what would happen next. Their eyes could be seen 
glowing and shining. When it was clear that night had really fallen 
and there was no longer any likelihood that anyone else would come 
along, the peasants came out of their hiding place carrying a pick 
and shovel. They had also brought two planks with them on which 
they placed the corpse and so carried it away. There in a gully caused 
by the spring and autumn rains rushing down the hill into the Drina, 
they removed the larger stones which formed the bed of a dry water- 
course, and dug out a deep grave quickly, silently, without words 
and without noise In it they placed the cold, stiff, twisted body. The 
oldest of the peasants leapt into the pit, crossed himself carefully a 
few times, lit first a piece of tinder and then a small candle of twisted 
wax, shielding the light with his two hands; he placed it above the 
head of the dead man and crossed himself, repeating three times 
quickly and aloud, Tn the Name of the Father, the Son and the Holy 


57 



Spirit ’ The two men with him crossed themselves m the darkness 
above. The peasant then made a movement with his hands over the 
dead man as if pouring from his empty hand the unseen wine and 
said twice, softly and reverently 

‘Peace with the saints, O Christ, for the soul of Thy slave ’ 

Then he whispered a few more words, disconnected and incom- 
prehensible, but sounding like prayers, solemn and reverent, while 
the two men above the grave crossed themselves continually When 
he had ended, they lowered the two planks so that they formed a 
sort of roof over the dead man Then the peasant crossed himself 
once more, extinguished the candle and climbed out of the grave 
Then, slowly and carefully, they replaced the earth in the grave, 
treading it down well so that no sw'elling could be seen When that 
was done, they put back the stones, like the bed of the stream, across 
the freshly dug earth, crossed themselves once more and went back 
home, making a wide detour so as to rejoin the road at a point as far 
away as possible. 

That night there fell a dense soft ram without wind, and in the 
morning that dawned the whole river valley was filled with milky 
mist and a heavy moisture In a sort of white resplendence which 
now rose and now fell, the sun could be seen somewhere struggling 
with the mists which it was unable to pierce All was ghostly, new 
and strange. Men suddenly appeared out of the mist and equally sud- 
denly were lost in it In such weather, early in the morning, there 
passed through the market-place a simple country cart and on it two 
guards watching the man from Plevlje, their leader until the day 
before, bound and under arrest. 

From the previous day, when in the access of unexpected emotion 
at finding himself still alive and not on the stake he had begun to 
dance before them all, he had never calmed down. All his muscles 
twitched, he could no longer keep still, but was constantly tor- 
mented by the irresistible urge to prove to himself and show others 
that he was still healthy, whole and capable of movement At inter- 
vals he would remember Abidaga (that was the black spot in his new 
]oy') and would fall into a dark reverie. But while he was in this 
mood, fresh forces would collect within him which drove him irre- 
sistibly to wild and spasmodic movements like a madman. He would 
get up again and begin to dance, spreading out his arms, clicking his 
fingers and twisting like a dancer, showing by sudden and lively 
actions that he was not on the stake and gasping to the rhythm of 
his dance; 

‘See ... see ... I can do this . . and that . . . and that! . . .’ 

He refused to eat and would suddenly break off every conversa- 

58 



tion that he began and start to dance, affirming childishly at every 
movement: 

‘See, see, I can do this . . . and this. . . .!* 

When that night they finally decided to tell Abidaga what had 
happened, he replied coldly and abruptly: 

Take the madman to Plevlje and let them keep him chained up 
m his own house there, so that he does not play the fool round here. 
He was not the man for a job like that!' 

So was it done. But as their leader was unable to keep still, his 
guards were forced to bind him to the cart in which he was sitting. 
He wept and defended himself and as long as he was able to move 
any part of his body, he struggled and shouted: ‘See, seel' Finally 
they had to bind his arms and his legs, so that now he sat in the cart 
upright like a sack of wheat swaddled in ropes But, since he was no 
longer able to move, he began to imagine that they were impaling 
him on the stake and writhed and resisted with desperate cries: 

‘Not me, not me! Catch the vila! No, Abidagal' 

From the last houses on the outskirts of the town, people rushed 
out excited by his cries, but the cart with the guards and the sick 
man was swiftly lost to sight in the thick mist along the Dobruna 
road through which the sun could just be glimpsed. 

The unexpected and pitiable departure of the man from Plevlje 
instilled still greater fear into men's bones. It began to be whispered 
that the condemned peasant had been innocent and that this had 
preyed on the mind of the man from Plevlje. Among the Serbs in 
Mejdan the women began to tell how the vilas had buried the dead 
body of the hapless Radisav below Butkovo Stijene and how at night 
a plenteous light fell upon his grave, thousands and thousands of 
lighted candles which flamed and quivered in a long line reaching 
from heaven to earth. They had seen them through their tears. 

All sorts of things were whispered and believed, but fear was 
stronger than all else. 

Work on the bridge was carried on quickly, smoothly and without 
interruption or hindrance. It went on somehow or other until the 
beginning of December when an unexpectedly hard frost came, 
against which even Abidaga's power could do nothing. 

There were unheard-of frosts and blizzards in that first half of 
December. The stones froze into the ground and the wood cracked 
A fine crystalline snow covered everything, tools and whole huts, 
and the next day a capricious wind would drive it to another side 
and bury another part. Work ceased of itself and the fear of 
Abidaga paled and finally disappeared Abidaga tried to fight against 
it for some days but finally gave way. He dismissed the workers and 


59 



stopped the work In the midst of the heaviest snow fall he rode away 
with his men. That same day Tosun Effendi set out on a peasant’s 
sleigh heaped with straw and blankets, and after him Mastro 
Antonio, in the opposite direction And all that camp of forced 
labourers dispersed into the villages and the deep valleys without a 
sound and as imperceptibly as water soaked up by the earth The 
building works remained like a discarded toy 

Before setting out Abidaga again summoned the leading Turks 
He was depressed by his angry impotence and told them, as in the 
previous year, that he left everything in their hands and that theirs 
was the responsibility. 

‘I am going away but my eyes remain here Take heed, better that 
you cut off a score of disobedient heads than that a single nail of the 
Sultan’s should be lost. As soon as spring breaks 1 shall be here once 
more and shall call everyone to account.’ 

The leaders promised everything as they had the year before and 
dispersed to their homes, filled with anxiety and wrapped in their 
cloaks, capes and shawls, thanking God to themselves that God had 
given winter blizzards to the world and had in that way shown that 
His power was able to put a limit to the power of the mighty 

But when spring broke again, it was not Abidaga who came, but a 
new representative of the Vezir, Arif Beg, together with Tosun 
Effendi What he had so much feared had happened to Abidaga 
Someone, someone whom he knew well and had worked near him, 
had sent to the Grand Vezir detailed and accurate reports of his 
work on the ViSegrad bridge The Vezir had been accurately in- 
formed that for those two years between two and three hundred 
workmen had been summoned for forced labour every day without 
a single para of pay and very often bnnging their own food, and that 
Abidaga had taken the Vezir’s money for himself (the amount of 
money that he had up till then managed to embezzle was also 
reckoned) He had covered up his dishonesty, as is so often the case 
in life, by excessive zeal and exaggerated severity, so that the people 
of the whole distnct, not only the rayah but also the Turks, instead 
of giving thanks for this great bequest, cursed both the hour when 
it had been begun and the man for whom it was being built. Mehmed 
Pasha, who had been struggling all his life with the peculations and 
dishonesty of his officials, had ordered his unworthy servant to re- 
imburse the whole sum and take what remained of his fortune and 
his harem and go at once to a small town in Anatolia, and never to 
let himself be heard of again unless he wanted a worse fate to befall 
him. 

Two days after Arif Beg, Mastro Antonio also arrived from 

6o 



Dalmatia with the first workers. Tosun Effendi presented him to the 
new chief, and on a warm sunny April day they inspected the con- 
struction works and settled the order for the first work. After Arif 
Beg had withdrawn, leaving the other two alone on the bank, 
Mastro Antonio looked attentively at the face of Tosun Effendi 
who, even on so sunny a day, was huddled up in a wide black 
mantle. 

This IS quite another sort of man. Thanks be to God! I only ask 
myself who was so smart and so brave as to inform the Vezir and 
have that animal removed?' 

Tosun Effendi only looked straight in front of him and said 
quietly: 

There is no doubt, this one is better.’ 

Tt must have been someone who knew Abidaga’s affairs well and 
who had access to the Vezir and enjoyed his trust.' 

‘Certainly, certainly, this one is better,’ replied Tosun Effendi 
without looking up and wrapping his mantle even more closely 
around him. 

So the work began under the new chief, Arif Beg. 

He was, indeed, quite a different sort of man. Exceptionally tall, 
stooping, bald, with salient cheekbones and slit-like black laughing 
eyes, the people at once nicknamed him Misir-Baba-Old Baldie. 
Without shouting, without a staff, without big words or visible 
effort, he gave orders and set everything in order good-humouredly 
and casually with confident authority; he never overlooked any- 
thing or lost track of anything But he also brought with him a feel- 
ing of strict attention to everything that was the Vezir's will or 
order, but like a calm, normal and honest man who had nothing to 
be afraid of and nothing to conceal, so that he had no need to 
frighten or persecute anyone The work went on at the same speed 
(since speed was what the Vezir wanted), faults were punished with 
similar severity, but unpaid forced labour was stopped from that 
day. All the workers were paid and received rations in flour and salt, 
and all went quicker and better than in Abidaga's time. Also, mad 
Ilinka vanished; during the winter she had disappeared somewhere 
into the villages. 

The construction work grew and extended. 

It could now be seen that the Vezir’s bequest was not for a bridge 
only, but also for a han or caravanserai, in which travellers from 
afar who intended to cross the bridge could find shelter for them- 
selves, their horses and their goods should they arrive at nightfall. 
On Arif Beg's order the construction of this caravanserai was com- 
menced. At the entry to the market-place, 200 paces from the 

61 



bridge, just where the road to Mejdan began to rise steeply, there 
was a level space on which until then the Wednesday stock-market 
had been held. On this level space the building of the new han began. 
Work went on slowly, but from the very start it could be seen that 
It would be a solid and grandiose building conceived on a grand 
scale. The people scarcely even noticed how, slowly but surely, a 
great stone han was rising, for their attention was wholly centred on 
the building of the bridge. 

What was now being done on the Drina was so complicated, all 
the work so interlocked and complex, that the loungers in the town, 
who watched the building work from the two banks as if it were 
some natural phenomenon, could no longer follow it with under- 
standing. There were always fresh embankments and trenches run- 
ning in various directions, and the river was divided and split up into 
side-currents and backwaters and its main course moved from one 
to another Mastro Antonio brought from Dalmatia especially 
skilled cordwainers and collected all the hemp even from the districts 
around In special buildings the master-workmen twisted ropes of 
exceptional strength and thickness. Greek carpenters, according to 
designs of their own or those drawn up by Tosun Effendi, built huge 
wooden cranes with pawls, erected them on rafts and thus, with 
these ropes, raised even the heaviest blocks of stone and transported 
them to the piers which, one by one, began to rise out of the bed of 
the river. The transport of each one of these huge blocks from the 
banks to its position m the foundations of the bridge-piers lasted 
four days. 

Watching all this, day after day, year after year, the townspeople 
began to lose count of time and of the real intentions of the builders. 
It seemed to them that the construction had not moved an inch for- 
ward but was becoming more and more complicated and involved 
in auxiliary and subsidiary workings, and the longer it lasted the less 
it looked like what it was intended to be Men who do not work 
themselves and who undertake nothing in their lives easily lose 
patience and fall into error when judging the work of others. The 
ViSegrad Turks again began to shrug their shoulders and wave their 
hands when they talked of the bridge. The Chnstians remained silent, 
but watched the building work with secret and hostile thoughts, 
wishing for its failure as for that of every Turkish undertaking. It 
was about this time that the iguman of the monastery at Banja near 
Priboj wrote on the last blank page of one of his sacred books: ‘Be 
it known that about this time Mehmed Pasha undertook the building 
of a bridge over the Drina at ViSegrad. And great oppression fell upon 
the Christian people with hard labour. From the sea came master- 

62 



masons For three years they built and many aspers were spent in 
vain. They divided the waters into two and into three but they were 
unable to complete the bridge.* 

Years passed, summer and autumn, winter and spring, followed 
one another, the workers and the master-masons came and went. 
Now the whole Drina was conquered, not by the bridge but by the 
wooden scaffoldings which looked like a complicated and senseless 
conglomeration of pine beams and planks. From both banks rose 
high wooden cranes fastened on to firmly fixed rafts On both sides 
of the river fires smoked, on which lead was being melted in order 
to be poured into the holes in the stone blocks binding them in- 
visibly to one another. 

At the end of the third year occurred one of those accidents with- 
out which great buildings are rarely completed. The central pier, 
which was a little higher and wider at the top than the others, since 
on it the kapia was to rest, was just being completed During the 
transportation of a great stone block, work suddenly came to a stop 
The workmen swarmed about the great rectangular stone which, 
held by thick ropes, hung above their heads. The crane had not been 
able to lift It accurately over its place Mastro Antonio’s assistant, the 
Arab, rushed impatiently to the spot and began with loud angry cries 
(in that strange composite language which had been evolved in the 
course of years between these men from all parts of the world) to 
give orders to those handling the crane on the waters below. At that 
moment, for no known reason, the ropes gave way and the block 
fell, first by one corner and then with its full weight on to the excited 
Arab who had not even troubled to look above his head but only 
down at the water By a strange chance the block fell exactly into 
position, but in its fall it caught the Arab and crushed the whole 
lower part of his body. Everyone began to rush around, to give the 
alarm, to shout for help. Mastro Antonio arrived quickly. The 
young Negro, after his first unconsciousness, had come to himself; 
he groaned through clenched teeth and looked, sad and frightened, 
into Mastro Antonio’s eyes Frowning and pale, Mastro Antonio 
gave orders to summon the workmen, bring tools and try to lift the 
block. But all was in vain. A flow of blood suddenly poured out, the 
young man’s breath came short and his eyes glazed over. Within half 
an hour he died, feverishly clutching Mastro Antonio's hands in his. 

The Arab’s funeral was a solemn event which was long remem- 
bered. All the Moslem males turned out to escort him and each for 
a few paces carried the bier on which lay only the upper half of the 
young body, for half had remained under the stone block. Mastro 
Antonio raised over his grave a fine memorial, made of the same 

63 



stone from which the bridge was built The death of this young man, 
whom he had befriended as a child living in poverty in Ulcinj, where 
a few negro families still lived, had shaken him But the work did not 
cease even for a moment. 

That year and the next the winter was mild and work went on 
until mid-December. The fifth year of the work began Now that 
wide irregular circle of wood, stone, auxiliary equipment and all 
sorts of material began to contract 

On the level space beside the Mejdan road the new han, freed 
from its scaffolding, already stood. It was a large building, con- 
structed of the same sort of stone of which the bridge was made 
Work was still going on both inside and out, but already from a dis- 
tance It could be seen how much it excelled m size, the harmony of 
Its lines and the solidity of its construction, anything that had ever 
been built or even thought of m the town That building of clear, 
yellowish stone, with its roof of dark red tiles and a row of finely 
carved windows, seemed to the townsmen a thing unheard of, which 
from now on must become an integral part of their everyday life. 
Built by a Vezir, it looked as though only Vezirs could inhabit it. The 
whole building shone with a sense of grandeur, taste and luxury 
which bewildered them. 

About the same time all that formless mass of criss-cross beams 
and supports over the river began to be reduced m size and to thin 
out and through it emerged, more and more clearly, the bridge itself, 
of lovely Banja stone Individual workers and small groups were 
still employed on jobs which seemed to the people senseless and un- 
connected with the main construction, but by now it was clear even 
to the most doubting of the townsmen that out of all this work the 
bridge itself rose, to a single design and a faultless reckoning, over 
and above all these individual j’obs. First the lesser arches, both in 
height and m span, which were nearest to the banks appeared and 
then, one by one, the others were revealed until even the last of them 
was freed of its scaffolding, shovnng the whole bridge with all its 
eleven arches, perfect and wondrous in its beauty, like a new and 
strange feature in the townsmen’s eyes. 

Quick to respond to good or evil, the people of ViSegrad were now 
ashamed of their doubts and lack of belief. They no longer tried to 
conceal their wonder or to restrain their enthusiasm. Passage across 
the bridge was not yet permitted, but they collected on both banks, 
especially on the right one where the market-place and the greater 
part of the town were, and watched the workers passing across it 
and how they worked at smoothing the stones of the parapet and 
the raised seats of the kapia. The ViSegrad Turks watched this work 

64 



by another’s hand at another’s expense to which for a full five years 
they had given every sort of name and prophesied the worst of 
futures 

‘Ama. but I always told you/ a little Moslem hodja from Du§ce 
said excitedly and gleefully, ‘that nothing escapes the Sultan’s hand 
and that these men of sense would finally put up what they had in 
mind, but you kept saying, they won’t do this, or they can’t do that 
Now you see they have built it, and what a bridge they have built, 
what convenience and what beauty!’ 

Everyone approved his words, though no one really remembered 
when he said them, and they all knew very well that he too had ridi- 
culed the building and the man who had been building it All of them 
were sincerely enraptured. 

‘Eh, fellows, fellows, see what is rising here, in this town of ours!’ 

‘See how great is the Vezir’s power and foresight. Wherever he 
turns his eyes there is profit and blessing.’ 

‘Yet all this is nothing,’ added the gay and lively little hod]a, ‘there 
will be still finer things You see how they are grooming and decor- 
ating It like a horse for a fair ’ 

So they competed in expressions of enthusiasm, searching for new, 
better and more high-flown words of praise Only Ahmedaga Sheta, 
the rich gram merchant, a sullen man and a miser, still looked ask- 
ance at the work and those who praised it Tall, yellow and wizened, 
with black piercing eyes and thin lips that looked as if they were 
glued together, blinking in the fine September sun, he alone did not 
renounce his earlier opinion (for certain men are filled with un- 
reasonable hate and envy greater and stronger than anything that 
other men can imagine) To those who enthusiastically praised the 
greatness and permanence of the bridge, saying that it was stronger 
than any fortress, he retorted disdainfully 

‘Just wait till the floods, one of our real ViSegrad floods! Then you 
will see what will be left of if’ 

All of them argued bitterly with him and praised those who had 
been working on the bridge, especially Arif Beg, who with the smile 
of a great lord always on his lips had created such a work as though 
it had been child’s play But Sheta was firmly determined not to 
acknowledge anything of anyone: 

‘Yes, indeed. But if it had not been for Abidaga with his green staff 
and his tyranny and oppression, I ask you what could Old Baldie 
have done to finish the bridge despite his smile and his hands clasped 
behind his back?’ 

Offended at the universal enthusiasm as if it had been a personal 
insult, Sheta departed angrily to his shop, to sit in his usual place 

c 65 



where he could see neither sun nor bridge, nor hear the murmur and 
the movement of the excited throng* 

But Sheta was an isolated example The joy and enthusiasm of the 
citizens continued to grow and spread to the surrounding villages 
In the early days of October, Arif Beg ordered a great feast for the 
completion of the bridge This man of lordly manners, of unrelent- 
ing severity and strict honesty, who had spent all the monies con- 
fided to him for the purpose for which they w ere intended and had 
kept nothing for himself, was regarded by the people as the chief 
personage in this achievement They spoke more of him than of the 
Vezir himself So his feast turned out rich and bnlliant. 

The overseers and workers received gifts in money and clothing 
and the feast, in which anyone who wished could take part, lasted 
two days. The Vezir’s health was celebrated in meat and drink, in 
music, dancing and song; horse and foot races were arranged, and 
meat and sweetstuffs divided amongst the poor On the square which 
linked the bridge with the market-place, halva was cooked in caul- 
drons and served piping hot to the people. That hah a even got as far 
as the villages around the town and whoever ate it wished good 
health to the Vezir and long life to his buildings There were children 
who went back fourteen times to the cauldrons until the cooks, 
recognizing them, drove them away with their long wooden spoons 
One gipsy child died after eating too much hot halva 

Such things were long remembered and spoken about when tales 
were told of the creation of the bridge, the more so since, it seems, 
generous Vezirs and honest officials in later years died out and such 
feasts became rarer and rarer and at last completel> unknown, until 
in the end they passed into legend with the vilas, with Stoja and 
Ostoja and similar wonders 

While the feast lasted, and in general all those early days, the 
people crossed the bridge countless times from one bank to the 
other. The children rushed across while their elders walked slowly, 
deep in conversation or watching from every point the new views 
open to them from the bridge The helpless, the lame and the sick 
were brought on litters, for no one wanted to be left out or renounce 
their share in this wonder. Even the least of the townsmen felt as if 
his powers weie suddenly multiplied, as if some wonderful, super- 
human exploit w^as brought within the measure of his powers and 
within the limits of everyday life, as if besides the well-known ele- 
ments of earth, water and sky, one more were open to him, as if by 
some beneficent effort each one of them could suddenly realize one 
of his dearest desires, that ancient dream of man —to go over the 
water and to be master of space 


66 



The Turkish youths formed a round dance, a kolo, around the 
cauldrons of halva and then led the dance across the bridge, since it 
seemed to them that they were flying and not treading the solid 
earth. The dance wound round in circles about the kapia, the dancers 
beating their heels and stamping on the new flagstones as if to test 
the stoutness of the bridge. Around that winding, circling kolo of 
young bodies tirelessly leaping up and down in the same rhthym, the 
children played, running in and out between the dancing feet as if 
through a moving fence, standing m the centre of this kolo which 
was being danced for the first time in their lives on that bridge about 
which there had been so much talk for years, and even on the kapia, 
wherein, it was said, the unlucky Arab was imprisoned and showed 
himself of nights. Enjoying the young men’s kolo, they were none 
the less overcome by that fear which the Arab himself, when he had 
been alive and working on the bridge, had always instilled into the 
children of the town. On that high, new and strange bridge, it seemed 
to them that they had long forsaken their mothers and their homes 
and were wandering m lands of black people, marvellous buildings 
and strange dances, they trembled, but were unable to keep their 
thoughts from the Arab or to abandon the wonderful new kapia 
Only some fresh marvel could have distracted their attention. 

A certain Murat, known as ‘the dumb one’, a dim-witted youth 
from the noble family of Turkovid from Nezuke, who was often the 
butt of the town, suddenly climbed on to the stone parapet of the 
bridge There were shrieks from the children, startled cries from the 
older people, but the idiot, as though under a spell, with outstretched 
arms and head flung back, went along the narrow stones, step by 
step, as though he were not flying above the waters and the depths 
but taking part m a wonderful dance. Parallel with him walked a 
crew of urchins and nondescripts urging him on. On the farther side 
of the bridge his brother Aliaga waited for him and spanked him 
like a small child. 

Many people went far down the river, half an hour’s walk, to 
Kalata or Mezalm, and looked thence at the bridge, standing out 
white and delicate with its eleven arches, like a strange arabesque 
on the green waters amid the dark hills. 

About this time too a great white plaque was brought, with an 
engraved inscription, and built into the kapia, into that wall of red- 
dish stone which rose a good six feet from the parapet of the bridge 
The people gathered around the inscription and looked at it until 
some seminarist or koranic student was found who would, with 
more or less ability, for a coffee or a slice of water-melon or even 
for the pure love of Allah, read the inscription as best he could 

67 



A hundred times those days they spelt out the verses of the tarih, 
written by a certain Badi, which gave the name and title of the man 
who had made the bequest as well as the fortunate year 979 ah, that 
IS to say 1571 in the Christian calendar, when it was completed 
This Badi for good money wrote easy and sonorous verses and knew 
well how to foist them upon great men who erected or restored 
great buildings Those who knew him (and who were somewhat en- 
vious of him) used to say mockingly that the vault of heaven was 
the one and only building on which there was not a tanh from 
Badi’s pen. But he, despite all his fine earnings, w^as a poor famished 
devil continually at odds with that special sort of penury that often 
goes with verse writing like a kind of curse and which no amount of 
pay or salary can assuage. 

Because of their literary shortcomings, their thick heads and 
lively imaginations, each of the local scholars read and interpreted 
m his own way Badi’s tanh on the stone plaque which, as every 
text once revealed to the public, stood there, eternal on the eternal 
stone, always and irrevocably exposed to the looks and interpreta- 
tions of all men, wise or foolish, evil or well-intentioned Each one 
of these listeners remembered those lines which best suited his ear 
and his temperament. So what was there, engraved on the hard 
stone in the sight of all men, was repeated from mouth to mouth, 
often changed and corrupted into nonsense 
On the stone was written* 

‘See how Mehmed Pasha, the greatest among the w ise and great of his time, 
Mindful of the testament of his heart, by his care and toil 
Has built a bridge over the River Dnna, 

Over this water, deep and swift-flowmg 
His predecessors had not been able to put up anything 
1 pray that by the Mercy of Allah this bridge will be firm 
And that its existence will be passed in happiness 
And that it will never know sorrow 

For m his lifetime he poured out gold and silver for his bequest 
And no man can say that fortune has been wasted 
Which has been spent to such an end. 

Badi, who has seen this, when the bridge was completed gave this tanh 
“May Allah bless this building, this wonderful and beautiful br.dge” ’ 

But at last the people had eaten their fill and had wondered 
enough, walked enough and had listened to the verses of the inscrip- 
tion to their hearts’ content. The nine days’ wonder became a part 
of their everyday life and they crossed the bridge hurriedly, indif- 
ferently, anxiously, absent-mindedly as the tumultuous waters that 
flowed beneath it, as if it were only one of the countless roads that 


68 



they and their beasts trod beneath their feet. And the plaque with 
the inscription fell as silent as any other stone. 

Now the road from the left bank of the river was directly con- 
nected with that end of the road on the level space on the farther 
side. Gone was the dark, worm-eaten ferry with its eccentric ferry- 
man Far below the last arches of the bridge there remained that 
sandy rock and the steep banks equally difficult to ascend or descend 
and on which travellers had waited so despairingly and had called so 
vainly from one bank to the other. All that, together with the stormy 
river, had been surmounted as if by magic Men now passed far 
above, as if on wings, straight from one high bank to the other, along 
the wide strong bridge which was as firm and lasting as a mountain 
and which echoed under horses’ hooves as if it were made only of a 
thin plaque of stone. 

Gone too were those wooden water-mills and the hovels in which 
travellers in case of need had spent the night. In their place stood the 
firm and luxurious caravanserai which received the travellers who 
daily grew more numerous. They entered the han through a wide 
gateway of harmonious lines. On each side was a large window with 
a grille, not of iron but carved in a single block of limestone In the 
wide rectangular court was space for merchandise and baggage and 
around it were ranged the doors of thirty-six rooms. Behind, under 
the hillside, were the stables; to general amazement they too were 
of stone, as if built for the Sultan’s stud. There was not such another 
han from Sarajevo as far as Adrianople. In it every traveller might 
remain for a day and a night and receive, free of all cost, fire, shelter 
and water for himself, his servants and his beasts. 

All this, as the bridge itself, was the bequest of the Grand Vezir, 
Mehmed Pasha, who had been born more than sixty years before up 
there behind the mountains in the hillside village of Sokolovidi, and 
who in his childhood had been taken away with a crowd of other 
Serbian peasant boys as blood tribute to Stambul. The expenses for 
maintaining the caravanserai came from the vakuf, the religious en- 
dowment, which Mehmed Pasha had founded from the rich proper- 
ties seized in the newly-conquered territories of Hungary. 

Thus many troubles and inconveniences disappeared with the erec- 
tion of the bridge and the foundation of the han. There disappeared 
too that strange pain which the Vezir in his childhood had brought 
from Bosnia, from the ViSegrad ferry; those dark shooting pains 
which from time to time had seemed to cut his breast in two. But it 
was not fated that Mehmed Pasha should live without those pangs 
or long enjoy in his thoughts his ViSegrad bequest. Shortly after the 
final completion of the work, just when the caravanserai had begun 

69 



to work properly and the bridge to become known to the world, 
Mehmed Pasha once again felt the ‘black knife’ in his breast. And 
that for the last time 

One Friday, when he went with his suite to the mosque, a ragged 
and half-demented dervish approached him with his left hand 
stretched out for alms The Vezir turned and ordered a member of 
his suite to give them But the dervish then drew a heavy butcher’s 
knife from his right sleeve and violently stabbed the Vezir between 
the ribs His suite cut the dervish down, but the Vezir and his mur- 
derer breathed their last at the same moment The dead assassin, big, 
red-faced, lay with outstretched arms and legs as if still exalted by 
the impulse of his senseless blow, and beside him the Grand Vezir, 
with his robe unbuttoned on his chest and his turban flung far away. 
In the last years of his life he had grown thin and bowed, almost 
withered and coarser in feature And now with half-bared chest, bare- 
headed, bleeding, twisted and crumpled, he looked more like an 
ageing and battered peasant of Sokolovidi than the dignitary who 
until a short time before had administered the Turkish Empire. 

Months and months passed before the reports of the Vezir’ s assas- 
sination reached the town and then not as a clear and definite fact 
but as a secret whisper which might or might not have been true. For 
in the Turkish Empire it was not permitted to spread reports or to 
gossip about bad news and tragic events even when they had taken 
place in a nearby country, much less so when they took place on its 
own soil. Furthermore, in this case, it was in no one’s interest to talk 
much about the Grand Vezir’s death. The party of his adversaries, 
which had at last succeeded in overthrowing him, hoped that with 
his solemn funeral every livelier memory of him would also be 
buried And Mehmed Pasha’s kin, collaborators and supporters m 
Stambul had for the most part no objection to saying as little as pos- 
sible about the one-time Grand Vezir, for in this way their own 
chances of conciliating the new rulers and having their own past 
overlooked were increased 

But the two fine buildings on the Drina had already begun to exer- 
cise their influence on trade and communications, on the town of 
ViSegrad and the whole country around, and they went on doing so 
without regard for the living or the dead, for those who were rising 
or those who were falling. The town soon began to move downwards 
from the hillside to the water’s edge and expand and develop more 
and more about the bridge and around the caravanserai, which the 
people called the Stone Han. 

Thus was born the bridge with its kapia and so the town developed 
around it. After that, for a period of more than 300 years, its role in 


70 



the development of the town and its significance in the life of the 
townspeople was similar to that which we have described above. 
And the significance and substance of its existence were, so to speak, 
in its permanence Its shining line in the composition of the town 
did not change, any more than the outlines of the mountains against 
the sky In the changes and the quick burgeoning of human genera- 
tions, It remained as unchanged as the waters that flowed beneath it. 
It too grew old, naturally, but on a scale of time that was much 
greater not only than the span of human existence but also than the 
passing of a whole series of generations, so that its ageing could not 
be seen by human eye. Its life, though mortal in itself, resembled 
eternity for its end could not be perceived. 


71 



V 




T he first century passed, a time long and mortal for men and 
for many of their works, but insignificant for great build- 
ings, well conceived and firmly based, and the bridge with 
Its kapia and the nearby caravanserai stood and served as 
they had on their first day So too would a second century have 
passed over them, with its changes of seasons and human genera- 
tions, and the buildings would have lasted unchanged, but what time 
could not do, the unstable and unpredictable influence of faraway 
affairs did 

At that time, at the end of the seventeenth century, much was 
sung, spoken and whispered about Hungary, w^hence the Turkish 
armies after a hundred years of occupation w^ere about to withdraw 
Many Bosnian spahis (landowners w^ho held their lands on military 
tenure) had left their bones on Hungarian soil, defending their pro- 
perties m the battles preceding the withdrawal They were, it might 
be thought, the lucky ones for many of the other spahis returned as 
bare as a finger to their former Bosnian homeland, where there 
awaited them sparse soil and a straitened and penurious life after the 
rich lordliness and spaciousness of life on the great Hungarian 
estates The far off and uncertain echo of all this penetrated as far 
as Visegrad, but no one there could ever have imagined that distant” 
Hungary, a land of legend, could have any connection with the real, 
everyday life of the town. But with the Turkish retreat from 
Hungary there remained outside the frontiers of the Empire also 
those properties of the vakul (the religious endowment) from the 
revenues of which the caravanserai at ViSegrad was maintained. 

Both the people of the town and the travellers who had made use 
of the Stone Han for the past loo years had become accustomed to 
it and had never even considered by what means it had been main- 
tained, how the revenues had been founded, or from what source 
they came. All had made use of it, profiting by it as from a blessed 
and fertile roadside orchard which was both nobody’s and every- 
body’s; they repeated mechanically ‘peace to the Vezir’s soul’ but 


72 



did not stop to think that the Vezir had died loo years before, nor 
did they ask who now preserved and defended the imperial lands 
and the vakuf Who could ever have dreamt that the affairs of the 
woi Id were in such dependence upon one another and were linked 
together across so great a distance^ So at first no one in the town even 
noticed that the income of the ban had dried up. The attendants 
worked and the ban received travellers as before It was thought that 
the money for its upkeep had been delayed, as had happened before. 
But the months passed and even the years, and the money did not 
come The mute\elia (the administrator of the bequest), Dauthodja 
Mutavelic, for the people so called him after his appointment and the 
nickname stuck, applied to everyone he could think of, but received 
no reply The travellers had to look after their own needs and cleaned 
up the ban as much as they found necessary for their own conven- 
ience, but as each one went his way he left behind manure and dis- 
order for others to clean up and put right, even as he himself had 
tidied up whatever he had found dirty and in disorder. But after each 
traveller there remained ]ust a little more dirt than he himself had 
found. 

Dauthodja did all that he could to save the ban and keep it going. 
First he spent his own money and then he began to borrow from his 
relatives So he patched things up from year to year and kept the 
precious building in its former beauty To those who reproached him 
for ruining himself trying to preserve what could not be preserved, 
he replied that he was investing the money well for he gave it 
as a loan to God and that he, the muteveha, should be the last to 
desert this bequest which it seemed all others had deserted and 
abandoned. 

This wuse and godfearing, stubborn and obstinate man, whom the 
town long remembered, allowed no one to turn him from his vain 
effort Working devotedly, he had long become reconciled to the idea 
that our destiny on this earth lies in the struggle against decay, death 
and dissolution and that man must persevere in this struggle, even 
if it were completely in vain Sitting before the ban which was fall- 
ing into dissolution before his eyes, he replied to all those who tried 
to dissuade him or pitied him: 

There is no need to feel sorry for me For all of us die only once, 
whereas great men die twuce, once when they leave this world and a 
second time when their lifework disappears ’ 

When he was no longer able to pay day-labourers, he himself, old 
as he was, rooted up the weeds around the ban with his own hands 
and earned out mmoi repairs to the building So it was that death 
oveitook him one day when he had climbed up to repair a cracked 


73 



slate on the roof It was natural that a small town hodja could not 
maintain what a Grand Vezir had founded and which historical 
events had sentenced to disaster 

After Dauthodja’s death the han rapidly began to fall into rums 
Signs of decay appeared everywhere The gutters began to crack and 
to smell nasty, the loof to let in the rains, the doois and windows the 
winds, and the stables to be choked with manuie and weeds But 
from without the perfect building still looked unchanged, calm and 
indestructible in its beauty Those great arched windows on the 
ground floor, with grilles as delicate as lace cut in soft stone from a 
single block, looked peacefully out upon the world, but the simpler 
windows on the floor above already showed signs of poverty, neglect 
and internal disorder Little by little travellers began to avoid spend- 
ing the night in the town or, if they did, stayed at Ustamujid’s inn and 
paid for their night’s lodging They came more and more rarely to 
the caravanserai, even though they had not to pay but only to wish 
peace to the Vezir’s soul At last, when it become clear that the 
money would never come, everyone abandoned any pretence to care 
for the building, even the new muteveha, and the caravanserai stayed 
mute and deserted and fell into ruin and disrepair as do all buildings 
in which no one lives and which no one looks after. Wild grasses, 
weeds and thistles grew around it. Ravens nested on the roof and 
crows gathered there in dense black flocks 

Thus before its time and unexpectedly forsaken (all such things 
seem to happen unexpectedly) the Vezir's Stone Han began to disin- 
tegrate and fall to pieces 

But if the caravanserai, due to unusual circumstances, was forced 
to betray its mission and fall into ruin before its time, the bridge, 
which needed neither supervision nor maintenance, remained up- 
right and unchanged, linking the two banks and bearing across 
the river burdens dead and alive, as it had in the first days of 
Its existence. 

In its walls the birds nested and in the invisible cracks opened by 
time grew little tufts of grass. The yellowish porous stone of which 
the bndge was built hardened and contracted under the alternate in- 
fluence of moisture and of heat Eternally beaten by the winds which 
blew up and down the river valley, washed by the rains and dried by 
the fierce heats of summer, that stone in time turned white with the 
dull whiteness of parchment and shone in the twilight as if lighted 
from within The great and frequent floods, which were a heavy and 
continual menace to the town, were unable to do anything against 
it. They came every year, in spring and autumn, but all were not 
dangerous and fateful to the town beside the bridge Every year, once 


74 



or perhaps twice, the Drina rose in tumult and its muddied waters 
roared down, bearing through the arches of the bridge torn-up fences 
from the fields, uprooted stumps of trees, and daik earthy waters 
filled with leaves and branches from the riverside forests. The court- 
yards, gardens and storerooms of the houses nearest the river suf- 
fered. But everything ended there At irregular intervals of between 
twenty and thirty years came great floods which were afterwards 
remembered as one remembers insurrections or wars and were long 
used as a date from which to reckon time, to calculate the ages of 
citizens or the term of men’s lives (Tive or six years before the great 
flood . . ’ ‘During the great flood . 

After these great floods little movable property remained in that 
larger part of the town which lay on the low sandy strip between the 
Drina and the Rzav. Such a flood threw the whole town several years 
back. That generation spent the rest of its life m repairing the damage 
and the misfortune left by the ‘great flood'. To the end of their lives 
men, talking amongst themselves, recalled the terror of that autumn 
night when, in the chill ram and hellish wind, to the light of an occa- 
sional lantern, they would take out their goods, each from his own 
shop, and carry them to higher ground at Mejdan and there store 
them in the shops and warehouses of others When the next day, in 
the cloudy dawn, they looked down from the hillside on the town 
that they loved as strongly and as unconsciously as their own blood, 
and saw the darkened muddied waters rushing through the streets 
at roof level, they would try to guess whose house it was from which 
the foaming waters were noisily tearing the roof plank by plank and 
whose house still remained upright. 

On feast days and festivals and during the nights of Ramazan the 
grey-haired toilworn and anxious fathers of families would grow 
lively and talkative when the conversation turned to the greatest 
and hardest event of their lives, to the ‘great flood'. After the interval 
of fifteen or twenty years in which they had once more restored their 
fortunes and^ their homes, the flood was recalled as something great 
and terrible, near and dear to them; it was an intimate bond between 
the men of that generation who were still living, for nothing brings 
men closer together than a common misfortune happily overcome 
They felt themselves closely bound by the memory of that bygone 
disaster. They loved to recall memories of the hardest blow dealt 
them in their lives Their recollections were inexhaustible and they 
lepeated them continually, amplified by memory and repetition, 
they looked into one another's eyes, scelerotic and with yellowing 
whites, and saw there what the younger men could not even suspect 
They were carried away by their own words and drowned all their 


75 



present everyday troubles in the recollection of those greater ones 
which they had experienced so long ago 

Sitting in the warm rooms of their homes through which that 
flood had at one time passed, they recounted for the hundredth time 
with special enjoyment moving and tragic scenes And the more 
harrowing and painful the recollection the greater pleasure was there 
in recollecting it Seen through tobacco smoke or a glass of plum 
brandy, such scenes were often transformed by distance and imagi- 
nation, magnified and embellished, but not one of them ever noticed 
that this was so and would have sworn that it had in fact so hap- 
pened, for they all shared in this unconscious exaggeration. 

Thus there still lived a few old men w^ho remembered the last 'great 
flood’, about which they could still speak among themselves, repeat- 
ing to the younger men that there were no longer such disasters as 
in time past, but no such blessings and good living either. 

One of the very greatest of all these floods, which occurred in the 
second half of the eighteenth century, was especially long remem- 
bered and became the subject of countless tales. 

In that generation, as the older men later said, there was practi- 
cally no one who remembered the last great flood well None the 
less, on those rainy autumn days all were on the alert, knowing that 
‘the waters were hostile’. They emptied the warehouses closest to the 
river and wandered by night, by the light of lanterns, along the 
banks to listen to the roar of the waters, for the older men affirmed 
that they could tell by some special moaning of the waters whether 
the flood to come would be one of those ordinary ones which visited 
the town every year and caused minor damage, or whether it would 
be one of those, happily rare, which flooded both the bridge and the 
town and carried away everything that was not on firm foundations 
Next day the Drina did not rise and the town that night slept soundly, 
for men were tired out from lack of sleep and the excitement of the 
night before So it was that the waters deceived them That night the 
Rzav rose suddenly in a manner never before remembered and, red 
with mud, piled up at its confluence with the Drina Thus the two 
rivers overwhelmed the whole town 

Suljaga Osmanagid, one of the richest Turks in the town, then 
owned a thoroughbred Arab horse, a chestnut of great value and 
beauty As soon as the reinforced Drina began to rise, two hours be- 
fore it overflowed into the streets, this chestnut began to neigh and 
did not calm down until it had awakened the stable-boys and its 
owner and until they had taken it out of its stall which was beside the 
liver So the greater part of the inhabitants were awakened. Under 
the chill ram and the raging wind of the dark October night began a 

76 



flight and a saving of all that could be saved Half-dressed, the people 
waded up to their knees, carrying on their backs their wakened and 
complaining children At every moment dull crashes could be heard 
when the tree stumps which the Drina washed down from the 
flooded forests struck against the piers of the stone bridge 

Up at Mejdan, which the waters had never in any circumstances 
been able to reach, windows were all alight and flickering lanterns 
danced and quivered in the darkness All the houses were open to 
welcome those who had suffered and who came drenched and de- 
spondent with their children or their most precious belongmgs in 
their arms In the stables burned fires by which those unable to find 
a place in the houses could dry themselves. 

The leading merchants of the town, after they had placed the 
people in the houses, Turkish in Turkish homes and Christian and 
Jewish in Christian homes, gathered in the great ground-floor room 
of Hadji Ristid’s house There were the mukhtars (the Moslem 
leaders) and the kmets (the Christian headmen) of all the quarters, 
exhausted and wet to the skin, after having wakened and moved to 
safe quarters all their fellow citizens. Turks, Christians and Jews 
mingled together. The force of the elements and the weight of com- 
mon misfortune brought all these men together and bridged, at least 
for this one evening, the gulf that divided one faith from the other 
and, especially, the rayah from the Turks: Suljaga Osmanagid, Petar 
Bogdanovid, Mordo Papo, the big, taciturn and witty pansh priest 
Pop Mihailo, the fat and serious Mula Ismet, the ViSegrad hodja. and 
Elias Levi, known as Hadji Liacho, the Jewish rabbi well known even 
far beyond the town for his sound judgment and open nature. There 
were about ten others, from all three faiths. All were wet, pale, with 
clenched jaws, but outwardly calm; they sat and smoked and talked 
of what had been done to save the people and of what still remained 
to be done. Every moment younger people entered, streaming with 
water, who reported that everything living had been taken to 
Mejdan and to the fortress and put in houses there, Turkish and 
Christian, and that the waters down in the valley were still rising 
and invading street after street. 

As the night passed— and it passed slowly and seemed enormous, „ 
growing greater and greater like the waters in the valley — the leaders 
and rich men of the town began to warm themselves over coffee and 
plum brandy. A warm and close circle formed, like a new existence, 
created out of realities and yet itself unreal, which was not what it 
had been the day before nor what it would be the day after, but like 
a transient island in the flood of time. The conversation rose and 
strengthened and changed subject. They avoided speaking of past 


77 



floods known only m tales, but spoke of other things that had no 
connection with the waters and with the disaster which was at that 
moment taking place 

Desperate men make desperate efforts to appear calm and indif- 
ferent, almost casual By some tacit superstitious agreement and by 
the unwritten but sacred laws of patronal dignity and business order 
which have existed since olden times, each considered it his duty to 
make an effort and at that moment at least externally to conceal his 
fear and his anxieties in face of a disaster against which he could do 
nothing and to talk in a light tone about unrelated things 

But just as they began to grow calm in this conversation and to 
find in It a moment of forgetfulness, and thereby the lest and energy 
that they would need so greatly in the day to come, a man entered, 
bringing with him Kosta Baranac. That young merchant was wet 
through, muddied to the knees and dishevelled Dazzled by the light 
and confused by the numbers present, he looked at them as if in a 
dream, wiping the water fiom his face with his open hand. They 
made room for him and offeied him plum brandy, which he was un- 
able to raise to his lips. His whole body shivered A whisper ran 
through the room that he had tried to leap into the dark current that 
now flowed in a sandy torrent immediately above the spot where 
his barns and granaries had been. 

He was a young man, a recent settler, who had been brought to 
the town twenty years before as an apprentice, but had later mar- 
ried into a good family and become a merchant A peasant’s son, he 
had in the last few years by daring speculation and ruthless exploita- 
tion become rich, richer than many of the leading families of the 
town But he was not used to loss and was unable to support disaster 
That autumn he had bought large quantities of plums and walnuts, 
far beyond his real resources, reckoning that in wdnter he would be 
able to control the price of both dried plums and walnuts and so 
clear his debts and make a good profit, as he had done in previous 
years Now he was ruined 

Some time was to pass before the^pipression made on them by the 
sight of this ruined man could be dispelled, since all of them, some 
more some less, had been hit by this flood and only by inborn dignity 
had they been able to control themselves better than this upstart. 

The oldest and most prominent amongst them once again turned 
the conversation to casual matters They began to tell long stories of 
former times, which had no sort of connection with the disaster that 
had drawn them hither and surrounded them on all sides. 

They drank hot plum brandy and embarked on recollections of 
earlier days, about the eccentric characters of the town and every 

78 



kind of strange and unusual event Pop Mihailo and Hadji Liacho set 
the example. When the talk inevitably returned to earlier floods, 
they recalled only what was pleasant or comical, or at least seemed 
so after so many years, as if they wanted to cast a spell upon the 
waters and to defy the flood. 

They talked of Pop Jovan, who had once been parish priest here, 
who his panshioners had said was a good man but did not have *a 
lucky hand’ and that God had paid little heed to his prayers. 

At the time of the summer droughts which often luined the whole 
harvest. Pop Jovan had regularly led a procession and read the 
prayers for ram, but the only result was still greater drought and 
stifling heat When one autumn, after such a dry summer, the Drina 
began to rise and threaten a general flood. Pop Jovan had gone out 
to the banks, collected the people, and began to read a prayer that 
the ram should cease and the waters recede. Then a certain Jokid, a 
drunkard and ne’er-do-well, reckoning that God always did exactly 
the opposite from what Pop Jovan prayed for, shouted 

‘Not that one, father! Read the summer one, the one for ram; that 
will help the waters dry up ’ 

Fat and well-fed Ismet Effendi spoke of his predecessors and their 
struggles with the floods At one of these disasters long ago a pair of 
the ViSegrad hodjas went out to read a prayer to stay the disaster 
One of these hodjas had a house m the lower part of the town, the 
other one on the hillside where the waters could not reach The first 
to read was the hodja from the house on the hillside but the waters 
showed no sign of receding. Then a gipsy whose house was already 
half disintegrated m the waters shouted. 

‘Ama, fellows, let the hodja from the market-place, whose house 
is under water like ours, read. Can’t you see that that fellow” from 
the hill only reads with half his heart?’ 

Hadji Liacho, red-faced and smiling, with riotous tufts of white 
hair showing from under his unusually shallow fez, laughed at 
everything and said mockingly to the priest and hodja: 

‘Don’t talk too much about prayers against floods, or else our 
people might remember and drive all three of us out m this down- 
pour to read prayers for them.’ 

So they ranged story against story, all insignificant in themselves 
but each with a meaning for them and their generation though in- 
comprehensible to others; harmless recollections which evoked the 
monotonous, pleasant yet hard life of the townsmen, their own life. 
Though all these things had changed long ago they still remained 
closely bound up with their lives, although far from the drama of 
that night which had brought them together in that fantastic circle. 


79 



Thus the town’s leaders, accustomed from childhood to misfor- 
tunes of every kind, dominated the night of the great flood and found 
enough strength in themselves to jest in fate ol the disaster which 
had come upon them and thus mastered the misety that they were 
not able to avoid. 

But within themselves they were all greatly anxious and each of 
them, beneath all the jokes and laughter at misfortune, as if under 
a mask, turned over and over in his mind anxious thoughts and 
listened continually to the roar of the waters and the wind from the 
town below, where he had left all that he possessed The next day in 
the morning, after a night so spent, they looked down from Mejdan 
to the plain below where their houses were under w ater, some only 
half submerged and others covered to the root Then for the first and 
last time in their lives they saw their town w ithout a bridge The 
waters had risen a good thirty feet, so that the wide high arches 
were covered and the waters flowed over the roadway of the bridge 
which was hidden beneath them. Only that elevated part on which 
the kapia had been built showed above the surface of the troubled 
waters which flowed about it like a tiny w'aterfall 

But two days later the waters suddenly fell, the skies cleared and 
the sun broke through, as warm and nch as it does on some October 
days in this fertile land On that lovely day the town looked pitiable 
and terrible. The houses of the gipsies and the poorer folk on the 
banks were bent over in the direction of the current, many of them 
roofless and with the mud and clay of their walls washed away, dis- 
playing only a black trellis of willow branches so that they looked 
like skeletons. In the unfenced courtyards the houses of the i icher 
townsmen gaped open with staring windows; on each a line of red- 
dish mud showed how deeply it had been flooded Many stables had 
been washed away and granaries overturned In the lower shops 
there was mud to the knees, and in that mud all the goods that had 
not been taken away in time. In the streets were whole trees rooted 
up and brought there by the waters from no one knew where, and 
the swollen corpses of drowned animals 

That was their town, to which they must now descend and go on 
with their lives. But between the flooded banks, above the waters 
which still raged noisily, stood the bridge, white and unchanged in 
the sun. The waters now reached halfway up the piers and the bridge 
seemed as if it were in some other and deeper river than that which 
usually flowed beneath it. Along the parapet still remained deposits 
of mud which had now dried and were cracking in the sun, and on 
the kapia was piled up a whole heap of small branches and rubbish 
from the river. But all that in no way altered the appearance of the 

8o 



bridge, which alone had passed through the flood unaltered and 
emerged from it unscathed 

Every man in the town set to work at once to repair the damage 
and no one had time to think of the meaning of the victory of the 
bridge, but going about his affairs in that ill-fated town in which the 
waters had destroyed or at least damaged everything, he knew that 
there was something in his life that overcame every disaster and that 
the bridge, because of the strange harmony of its forms and the 
strong and invisible power of its foundations, would emerge from 
every test unchanged and imperishable. 

The winter which then began was a hard one. Everything that had 
been stored in courtyards and barns, wood, wheat, hay, the flood had 
carried away; houses, stables and fences had to be repaired and fresh 
goods had to be obtained on credit to replace those which had been 
destroyed in warehouses and shops Kosta Baranac, who had suf- 
fered more than any, because of his overbold speculations with 
plums, did not outlive the winter, but died of mortification and 
shame He left his young children almost penniless and a number of 
small but widespread debts in all the villages. He was recalled in the 
memory of the town as a man who had overtaxed his strength. 

But by the next summer the recollection of the great flood had 
begun to pass into the memory of the older men, where it would live 
long, while the younger people sat singing and talking on the smooth 
white stone kapia over the water which flowed far below them and 
accompanied their songs with its murmurings Forgetfulness heals 
everything and song is the most beautiful manner of forgetting, for 
in song man feels only what he loves. 

So, on the kapia, between the skies, the river and the hills, genera- 
tion after generation learnt not to mourn overmuch what the 
troubled waters had borne away They entered there into the un- 
conscious philosophy of the town, that life was an incomprehensible 
marvel, since it was incessantly wasted and spent, yet none the less 
It lasted and endured ‘like the bridge on the Drina’. 


8i 



VI 




m s well as floods there were also other onslaughts on the bridge 
/% and Its kapia They were caused by the development of events 
and the course of human conflicts; but they could do even 
A less than the unchained waters to harm the bridge or 
change it permanently. 

At the beginning of last century Serbia rose m revolt This town on 
the very frontier of Bosnia and Serbia had always been in close con- 
nection and permanent touch with everything that took place in 
Serbia and grew with it ‘like a nail and its finger'. Nothing that hap- 
pened in the Vi§egrad district— drought, sickness, oppression or re- 
volt— could be a matter of indifference to those in the Uzice district, 
and vice versa But at first the affair seemed distant and insignificant, 
distant, because it was taking place on the farther side ot the Bel- 
grade pashaluk, insignificant since rumours of revolt were no sort of 
novelty. Ever since the Empire had existed there had been such 
rumours, for there is no rule without revolts and conspiracies, even 
as there is no property without work and worry. But m time the re- 
volt in Serbia began to affect the life of the whole Bosnian pashaluk 
more and more, and especially the life of this town which was only 
an hour’s march from the frontier. 

As the struggle in Serbia grew, more and more was demanded from 
the Bosnian Turks. They were asked to send men to the army and to 
contribute to its equipment and supply. The army and the commis- 
sariat sent into Serbia passed to a great extent through the town That 
brought in its tram expenses and inconveniences and dangers not 
only for the Turks, but especially for the Serbs who were suspected, 
persecuted and fined in those years more than ever before. Finally, 
one summer, the revolt spread to these districts. Making a detour 
around Uzice, the insurgents came to within two hours’ march of 
the town. There, at Veletovo, they destroyed Lufti Beg’s fortified 
farmhouse by cannon fire and burnt a number of Turkish houses at 
CmiCe. 

There were in the town both Turks and Serbs who swore that they 

82 



had heard with their own ears the rumbling of ‘Karageorge’s gun* 
(naturally with completely opposite feelings) But even if it were a ' 
matter for doubt whether the echo of the Serb insurrectionists’ gun 
could be heard as far as the town, for a man often thmks that he can 
hear what he is afraid of or what he hopes for, there could be no 
doubt about the fires which the insurgents lit by night on the bare 
and rocky crest of Panos between Veletovo and Gostilje, on which 
the huge isolated pines could be counted from the town with the 
naked eye. Both Turks and Serbs saw the fires clearly and looked at 
them attentively, although both pretended not to have noticed them. 
From darkened windows and from the shadows of dense gardens, 
both took careful note of when and where they were lighted and ex- 
tinguished The Serbian women crossed themselves m the darkness 
and wept from inexplicable emotion, but in their tears they saw re- 
flected those fires of insurrection even as those ghostly flames which 
had once fallen upon Radisav’s grave and which their ancestors al- 
most three centuries before had also seen through their tears from 
that same Mejdan 

Those flickering and uneven flames, scattered along the dark back- 
ground of the summer night, wherein skies and mountains merged, 
seemed to the Serbs like some new constellation in which they 
eagerly read bold presentiments and, shivering, guessed at their fate 
and at coming events For the Turks they were the first waves of a 
sea of fire which was spreading there m Serbia and which, even as 
they watched, splashed agamst the mountains above the town. In 
those summer nights the wishes and the prayers of both circled 
around those flames, but in different directions. The Serbs prayed to 
God that these saving flames, like those which they had always car- 
ried in their hearts and carefully concealed, should spread to these 
mountains, while the Turks prayed to Allah to halt their progress 
and extinguish them, to frustrate the seditious designs of the infidel 
and restore the old order and the peace of the true faith. The nights 
were filled with prudent and passionate whisperings in which pulsed 
invisible waves of the most danng dreams and wishes, the most im- 
probable thoughts and plans which triumphed and broke in the blue 
^kness overhead. Next day at dawn, Turks and Serbs went out to 
work and met one another with dull and expressionless faces, 
greeted one another and talked together with those hundred or so 
commonplace words of provincial courtesy which had from times 
past circulated in the town and passed from one to another like 
counterfeit coin which none the less makes communication both 
possible and easy 

When, soon after the feast of St Elias, the fires disappeared from 

83 



Panes and the revolt was pushed back from the Uzice district, once 
again neither the one side nor the other showed their feelings And it 
would really be difficult to say what weie the tiue feelings of either 
side* The Turks weie gratified that the revolt w as now far aw'ay from 
them and hoped that it would be entirely extinguished and would 
end there where all godless and evil enterprises ended But none the 
less that gratification was incomplete and overshadowed for it was 
hard to forget so close a danger Many of them for long after saw in 
their dreams those fantastic insurgent files like a showier of sparks 
on all the hills around the town or heard Karageorge^s gun, not as a 
distant echo but as a devastating cannonade which brought rum 
with It. The Serbs, however, as was natural, remained disillusioned 
and disappointed after the withdrawal of the fires on Panos but in the 
depth of their hearts, in that true and ultimate depth which is re- 
vealed to no one, there remained the memory of what had taken 
place and the consciousness that what has once been can be again; 
there remained too hope, a senseless hope, that great asset of the 
downtrodden For those who rule and must oppress in order to rule 
must work according to reason; and if, earned away by their pas- 
sions or driven by an adversary, they go beyond the limits of reason- 
able action, they start down the slippery slope and thereby reveal the 
commencement of their own downfall Whereas those who are 
downtrodden and exploited make equal use of then reason and un- 
reason for they are but two different kinds of arms m the continual 
struggle, now underground, now open, against the oppressor 
In those times the importance of the bridge as the one sure link 
between the Bosnian pashaluk and Serbia was greatly increased. 
There was now a permanent military force in the town, which was 
not disbanded even m the long periods of truce, and which guarded 
the bridge over the Drina. To carry out this task as well as possible 
with the minimum of labour, the soldiers began to erect a wooden 
blockhouse in the centre of the bridge, a monstrous erection crude in 
shape, position, and the material of which it was made (but all the 
armies of the world put up, for their own special aims and momen- 
tary needs, buildings such as this which, later on, from the point of 
view of normal peaceful life appear both absurd and incomprehen- 
sible). It was a real two-storeyed house, clumsy and hideous, made of 
rough beams and unplaned planks, with a free passage like a tunnel 
beneath it. The blockhouse was raised up and rested on stout beams, 
so that it straddled the bridge and was supported only at its two 
ends on the kapia, one on the left and the other on the right terrace. 
Beneath it there was a free passage for carts, horses and pedestrians, 
but from above, from the floor on which the guards slept and to 

84 



which led an uncovered stairway, it was possible to inspect all who 
passed, to examine papers and baggage and, at any moment, should 
the need arise, to stop them. 

That indeed altered the appearance of the bridge. The lovely 
kapia was concealed by the wooden structure which squatted over 
It with Its wooden beams like some sort of gigantic bird 

The day the blockhouse was ready it still smelt strongly of 
resinous wood and steps echoed in its emptiness. The guards at once 
took up their quarters By dawn on the first day the blockhouse, like 
a trap, already claimed its first victim. 

In the low and rosy sun of early morning there collected beneath 
it the soldiers and a few armed townsmen, Turks, who mounted 
guard around the town by night and so helped the army In the midst 
of this group stood a little old man, a vagabond religious pilgrim, 
something between a monk and a beggar, but mild and peaceful, 
somehow clean and sweet m his poverty, easy and smiling despite 
his white hair and lined face. He was an eccentric old fellow named 
Jelisije from Cajnice For many years he had been wandering about, 
always mild, solemn and smiling, visiting churches and monasteries, 
religious meetings and festivals, he prayed, did penance and fasted. 
Earlier the Turkish authorities had paid no attention to him and re- 
garded him as a feeble-minded and religious man, letting him go 
where he would and say what he liked But now, due to the insurrec- 
tion in Serbia, new times had come and harsher measures prevailed. 
A few Turkish families had arrived in the town whose property had 
been destroyed by the insurgents; they spread hatred and called for 
vengeance Guards were everywhere Supervision was intensified, the 
local Turks were anxious, filled with rancour and ill-will and looked 
on everyone bloodthirstily and with suspicion 

The old man had been travelling along the road from Rogatica and 
by bad luck was the first traveller on the day when the blockhouse 
had been completed and the first guards had taken up their posts 
there. In fact he had chosen the very worst time, for the day had not 
fully dawned He bore before him, as a man carries a lighted candle, 
a sort of thick stick decorated with strange signs and letters The 
blockhouse swallowed him up like a spider does a fly. They inter- 
rogated him curtly They demanded who he was, what he was doing 
and whence he came, and commanded him to explain the decora- 
tions and writing on his staff He replied freely and openly, even to 
questions that had not been asked him, as if speaking before the Last 
Judgment of God and not before a group of evil Turks. He said that 
he was no one and nothing, a traveller on this earth, a transient in a 
transient world, a shadow in the sun, but that he passed his few and 

8s 



short days m prayer and in going from monastery to monastery, until 
he had visited all the holy places, all the bequests and the tombs of 
the Serbian tsars and nobles As to the signs and letters on his staff 
they represented the times of Serbian freedom and greatness, past 
and future For, said the old man, smiling gently and timidly, the day 
of resurrection was coming soon and, judging from what he had 
read in books and from what might be seen on the earth and in the 
skies, it was now quite near The kingdom was reborn, redeemed by 
trials and founded on truth 

‘I know that it is not pleasant, gentlemen, for you to have to listen 
to these things and that I should not even speak of them before you, 
but you have stopped me and told me that I should tell you the whole 
truth, wherever it may lead God is truth and God is One! And now, 
I beg you, let me go on my way for I am due today at Banja, at the 
Monastery of the Holy Trinity/ 

The interpreter Shefko translated, struggling in vain to find in his 
poor knowledge of the Turkish language equivalents for abstract 
ideas. The Captain of the Guard, a sickly Anatolian, still only half 
awake, listened to the confused and disconnected words of the trans- 
lator and from time to time threw a glance at the old man who, with- 
out fear or evil thoughts, looked back at him and confirmed with 
his eyes that everything was just as the interpreter had said, though 
he knew not a word of Turkish. Somewhere in the back of his mind 
It was clear to the Captain that this man was some sort of half-witted 
infidel dervish, a good-natured and harmless madman And in the 
old man's staff, which they had already cut through in several 
places thinking that it was hollow and that messages were concealed 
in It, they found nothing. But in Shefko's translation the old man’s 
words seemed suspicious, smelled of politics and seditious intent 
The Captain, for his part, would have let this poor dim-witted 
creature go his way, but the rest of the soldiers and civil guards had 
gathered together there and were listening to the interrogation. 
There was his sergeant Tahir, an evil man, sullen and rheumy-eyed, 
who had already several times slandered him to his chief and 
accused him of lack of care and severity. Then too there was that 
Shefko, who in his translation was obviously putting the worst pos- 
sible construction on the old man’s exalted phrases and who loved to 
stick his nose into everything and carry tales even when there was 
nothing in them, and was ever ready to give or to confirm an evil 
report. Then too there were those Turks from the town, volunteers, 
who went their rounds sullenly and self-importantly, arrested sus- 
picious characters and interfered needlessly in his official duties 
They were all there And all of them, these days, were as if drunk 

86 



wdth bitterness, from desire for vengeance and longed to punish and 
to kill whomsoever they could, since they could not punish or kill 
those whom they wished. He did not understand them, nor did he 
approve of them, but he saw that they were all agreed that the block- 
house must have its victim this first morning. He suspected that be- 
cause of their intoxication of bitterness he might be the one to suffer 
if he opposed their wishes The thought that he might have un- 
pleasantness because of this mad old fool seemed to him intolerable. 
And the old man with his tales of the Serbian Empire would not in 
any case get very far among the Turks of the district who, these days, 
were like a swarm of angry bees. Let the troubled waters carry him 
away, even as they had brought him here . . 

As soon as the old man had been bound and the Captain was pre- 
paring to go into the town so as not to have to watch the execution, 
some Turkish policemen and a few civilians appeared, leading a 
poorly dressed Seibian youth. His clothing was torn and his face and 
hands scratched This was a certain Mile, a poor devil from Lijesko, 
who lived quite alone in a water-mill at Osojnica. He might have 
been nineteen at most, strong and bursting with health. 

That morning before sunrise Mile placed some barley in the mill 
to be ground and then opened the big millrace and went into the 
forest to cut wood. He brandished his axe and cut the soft alder 
branches like straws He enjoyed the morning freshness and the ease 
with which the wood fell before his axe His own movements were 
a pleasure to him. But his axe was sharp and the thin wood too frail 
for the force that was in him Something within him swelled his 
breast and drove him to shout aloud at each movement. His cries be- 
came more and more frequent and connected. Mile who, like all men 
of Lijesko, had no ear and no idea of how to sing, sang and shouted 
in the thick and shady forest Without thinking of anything and for- 
getting where he was, he began to sing what he had heard others 
singing 

At that time, when Serbia had risen in revolt, the people had made 
of the old song: 

‘When Ahbeg was a young beg 
A maiden bore his standard . ’ 

a new song 

‘When Karageorge was a young beg 
A maiden bore his standard . . ’ 

In that great and strange struggle, which had been waged in 
Bosnia for centuries between two faiths, for land and power and 
their own conception of life and order, the adversaries had taken 
from each other not only women, horses and arms but also songs. 

87 



Many a verse passed from one to the other as the most precious of 
booty 

This song, then, was one recentlv sung among the Serbs, but 
stealthily and m secret, m closed houses, at family feasts or in dis- 
tant pastures where a Turk might not set foot for > ears at a time and 
where a man, at the price of loneliness and poverty in the wilds, 
might live as he wished and sing what he liked And it w^as just this 
song that Mile, the mill attendant, had thought fit to sing in the forest 
just below the road along ^^hlch the Turks of Olujac and Orahovac 
passed on their way to the maiket in the town 

Dawn had just touched the crests of the mountains and there, m 
that shady place, it was still quite dark Mile w^as all w^et wuth the 
dew but warm from a good night’s sleep, hot bread and w'ork He 
brandished his axe and struck the slender alder near its root but the 
tree only bent and bow cd like a young bride w^ho kisses the hand of 
the *kum* who leads her to marriage The aldei was sprinkled with 
cold dew like a fine ram and remained bent, for it could not fall be- 
cause of the thickness of the greenery around Then he cut off the 
green branches wdth his axe in one hand as if play mg While he was 
doing this he sang at the top of his voice pronouncing certain of the 
words wuth enjoyment ‘Karageorge* was something vague but 
strong and daring; 'maiden’ and 'standard' were also things unknown 
to him, but things w^hich m some way answered to his most intimate 
dreams; to have a giil of his own and to bear a standard In any case 
there was a sweetness in pronouncing such wwds And all the 
strength within him drove him on to pronounce them clearly and 
countless times over His utterance of them seemed to renew his 
strength making him repeat them still more loudly. 

So sang Mile at the break of day until he had cut and trimmed the 
branches for which he had come Then he went down the w et slope 
dragging his fresh burden behind him. There were some Turks m 
front of the mill They had tethered their horses and were waiting 
for someone. There were ten of them He felt himself again, as he 
had been before he had set out to get the wood, clumsy, ragged and 
embarrassed, without Karageorge before his eyes, without a girl or a 
standard near him. The Turks waited until he had put down his axe, 
then fell on him from all sides and after a short struggle bound him 
with a halter and took him to the town. On their way they beat him 
and kicked him in the groin, asking him where was his Karageorge 
now and saying evil words about his girl and his standard. 

Under the blockhouse on the kapia where they had just bound the 
half-witted old man some of the town ne'er-do-wells had joined the 
soldiers even though it had only just dawned Amongst them were 

88 



a number of refugees from Serbia whose homes there had been burnt 
down. All were armed and wore a solemn expression as though a 
great event or a decisive battle were in question Their emotion rose 
with the rising sun. The sun rose rapidly, amid shining mists down 
there on the skyline above GoleS The Turks waited for the terrified 
youth as if he had been a revolutionary leader, though he was ragged 
and miserable and had been brought from the left bank of the Drina 
where there was no insurrection. 

The Turks from Olujac and Orahovac, exasperated by the arro- 
gance which they were unable to believe was not intentional, bore 
witness that the young man had been singing in a provocative man- 
ner beside the road songs about Karageorge and the infidel fighters. 
He, frightened, in wet rags, scratched and beaten, his eyes filled with 
emotion that made him seem to squint, watched the Captain as if he 
were hoping for salvation from him. As he came rarely to the town 
he had not known that a blockhouse was being erected on the bridge; 
therefore everything seemed to him strange and unreal as if he had 
wandered m his sleep into a strange town filled with evil and dan- 
gerous men Stuttering and keeping his eyes on the ground, he swore 
that he had never sung anything and that he had never struck a Turk, 
that he was a poor man, who looked after the water-mill, that he was 
cutting wood and did not know why he had been brought here. He 
shivered from fear and was really unable to understand what had 
happened and how, after that exalted mood down there by the fresh- 
ness of the stream, he had suddenly found himself bound and beaten 
here on the kapia, the centre of all interest, before so many people 
to whom he had to answer. He had himself quite forgotten that he 
had ever sung even the most innocent of songs. 

But the Turks stood by their words; that he had been singing in- 
surrectionist songs at the moment they had been passing and that he 
had resisted them when they wanted to bind him. Each of them con- 
firmed this on oath to the Captain who interrogated them: 

‘Do you swear by Allah?' 

T swear by Allah * 

‘Is that the truth?’ 

‘That is the truth.’ 

So thrice repeated. Then they put the young man beside Jelisije 
and went to waken the headsman who, it seemed, slept very 
soundly. The old man looked at the youth who, confused and 
ashamed, blinked since he was not used to being the centre of 
attention in broad daylight on the bndge surrounded by so many 
people. 

‘What is your name?’ the old man asked. 

89 



‘Mile; said the youth humbly, as if he were still repl>mg to the 
Turkish questions 

‘Mile, my son, let us kiss/ and the old man leant his grey head on 
Mile's shoulder ‘Let us kiss and make the sign of the Cross In the 
Name of the Father and of the Son and of the Holy Ghost In the 
Name of the Father and of the Son and of the Hoiy Ghost Amen ' 
So he crossed himself and the youth m words only, for their hands 
were bound, quickly, for the executioner had already ai rived 
The headsman, who was one of the soldiers, rapidly finished his 
task and the fiist comers, who descended the hills because of market 
day and went across the bridge, could see the two heads placed on 
fresh stakes on the blockhouse and a bloodstained place, sprinkled 
wuth gravel and smoothed down, on the bridge where they had been 
beheaded 

Thus the blockhouse began its work 

From that day onwards all who were suspected or guilty of insur- 
rection, whether caught on the bridge itself or somewhere on the 
frontier, were brought to the kapia Once there they rarely got away 
alive. The heads of those connected with the revolt, or simply those 
who were unlucky, were exposed on stakes placed around the block- 
house and their bodies thrown from the bridge into the Dnna if no 
one appeared to ransom the headless corpse 
The revolt, wath shorter or longer periods of truce, lasted for 
years and m the course ot those years the number of those thrown 
into the river to drift down to ‘look for another, better and more 
reasonable land’ was very great Chance had decreed, that chance 
that overwhelms the weak and unmindful, that these two simple 
men, this pair from the mass of unlearned, poverty-stricken and 
innocent, should head the procession, since it is often such men who 
are first caught up in the whirlpool of great events and whom this 
whirlpool irresistibly attracts and sucks down. Thus the youth Mile 
and the old man Jelisije, beheaded at the same moment and in the 
same place, united as brothers, first decorated with their heads the 
military blockhouse on the kapia, which from then onwards, as long 
as the revolt lasted, was practically never without such decoration. 
So these two, whom no one before then had ever seen or heard of, 
remained together m memory, a memory clearer and most lasting 
than that of so many other, more important, victims. 

So the kapia disappeared under this bloodstained blockhouse of ill 
repute and with it vanished also all meetings, conversations, songs 
and enjoyment. Even the Turks passed that way unwillingly while 
only those Serbs who were forced to crossed the bridge hastily and 
with lowered heads. 


90 



Around the wooden blockhouse, whose planks with time became 
first grey and then black, was quickly created that atmosphere that 
always surrounds buildings in permanent use by the army. The 
soldiers' washing hung from the beams and rubbish was tipped from 
the windows into the Drina, dirty water and all the refuse and filth 
of barrack life On the white central pier of the bridge remained long 
dirty streaks which could be seen from afar. 

The job of headsman was for long always carried out by the same 
soldier He was a fat and dark-skinned Anatolian with dull yellowish 
eyes and negroid lips in a greasy and earthen-coloured face, who 
seemed always to be smiling, with the smile of a well-nourished and 
good-humoured man He was called Hairuddin and was soon known 
to the whole town and even beyond the frontier. He carried out his 
duties with satisfaction and conscientiousness; and certainly he was 
exceptionally swift and skilful at them The townsmen used to say 
that he had a lighter hand than Mushan the town barber. Both old 
and young knew him, at least by name, and that name excited awe 
and curiosity at the same time On sunny days he would sit or lie all 
day long on the bridge in the shade under the wooden blockhouse. 
From time to time he would rise to inspect the heads on the stakes, 
like a market-gardener his melons Then he would lie down again on 
his plank in the shade, yawning and stretching himself, heavy, 
rheumy-eyed and good-humoured, like an ageing sheepdog. At the 
end of the bridge, behind the wall, the children gathered inquisitively 
and watched him timidly. 

But when his work was in question, Hairuddin was alert and pre- 
cise to the minutest detail. He disliked anyone to interfere with his 
work, a thing which happened more and more often as the insurrec- 
tion developed When the insurgents burnt some of the villages 
above the town, the anger of the Turks passed all measure. Not only 
did they arrest all insurgents and spies, or those whom they con- 
sidered such, and brought them to the Captain on the bridge, but in 
their rancour they even wanted to take part in the execution of the 
sentence. 

Thus one day dawn revealed the head of the ViSegrad parish priest, 
that same Pop Mihailo who had found strength to joke with the 
hodja and the rabbi on the night of the great flood. In the general 
fury against the Serbs he had been killed, even though innocent, and 
the gipsy children stuck a cigar in his dead mouth. 

Hairuddin strongly disapproved of such actions and prevented 
them whenever he was able. 

When one day the fat Anatolian died unexpectedly of anthrax a 
new headsman, in truth far less skilful, continued his work and went 


91 



on doing so for several years, and until the revolt in Serbia had died 
down there were always two or three heads exposed on the kapia. 
In such times people quickly grow hardened and insensible They 
soon became so accustomed to them that they passed them by in- 
differently and paid no more heed to them, so that they did not at 
once notice when they ceased to be exhibited 

When the situation m Serbia and on the frontier died down, the 
blockhouse lost its importance and its reason for existence But the 
guard went on sleeping there, although the crossing of the bridge 
had long been free and without supervision In every army things 
change slowly and in the Turkish army more slowly than in any 
other. And so it would have remained for God alone knows how 
long had not a fire broken out one night because of a forgotten 
candle The blockhouse was made of resinous planks and was still 
warm after the heat of the day It burnt to its foundations, that is to 
say down to the flagstones of the kapia. 

The excited people of the town watched the huge blaze which lit 
up not only the bridge but also the mountains around, and was re- 
flected m wavering red light on the surface of the river. When morn- 
ing broke, the bridge again appeared in its former shape freed from 
the clumsy wooden monstrosity which had for years concealed its 
kapia. The white stones were tarnished and sooty, but the rains and 
snows soon washed them clean again Thus nothing remained of the 
blockhouse and the bloody events connected with it save a few bitter 
memories which paled and finally disappeared with that generation, 
and one oak beam which had not been burnt as it was fixed into the 
stone steps of the kapia 

So the kapia once again became for the town what it had formerly 
been. On the left terrace as one came from the town a coffee brewer 
once again lit his brazier and set out his utensils. Only the fountain 
had suffered, for the snake's head from which the water had flowed 
had been crushed. The people once again began to dally on the sola 
and pass the time there in conversation, in business deals or in 
drowsy time-wasting. On summer nights the young men sang there 
in groups or sat there solitary suppressing their love-yearning or 
giving way to that vague desire to go out into the distant world to do 
great deeds and take part in great events which so often torments 
young people brought up in a narrow milieu. After a score or so of 
years a new generation grew up which did not even remember the 
deformed wooden carcass of the blockhouse or the harsh cries of the 
guard stopping travellers by night, or Hairuddin or the exposed heads 
which he had cut off with such professional skill. Only some of the 
old women, driving away the urchins who came to steal their 


92 



peaches, would shout m loud and angry curses: 

'May God send Hairuddm to cut your hair for you! May your 
mother recognize your head on the kapiaV 
But the children who ran away over the fences could not under- 
stand the real sense of these curses, though they knew, naturally, 
that they meant nothing favourable. 

Thus the generations renewed themselves beside the bridge and 
the bridge shook from itself, like dust, all the traces which transient 
human events had left on it and remained, when all was over, un- 
changed and unchangeable 


93 



VII 




T ime passed over the bridge by years and decades Those 
were the few decades about the middle of the nineteenth 
century in which the Turkish Empire was consumed by a 
slow fever Measured by the eye of a contemporary, those 
years seemed comparatively peaceful and serene, although they had 
their shaie of anxieties and fears and knew droughts and floods and 
epidemics and all manner of exciting events. Only all these things 
came m their own time, in short spasms amid long lulls. 

The border between the two pashaluks of Bosnia and Belgrade, 
which passed just above the town, began in those years to become 
ever more sharply defined and to take on the appearance and signifi- 
cance of a state frontier That changed the conditions of life for the 
whole district and for the town also, influenced trade and communi- 
cations, and the mutual relations of Turks and Serbs 
The older Turks frowned and blinked in incredulity, as if they 
wished to drive away this unpleasant apparition They threatened 
and discussed and then for months at a time forgot all about the 
matter, until harsh reality would once again remind them and alarm 
them once more. 

Thus, one spring day one of the Turks from Veletovo, up there on 
the frontier, sat on the kapia and with deep emotion told the leading 
Turks gathered there what had been happening at Veletovo 
Some time in the winter, the man from Veletovo said, there had 
appeared above their village the ill-famed Jovan Mi^ic, the serdar of 
Ruyan, who had come from Arilje with armed men and begun to 
inspect and mark out the frontier. When they asked him what he 
intended to do and why he was there, he replied arrogantly that he 
had to give account to no one, least of all to Bosnian renegades, but 
if they really wanted to know he had been sent there by the 
Prince MiloS to find out where the frontier was to run and how much 
was to be included in Serbia. 

‘We thought,’ said the man from Veletovo, ‘that the Vlach was 
drunk and did not know what he was saying, for we have long known 


94 



him as a bandit and a rascal So we refused to let him stay and then 
forgot all about him. But not more than two months later he came 
again, this time with a whole company of Milos* soldiers and a dele- 
gate of the Sultan, a soft pale fellow from Stambul We could not 
believe our eyes But the delegate confirmed everything He lowered 
his eyes in shame, but he confirmed. Thus, he said, it had been 
ordered by Imperial decree that Milos should administer Serbia in 
the Sultan’s name and that the frontier should be marked out, to 
know exactly to what point his authority stretched When the dele- 
gate’s men began to drive in stakes along the crest below Tetrebica, 
Micic came and pulled them up and threw them aside The mad 
Vlach (may the dogs eat his flesh!) flew at the delegate, shouted at 
him as if he were a subordinate and threatened him with death 
That, he said, was not the frontier, the frontier had been fixed by the 
Sultan and the Russian Tsar who had given a ferman to Prince Milos 
it now ran along the Lim down as far as the Visegrad bridge and 
thence down the Drina, thus all this land is part of Seibia This too, 
he said, is only for a certain time, later it will have to be advanced 
The delegate had great trouble m convincing him and then they fixed 
the frontier above Veletovo And there it remains, at least for the 
present Only from then on we have been filled with doubt and a 
sort of fear, so that we do not know what to do or where to turn 
We have discussed all this with the people of Uzice, but they too do 
not know what has happened nor what to expect And old Hadji- 
Zuko who has twice been to Mecca and is now more than ninety 
years old says that before a generation has passed the Turkish fron- 
tier will be withdrawn right to the Black Sea, fifteen days* march 
away.* 

The leading Turks of Visegrad listened to the man from Veletovo. 
They seemed calm to all outward appearance, but inwardly they 
were shaken and confused. They squirmed unintentionally at his 
words and caught hold of the stone seat with their hands, as if some 
powerful and invisible force were shaking the bridge beneath them. 
Then, mastering themselves, they sought words to lessen and 
diminish the importance of this event. 

They did not like unfavourable news or heavy thoughts or serious 
and despondent conversations on the kapia, but they could see for 
themselves that this boded no good; nor could they deny what the 
man from Veletovo had said or find words to calm and reassure him 
So they could scarcely wait for the peasant who had brought this 
unpleasant news to return to his village in the mountains. That, 
naturally, would not lessen the anxiety but it would remove it far 
from them. And when in fact the man went away, they were only 


95 



too pleased to be able to return to their usual habits, and to go on 
sitting peacefully on the kapia without conversations which made 
life disagreeable and the future teinfying, and to leave it to time to 
soften and ease the weight of the events which had taken place over 
there behind the mountains 

Time did its work Life went on, to all appearances unchanged 
More than thirty years passed since that conversation on the kapia. 
But those stakes which the Sultan's delegate and the serdar of Ruyan 
had planted struck root and brought forth fruit, late-ripening but 
bitter to the Turks The Turks had now to abandon even the last 
towns m Serbia One summer day the bridge at Visegrad was bur- 
dened with a pitiable procession of refugees from Uzice 

It was on one of those hot days with long pleasant twilights on the 
kapia when the Turks from the market-place filled both the terraces 
over the water On such days melons were brought there on donkey 
back The ripe canteloupes and water-melons had been cooled all day 
long and in the early evening people would buy and eat them on the 
soia. Usually two of them would bet whether the inside of a certain 
water-melon were red or white Then they would cut it open and 
whoever lost paid for it and they would eat it together, with talk and 
loud jokes. 

The day's warmth still beat up from the stone terraces but with 
the twilight there was a cool refreshing air from the water The 
middle of the river shone, and near the banks under the willows it 
turned a shadowy dull green All the hills around were reddened by 
the sunset, some strongly and others scarcely touched Above them, 
filling the whole south-western part of that amphitheatre which 
could be seen from the kapia were summer mists of continually 
changing colour These mists are among the most beautiful sights to 
be seen in summer on the kapia As soon as the daylight grows strong 
and the sun leaps up, they appear behind the mountains like thick 
white silvery-grey masses, creating fantastic landscapes, irregular 
cupolas and countless strange buildings. They remain thus all day 
long, heavy and unmoving above the hills surrounding the town 
which swelters in the sun. The Turks who in early evening sat on the 
kapia had those mists always before their eyes like white silken 
Imperial tents which in their imagination evoked vague shapes of 
wars and forays and pictures of strange and immeasurable power 
and luxury, till darkness extinguished and dispersed them and the 
skies created fresh magic from the stars and moonlight. 

Never could the wonderful and exceptional beauty of the kapia 
be better felt than at that hour on such summer days, A man was 
then as if in a magic swing; he swung over the earth and the waters 

96 



and flew in the skies, yet was firmly and surely linked with the town 
and his own white house there on the bank with its plum orchard 
about it. With the solace of coffee and tobacco, many of those 
simple citizens, who owned little more than those houses and the 
few shops in the market-place, felt at such times the richness of the 
world and the illimitability of God’s gifts Such a bridge, lovely and 
strong, could offer all this to men and would continue to offer it for 
centuries to come. 

This was just such an evening, an evening filled with chatter and 
laughter and ]okes among themselves and the passers-by 

The spnghthest and loudest jokes centred on a short but powerful 
young man of strange appearance. This was Salko Corkan, One-eyed 
Salko 

Salko was the son of a gipsy woman and some Anatolian soldier or 
officer who had at some time been stationed in the town and had 
left it before this unwanted son had been born. Shortly afterwards, 
his mother too had died and the child had grown up without anyone 
of his own. The whole town fed him, he belonged to everybody and 
nobody He did odd jobs about the shops and houses, carried out 
tasks which no one else would do, cleaned the cesspools and street 
channels, and buried anything that had died or had been brought 
down by the waters He had never had a house or occupation of his 
own He ate whatever he happened to find, still standing or walking 
about, slept in attics, and dressed in parti-coloured rags given him by 
others. While still a child he had lost his left eye. Eccentric, good- 
humoured, merry and a drunkard, he often worked for the towns- 
men for a word or a joke instead of pay. 

Around Salko had gathered a number of merchants’ sons, young 
men who laughed at him and played crude jokes on him. 

The air smelt of fresh melons and roasting coffee. From the great 
flagstones, still warm from the day’s heat, and sprinkled with water, 
rose moist and scented the special smell of the kapia which filled 
men with freedom from care and evoked lively fancies. 

It was the moment between day and night. The sun had set but the 
great star which rose over Moljevnik had not yet appeared. In such 
a moment, when even the most ordinary thing took on the appear- 
ance of a vision filled with majesty, terror and special meaning, the 
first refugees from Uiice appeared on the bridge. 

The men were for the most part on foot, dusty and bowed, while 
the women wrapped in their veils were balanced on small horses 
with small children tied to the saddle-bags or to boxes. Now and 
again a more important man rode a better horse, but with lowered 
head and at a funereal pace, revealing even more clearly the misfor- 

D 97 



tune which had driven them hither Some of them were leading a 
single goat on a short halter. Others carried lambs m their laps. All 
were silent; even the children did not cry. All that could be heard was 
the beat of horseshoes and footsteps and the monotonous chinking 
of wooden and copper vessels on the overloaded horses 

The appearance of this overtired and destitute procession 
dampened the gaiety on the kapia. The older people remained seated 
on the stone benches, while the younger stood up and formed living 
walls on both sides of the kapia and the procession passed between 
them Some of the townsmen only looked compassionately at the 
refugees and remained silent, while others greeted them with 
*merhaba\ tried to stop them and offer them something They paid 
no attention to the offers and scarcely responded to the greetings, 
but hurried on to reach their post for the night at Okoliste while it 
was still light. 

In all there were about i2o families More than loo families were 
going on to Sarajevo where there was a chance of being settled, while 
fifteen were to stay in the town; they were for the most part those 
who had relatives there. 

One only of these dog-tired men, poor m appearance and appar- 
ently alone, stopped for a moment on the kapia, drank his fill of 
water and accepted an offered cigar. He was white all over from the 
dust of the road, his eyes shone as if in fever and he was unable to 
keep his glance fixed on any single object. Vigorously puffing out 
smoke, he looked around him with those shining disagreeable 
glances, without replying to the timid and humble questions of indi- 
viduals. He only wiped his long moustaches, thanked them curtly 
and with that bitterness which overtiredness and a feeling of being 
outcast leaves in a man he muttered a few words looking at them 
with one of those sudden unseeing glances. 

‘You sit here at your ease and do not know what is happening be- 
hind StaniSevac. Here we are fleeing into Turkish lands, but where 
are you to flee when, together with us, your turn will come? None 
of you knows and none of you ever thinks of it.’ 

He suddenly ceased. Even the little he said was much for those who 
till then had been so carefree, and yet little enough for his own bitter- 
ness which would not allow him to stay silent yet at the same time 
prevented him from expressing himself clearly It was he himself 
who cut short the heavy silence by saying farewell and hurrying 
away to catch up with the rest of the procession. All stood up to 
shout good wishes after him. 

All that evening the mood on the kapia remained heavy. All were 
silent and downcast Even Salko sat dumb and motionless on one of 


98 



the stone steps surrounded by the husks of the water-melons he had 
eaten for a bet. Depressed and silent he sat there with downcast 
looks, absent-mindedly, as though he were not looking at the stone 
before him but at something far distant which he could scarcely 
perceive. The people began to disperse earlier than usual 

But next day everything was as it had always been, for the towns- 
men did not like to remember evil and did not worry about the 
future; in their blood was the conviction that real life consists of 
calm periods and that it would be mad and vain to spoil them by 
looking for some other, firmer and more lasting life that did not 
exist. 

In those twenty-five years in the middle of the nineteenth century 
the plague raged twice at Sarajevo and the cholera once. When this 
happened the town kept regulations which, according to tradition, 
had been given by Mohammed himself to the faithful for their 
guidance in the event of an epidemic: ‘While the Pestilence rages m 
some place do not go there, for you may become infected, and if you 
are already in the place where it rages then do not depart from that 
place lest you infect others * But since men do not observe even the 
most salutory of regulations, even when they derive from the 
Apostle of God himself, if not forced to do so by ‘the power of the 
authorities', then the authorities on the occasion of every ‘plague' 
limited or completely stopped all travel and postal communications. 
Then life on the kapia changed its aspect The people of the town, 
busy or at leisure, thoughtful or singing, disappeared, and on the 
empty sofa, as in times of war or revolution, once again sat a guard 
of several gendarmes. They stopped all travellers coming from the 
direction of Sarajevo and waved them back with their rifles or 
shouted loudly to them to retreat. The post they accepted from the 
messenger but with every measure of precaution. A small fire of 
‘aromatic woods' was lit on the kapia and produced an abundant 
white smoke. The gendarmes took each individual letter in a pair 
of tongs and passed it through this smoke. Only such ‘purified’ 
letters were sent onward Goods they did not accept at all. But their 
mam task was not with letters but with living men. Every day a few 
arrived, travellers, merchants, bearers of news, tramps. A gendarme 
awaited them at the entry to the bridge and from a distance signalled 
with his hand that they might not go farther. The traveller would 
halt, but begin to argue, to justify himself and explain his case Each 
of them considered that it was absolutely necessary to let him into 
the town and each of them swore that he was healthy and had had 
no connection with the cholera which was there somewhere in 
Sarajevo. During these explanations the travellers would edge little 


99 



by little halfway across the bridge and approach the kapia There, 
other gendarmes would take their part in the conversation and as 
they talked at several paces distance they all shouted loudly and 
waved their arms Those gendarmes also joined in who sat all day 
on the kapia sipping plum brandy and eating garlic; their service gave 
them this right for it was believed that both these were good anti- 
dotes against infection, and they made abundant use of their 
privilege. 

Many a traveller would grow tired of pleading with and trying to 
convince the gendarmes and would return downcast, his work un- 
finished, along the Okoliste road But some were more persistent and 
persevering and remained there on the kapia hoping for a moment 
of weakness or inattention or some mad and lucky chance If it so 
happened that the leader of the town gendarmes, Salko Hedo, were 
there, then there was no likelihood that the traveller would achieve 
anything Hedo was that true conscientious official who does not 
really see or hear whomever he talks to, and who only considers him 
in so far as it is necessary to find the place for him set out by the 
regulations in force Until he had done this he was deaf and blind and 
when he had done it he become dumb as well. In vain the traveller 
would implore or flatter; 

'Salik-Aga, I am healthy ’ 

‘Well then, go in health whence you came Get along, out of my 
sight. . .’ 

There was no arguing with Hedo But if some of the younger 
gendarmes were alone, then something might still be done. The 
longer the traveller stood on the bridge and the more he shouted and 
talked with them, told all his troubles, why he had set out and all 
the problems of his life, the more personal and familiar he seemed 
to become and less and less like a man who might have cholera In 
the end, one of the gendarmes would offer to take a message for him 
to whomever he wished in the town This was the first step towards 
yielding. But the traveller knew that the message would never be 
delivered for the gendarmes, always suffering from a hangover or 
half drunk as they were, remembered things with difficulty and de- 
livered messages inside out. Therefore he went on indefinitely with 
I his conversation, implored, offered bnbes, called upon God and his 
'soul All this he did until the gendarme whom he had marked down 
as the most lenient remained alone on the bndge. Then the business 
was finished somehow or other. The soulful gendarme would turn 
his face to the raised wall as if to read the ancient inscription on it, 
with his hands behind his back and the palm of his right hand ex- 
tended. The persevenng traveller would put the agreed sum of 



money into the gendarme’s palm, glance right and left, and then 
slide across the other half of the bridge and become lost in the town 
The gendarme went back to his post, chewed a head of garlic and 
washed it down with plum brandy This filled him with a certain 
gay and carefree resolution and gave him fresh strength to keep vigil 
and guard the town from cholera. 

But misfortunes do not last forever (this they have in common 
with ]oys) but pass away or are at least diminished and become lost 
in oblivion Life on the kapia always renews itself despite everything 
and the bridge does not change with the years or with the centuries 
or with the most painful turns m human affairs. All these pass over it, 
even as the unquiet waters pass beneath its smooth and perfect 
arches. 


101 



VIII 




I t was not only the wars, pestilences and migrations of the times 
which broke against the bridge and interrupted life on the kapia. 
There were also other exceptional events which gave their name 
to the year in which they took place and were long remembered 

Left and right of the kapia in both directions, the stone parapet of 
the bridge had long become smooth and somewhat darker than the 
rest. For hundreds of years the peasants had rested their burdens on 
it when crossing the bridge, or idlers had leant shoulders and elbows 
upon It in conversation while waiting for others or when, solitary 
and leaning on their elbows, they looked in the depths below them 
at the waters as they went foaming swiftly past, always new and yet 
always the same. 

But never had so many idle and inquisitive people leant on the 
parapet and watched the surface of the water, as if to read in it the 
answer to some riddle, as in the last days of August that year. The 
water was clouded by the rains though it was only towards the end 
of summer. In the eddies below the arches a white foam formed, 
which moved in circles with twigs, small branches and rubbish. But 
the leisurely and leaning townsmen were not really looking at the 
waters which they had always known and which had nothing to tell 
them; but on the surface of the water and in their own conversations 
they searched for some sort of explanation for themselves and tried 
to find there some visible trace of an obscure and cruel destiny 
which, in those days, had troubled and surprised them. 

About that time an unusual thing had taken place on the kapia 
which would long be remembered and which was not likely to hap- 
pen again as long as the bridge and the town on the Drina existed. It 
had excited and shaken the townspeople and the story of it had 
passed beyond the town itself, to other places and districts, to be- 
come a legend. 

This was, in fact, a tale of two V^egrad hamlets, Velje Lug and 
Nezuke. These two hamlets lay at the extreme ends of that amphi- 


102 



theatre formed about the town by the dark mountains and their 
green foothills. 

The great village of Strazi5te on the north-eastern side of the valley 
was the nearest to the town Its houses, fields and gardens were scat- 
tered over several foothills and embowered in the valleys between 
them On the rounded flank of one of these hills lay about fifteen 
houses, buried in plum orchards and surrounded on all sides by 
fields. This was the hamlet of Velje Lug, a peaceful, rich and beauti- 
ful Turkish settlement on the slopes. The hamlet belonged to the vil- 
lage of Straziste, but it was nearer to the town than to its own village 
centre, for the men of Velje Lug could walk down to the market- 
place m half an hour, had their shops there and did business in the 
town like the ordinary townsmen. Between them and the townsmen 
there was indeed little or no difference save perhaps that their pro- 
perties were more solid and lasting for they stood on the firm earth, 
not subject to floods, and the men there were more modest and did 
not have the bad habits of the town. Velje Lug had good soil, pure 
water and handsome people. 

A branch of the ViSegrad family of Osmanagic lived there. But 
even though those in the town were richer and more numerous, it 
was generally considered that they had ‘degenerated* and that the 
real Osmanagids were those of Velje Lug whence the family had 
come They were a fine race of men, sensitive and proud of their 
origin Their house, the largest in the district, showing up white on 
the hillside just below the crest of the hill, turned towards the south- 
west; It was always freshly whitewashed, with a roof of blackened 
thatch and fifteen glazed windows. Their house could be seen from 
afar and was the first to catch the eye of a traveller coming to Vise- 
grad and the last that he saw on leaving it. The last rays of the setting 
sun behind the LijeStan ridge rested there and shone on the white 
and shining face of this house The townsmen were long accustomed 
to look at It from the kapia in the early evening and see how the 
setting sun was reflected from the Osmanagid windows and how the 
light left them one after the other. As the sun set and the town was 
in shadow its last rays, falling on one of the windows, as it broke 
through the clouds, would shine for a few moments longer like a 
huge red star over the darkened town. 

Also well known and esteemed in the town was the head of that 
house, Avdaga Osmanagid, a bold and fiery man in private life as in 
business. He had a shop in the market, a low twilit room in which 
maize, dried plums or pinecones lay scattered over planks and 
plaited mats Avdaga only did a wholesale trade, therefore his shop 
was not open every day, but regularly on market days and through- 


103 



out the week according to the needs of business In it was always 
one of Avdaga’s sons, while he himself usually sat on a bench before 
It. There he chatted with customers or acquaintances. He was a big 
and imposing man, ruddy in appearance, but with pure white beard 
and moustaches His voice was harsh and throaty For years he had 
suffered cruelly from asthma Whenever he grew excited m conver- 
sation and raised his voice, and that was a frequent occurrence, he 
would suddenly choke, his neck tendons stand out, his face grow 
red and his eyes fill with tears, while his chest creaked, wheezed and 
echoed like a storm on the hills When the fit of choking had passed, 
he would pull himself together, take a deep breath and go on with 
the conversation where he had left off, only in a changed thin voice 
He was known in the town and the surroundings as a man of harsh 
words, but generous and brave. So he was in everything, even in 
business, though often to his own hurt. Often by a bold word he 
would reduce or raise the price of plums or maize even when this 
was not to his own advantage, only to spite some avaricious peasant 
or rapacious merchant. His word was universally listened to and 
accepted in the market-place, though it was known that he was often 
hasty and personal in his judgments When Avdaga came down from 
Velje Lug and sat before his shop he was rarely alone, for men liked 
to listen to his talk and wanted to hear his opinion. He was always 
open and lively, ready to speak out and defend what others con- 
sidered was best passed over in silence His asthma and attacks of 
heavy coughing would interrupt his conversation at any moment, 
but for a wonder this did not spoil it but made it seem the more con- 
vincing and his whole manner of expressing himself had a sort of 
heavy and painful dignity, which it was not easy to resist. 

Avdaga had five married sons and an only daughter, who was the 
youngest of his children and just ripe for marriage. She was called 
Fata and it was known of her that she was exceptionally beautiful 
and the very image of her father. The whole town and to some extent 
even the whole district discussed the question of her marriage. It has 
always been the case with us that at least one girl in every generation 
passes into legend and song because of her beauty, her qualities and 
her nobility. So she was in those few years the goal of all desires and 
, the inaccessible example; imagination flared up at mention of her 
name and she was surrounded by the enthusiasm of the men and the 
envy of the women. She was one of those outstanding persons set 
apart by nature and raised to dangerous heights. 

This daughter of Avdaga resembled her father not only in face and 
appearance but also in quickness of wit and the gift of words. The 
youths who, at weddings or meetings, sought to win her by cheap 


104 



flattery or embarrass her by daring jests, knew this well. Her wit was 
no less than her beauty Therefore, in the song about Fata the daugh- 
ter of Avdaga (songs about such exceptional beings spring up of 
themselves spontaneously) it was sung 

Thou art wise as thou art lovely. 

Lovely Fata Avdagma 

So they sang and spoke in the town, but there were very few who 
had the courage to ask for the hand of the girl from Velje Lug. And 
when they had one and all been rejected, a sort of vacuum was 
created about Fata, an enchanted circle, made of hatred and envy, 
of unacknowledged desires and of malicious expectation, such a 
circle as always surrounds beings with exceptional gifts and an ex- 
ceptional destiny. Such persons, of whom much is said and sung, are 
rapidly borne away by that especial destiny of theirs and leave be- 
hind them, instead of a life fulfilled, a song or a story. 

Thus it often happens amongst us that a girl who is much spoken 
of remains for that very reason without suitors and *sits out*, where- 
as girls who in no way measure up to her marry quickly and easily. 
This was not destined for Fata, for a suitor was found who had the 
audacity to desire her and the skill and endurance to attain his ends 

In that irregular circle formed by the Visegrad valley, exactly on 
the opposite side from Velje Lug, lay the hamlet of Nezuke. 

Above the bridge, not quite an hour's walk upstream, amid that 
circle of dark mountains whence, as from a wall, the Drina breaks 
out in a sudden curve, there was a narrow strip of good and fertile 
land on the stony river bank. This was formed by the deposits 
brought down by the river and by the torrents which came down 
from the precipitous slopes of the Butkovo Rocks. On it were fields 
and gardens and, above them, steep meadows with sparse grass 
which lost themselves on the slopes in rugged stone crops and dark 
undergrowth. The whole hamlet was the property of the Hamzid 
family, who were also known by the name of Turkovii. On one half 
lived five or six families of serfs and on the other were the houses 
of the Hamzid brothers, with Mustajbeg Hamzid at their head. The 
hamlet was remote and exposed, without sun but also without wind, 
richer in fruit and hay than in wheat. Surrounded and shut in on all 
sides by steep hills, the greater part of the day it was in shadow and 
in silence, so that every call of the shepherds and every movement 
of the cowbells was heard as a loud and repeated echo from the hills. 
One path only led to it from ViSegrad. When one crossed the bridge 
coming from the town and left the main road which turned to the 



right down river, one came upon a narrow stone track to the left 
across a patch of waste and stony ground up the Dnna along the 
water’s edge, like a white selvedge on the dark slopes which ran 
down to the river A man on horse or on foot going along that path, 
when seen from the bridge above, seemed as if he were going along a 
narrow tree trunk between the water and the stone, and his reflection 
could be seen following him in the calm green waters 
That was the path which led from the tow n to Nezuke; and from 
Nezuke there was no w^ay on, for there was nowhere to go. Above 
the houses, in the steep slopes overgrown with sparse forest, two 
deep white w^atercourses had been cut, up which the shepherds 
climbed when they took the cattle to their mountain pastures. 

There was the great w'hite house of the eldest Hamzid, Mustajbeg 
It was in no way smaller than the Osmanagid house at Velje Lug, but 
it was different in that it was completely invisible in that hollow 
alongside the Drina Around it grew fifteen tall poplars in a semi- 
circle, whose murmur and movement gave life to that spot so shut 
in and difficult of access. Below this house were the smaller and 
humbler houses of the remaining pair of Hamzid brothers All the 
Hamzids had many children and all were fair-skinned, tall and 
slender, taciturn and reserved, but well able to hold their own in 
business, united and active in all their affairs Like all the richer 
people at Velje Lug, they too had their shops in the town where they 
brought for sale everything that they produced at Nezuke. At all 
times of the year, they and their serfs swarmed and climbed like 
ants along that narrow stony track beside the Dnna bringing pro- 
duce to the town or returning, their business concluded, with money 
in their pockets, to their invisible village among the hills 
Mustajbeg Hamzid’s great white house awaited the visitor as a 
pleasant surprise at the end of that stony track that seemed as if it 
led nowhere Mustajbeg had four daughters and one son. Nail This 
Nail-beg of Nezuke, only son of a noble family, was among the first 
to cast an eye on Fata of Velje Lug. He had admired her beauty at 
some wedding or other through a half-opened door, outside which a 
group of young men had been hanging like a bunch of grapes. When 
he next had the chance of seeing her, surrounded by a group of her 
friends, he had essayed a daring jest: 

‘May God and Mustajbeg give you the name of young bride!* 

Fata gave a stifled giggle. 

‘Do not laugh,’ said the excited youth through the narrow open- 
ing of the door, ‘even that marvel will take place one day * 

‘It will indeed, when Velje Lug comes down to Nezuke!’ replied 
the girl with another laugh and a proud movement of her body, such 

io6 



as only women like her and of her age can make, and which said 
more than her words and her laugh. 

It IS thus that those beings especially gifted by nature often pro- 
voke their destiny, boldly and thoughtlessly. Her reply to young 
Hamzid was repeated from mouth to mouth, as was everything else 
that she said or did 

But the Hamzids were not men to be put off or discouraged at the 
first difficulty Even when it was a question of minor matters, they 
did not come to a conclusion hastily so how much less in such a 
question as this. An attempt made through some relations in the 
town had no better success. But then old Mustajbeg Hamzid took 
into his own hands the matter of his son’s marriage. He had always 
had common business dealings with Osmanagid Avdaga had recently 
had some serious losses, due to his explosive and proud character, 
and Mustajbeg had helped him and supported him as only good mer- 
chants can help and support one another in difficult moments; 
simply, naturally and without unnecessary words. 

In these cool half-lit shops and on the smooth stone benches be- 
fore them were settled not only matters of commercial honour but 
also human destinies What happened there between Avdaga 
Osmanagid and Mustajbeg Hamzid, how did Mustajbeg come to ask 
for the hand of Fata for his only son Nail, and why did the proud and 
upright Avdaga ‘give’ the girl? No one will ever know. No one will 
ever know either exactly how the matter was thrashed out up there 
at Velje Lug between the father and his lovely only daughter. There 
could, naturally, be no question of any opposition on her part. One 
look filled with pained surprise and that proud and inborn movement 
of her whole body, and then mute submission to her father’s wishes, 
as it was and still is everywhere and always amongst us. As if in a 
dream, she began to air, to complete and to arrange her trousseau. 

Nor did a single word from Nezuke filter out to the outer world 
The prudent Hamzids did not ask other men to confirm their suc- 
cesses in empty words. They had achieved their wish and, as always, 
were content with their success There was no need of anyone else 
to share in their satisfaction, even as they had never asked for sym- 
pathy in their failures and their misfortunes 

But none the less people talked of this widely and unthinkingly, 
as is the habit of men. It was told throughout the town and the 
country around that the Hamzife had got what they wanted, and 
that the lovely, proud and clever daughter of Avdaga. for whom no 
suitor good enough had been found in all Bosnia, had been outplayed 
and tamed; that none the less ‘Velje Lug would come to Nezuke’ even 
though Fata had publicly proclaimed that it would not For people 


107 



love to talk about the downfall and humiliation of those who have 
been exalted too much or have flown too high. 

For a month the people savoured the event and drank in tales of 
Fata's humiliation like sweet water. For a month they made prepara- 
tions at Nezuke and at Velje Lug. 

For a month Fata worked with her fnends, her relations and her 
servants on her trousseau The girls sang. She too sang. She even 
found strength to do that. And she heard herself singing, though she 
still thought her own thoughts For with every stroke of her needle 
she told herself that neither she nor her needlework would ever see 
Nezuke She never forgot this for an instant Only, thus working and 
thus singing, it seemed to her that it was a long way from Velje Lug 
to Nezuke and that a month was a long time At night it was the 
same At night when, with the excuse that she had some work to 
finish, she remained alone there opened before her a world rich and 
full of light, of joyful and unlimited change 

At Velje Lug the nights were warm and fresh The stars seemed 
low' and dancing, as though bound together by a white shimmering 
radiance Standing before her window. Fata looked out at the night. 
Through all her body she felt a calm strength, overflowing and 
sweet, and every part of her body seemed a special source of strength 
and joy, her legs, her hips, her arms, her neck and above all her 
breasts. Her breasts, full and large but firm, touched the frame of the 
window with their nipples And in that place she felt the whole hill- 
side with all that was on it, houses, outbuildings, fields, breathing 
warmly, deeply, rising and falling with the shining heavens and the 
expanse of the night With that breathing the wooden frame of the 
window rose and fell, touching the tips of her breasts, leaving them 
once more for some vast distance and then returning once again to 
touch them, then rising and falling again and again. 

Yes, the world was great, the world was limitless even by day 
when the valley of Vi§egrad quivered in the heat and one could al- 
most hear the wheat ripening and when the white town was strung 
out along the green river, framed by the straight lines of the bridge 
and the dark mountains But at night, only at night, the skies grew 
alive and burst open into infinity and the power of that world where 
a living being is lost, and has no longer the sense of what he is, where 
he is going or what he wishes or what he must do. Only there one 
lived truly, serenely and for long; in that space there were no longer 
words that bound one tragically for one’s whole life, no longer fate- 
ful promises or situations from which one could not escape, with the 
brief time that flows and flows onward inexorably, with death or 
shame as the only outcome. Yes, in that space it was not as it is in 

io8 



everyday life, where what has once been said remains irrevocable 
and what has been promised inescapable. There everything was free, 
endless, nameless and mute. 

Then, from somewhere below her, as from afar, could be heard a 
heavy, deep and stifled sound: 

A-a-a-aah, kkkh . . . A-a-a-aaah . . . kkkkh!’ 

Down on the ground floor Avdaga was struggling with his nightly 
attack of coughing. 

She heard the sound and could see her father clearly, almost as if 
he were there before her, as he sat and smoked, sleepless and tor- 
mented by his cough. She could see his big brown eyes, as well known 
as a dear landscape, eyes which were just like her own, save that they 
were shadowed by old age and bathed in a tearful yet laughing 
shimmer, eyes in which for the first time she had seen the inevitabi- 
lity of her fate on that day she was told that she had been promised 
to Hamzid and that she must finish her preparations within a month. 

'Kkha, kkha, kkha, Aaaaah!* 

That ecstasy of a moment before at the beauty of the night and the 
greatness of the world was suddenly extinguished That perfumed 
breath of the earth ceased. The girl’s breasts tightened in a brief 
spasm. The stars and the expanse disappeared. Only fate, her cruel 
and irrevocable fate on the eve of its realization was being completed 
and accomplished as the time passed in the stillness of that immobi- 
lity and that void which remained beyond the world 

The sound of coughing echoed from the floor below 

Yes, she both saw and heard him as if he were standing beside her. 
That was her own dear, powerful, only father with whom she had 
felt herself to be one, indivisibly and sweetly, ever since she had been 
conscious of her own existence. She felt that heavy shattering cough 
as if It had been in her own breast. In truth it had been that mouth 
that had said yes where her own had said no. But she was at one with 
him in everything, even in this. That yes of his she felt as if it were 
her own (even as she felt too her own no). Therefore her fate was 
cruel, unusual, immediate, and therefore she saw no escape from 
it and could see none, for none existed. But one thing she knew. 
Because of her father’s yes, which bound her as much as her own 
no, she would have to appear before the kadi with Mustajbeg’s son, 
for it was inconceivable to think that Avdaga Osmanagid did not 
keep his word. But she knew too, equally well, that after the cere- 
mony her feet would never take her to Nezuke, for that would mean 
that she had not kept her own word. That too was inconceivable, for 
that too was the word of an Osmanagid. There, on that point of no 
return, between her no and her father’s yes, between Velje Lug and 


109 



Nezuke, somewhere in that most inescapable impasse, she must find 
a way out That was all she thought of now No longer the expanses 
of the great rich world, not even the whole route from Velje Lug to 
Nezuke, but only that short and pitiful little scrap of road which led 
from the courthouse m which the kadi would marry her to Mustaj- 
beg’s son, as far as the end of the bridge where the stony slope led 
down to the narrow track which led to Nezuke and on which, she 
knew for a certainty, she would never set foot Her thoughts flew 
incessantly up and down that little scrap of road, from one end to 
the other, like a shuttle through the weave They would fly from the 
courthouse, across the market-place to the end of the bridge, to halt 
there as before an impassable abyss, and then back across the bridge, 
across the market-place to the courthouse Always thus: back and 
forward, forward and back' There her destiny was woven 

And those thoughts which could neither remain still nor were 
able to find a way out, more and more often halted at the kapia, on 
that lovely and shining sofa, where the townspeople sat in conversa- 
tion and the young men sang, and beneath which roared the deep 
swift green waters of the river Then, horrified at such a way of 
escape, they would fly once again, as if under a curse, from one end 
of the journey to the other and, without finding any other solution, 
would stop there once again on the kapia Every night her thoughts 
more and more often halted there and remained there longer. The 
very thought of that day, when in fact and not only in her thoughts 
she must go along that way and find her way out before she reached 
the end of the bridge, brought with it all the terror of death or the 
horror of a life of shame. It seemed to her, helpless and forsaken, 
that the very terror of that thought must remove or at least postpone 
that day. 

But the days passed, neither fast nor slow, but regular and fateful 
and with them came at last the day of the wedding. 

On that last Thursday in August (that was the fateful day) the 
Hamzids came on horseback for the girl. Covered with a heavy new 
black veil, as if under a suit of armour. Fata was seated on a horse 
and led into the town. Meanwhile, in the courtyard, horses were 
loaded with the chests containing her trousseau. The marriage was 
announced in the courthouse before the kadi. So was kept the word 
by which Avdaga gave his daughter to Mustajbeg’s son. Then the 
little procession set out on the way to Nezuke where the formal 
wedding ceremonies had been prepared. 

They passed through the market-place, a part of that road without 
escape which Fata had covered so often in her thoughts. It was firm, 
real and everyday, almost easier to traverse than in her imagination. 


110 



No stars, no expanse, no father’s muffled cough, no desire for time 
to go more quickly or more slowly. When they reached the bridge, 
the girl felt once more, as in the summer nights before her window, 
every part of her body strongly and separately, and especially her 
breasts in a light constriction as if in a corselet. The party arrived on 
the kapia. As she had done so many times in her thoughts those 
last nights, the girl leant over and in a whisper begged the youngest 
brother who was riding beside her to shorten her stirrups a little, for 
they were coming to that steep passage from the bridge down to the 
stony track which led to Nezuke. They stopped, first those two and 
then, a little farther on, the other wedding guests. There was nothing 
unusual in this It was not the first nor would it be the last time that 
a wedding procession halted on the kapia. While the brother dis- 
mounted, went around the horse and threw the reins over his arm, 
the girl urged her horse to the very edge of the bridge, put her right 
foot on the stone parapet, sprang from the saddle as if she had wings, 
leapt over the parapet and threw herself into the roaring river below 
the bridge. The brother rushed after her and threw himself at full 
length on the parapet, managing to touch with his hand the flying 
veil but was unable to hold it The rest of the wedding guests leapt 
from their horses with the most extraordinary cries and remained 
along the stone parapet in strange attitudes as if they too had been 
turned to stone. 

That same day rain fell before evening, abundant and exception- 
ally cold for the time of year. The Drina rose and grew angry. Next 
day theyellowish flood waters threw Fata’s corpse on to a shoal near 
Kalata. There it was seen by a fisherman who went at once to notify 
the police chief. A little later the police chief himself arrived with 
the muktar, the fisherman and Salko Corkan For without Salko 
nothing of this sort could ever take place. 

The corpse was lying in soft wet sand. The waves moved it to and 
fro and from time to time their cloudy waters washed over it. The 
new black veil which the waters had not succeeded in pulling off had 
been turned back and thrown over her head; mingled with her long 
thick hair it formed a strange black mass beside the white lovely 
body of the young girl from which the current had tom away the 
thin wedding garments Frowning and with set jaws Salko and the 
fisherman waded out to the shoal, caught hold of the naked girl and, 
embarrassed and carefully, as if she were still alive, took her to the 
bank from the wet sand in which she had already begun to sink, and 
there at once covered her with the wet and mud bespattered veil. 

That same day the drowned girl was buried in the nearest Moslem 
graveyard, on the steep slope below the hill on which Velje Lug was 


lit 



built. And before evening the ne’er-do-wells of the town had collected 
m the inn around Salko and the fisherman with that unhealthy and 
prurient curiosity which is especially developed among those whose 
life IS empty, deprived of every beauty and lacking in excitement 
and events. They toasted them in plum brandy and offered them 
tobacco in order to hear some detail about the corpse and the burial. 
But nothing helped Even Salko said nothing He smoked con- 
tinuously and with his one bright eye looked at the smoke which he 
blew as far away as possible from him with strong puffs Only those 
two, Salko and the fisherman, looked at one another from time to 
time, lifted their little flasks in silence as if pledging something in- 
visible and drained them at a gulp 
Thus It was that that unusual and unheard of event took place on 
the kapia Velje Lug did not go down to Nezuke and Avdaga’s Fata 
never became the wife of a Hamzid. 

Avdaga Osmanagid never again went down into the town. He died 
that same winter, suffocated by his cough, without speaking a word 
to anyone of the sorrow that had killed him 
The next spring Mustajbeg Hamzid married his son to another girl, 
from Brankovidi 

For some time the townspeople talked about the incident and then 
began to forget it. All that remained was a song about a girl whose 
beauty and wisdom shone above the world as if it were immortal. 


112 



IX 




S ome seventy years after the, Karageorge insurrection war 
broke out again in Serbia and the frontier reacted by rebellion. 
Once more Turkish and Serbian houses flamed on the heights, 
at 21 ijeba, Gostilje, Crmde and Veletovo. For the first time after 
so many years the heads of decapitated Serbs again appeared on the 
kapia These were thm-faced short-haired peasant heads with bony 
faces and long moustaches, as though they were the same as those 
exposed seventy years before. But all this did not last long. As soon 
as the war between Serbia and Turkey ended, the people were again 
left in peace. It was, in truth, an uneasy peace which concealed 
many fearful and exciting rumours and anxious whisperings More 
and more definitely and openly was there talk of the entry of the 
Austrian army into Bosnia. At the beginning of the summer of 1878 
units of the regular Turkish army passed through the town on their 
way from Sarajevo to Pnboj. The idea spread that the Sultan would 
cede Bosnia without a struggle. Some families made ready to move 
into the Sanjak, amongst them some of those who thirty years be- 
fore, not wishing to live under Serbian rule, had fled from Uzice and 
who were now once again preparing to flee from another and 
new Christian rule But the majority stayed, awaiting what was to 
come in painful uncertainty and outward indifference. 

At the beginning of July the mutti of Plevlje arrived with a small 
body of men, filled with a great resolve to organize resistance in 
Bosnia against the Austrians. A fair-haired serious man of calm 
appearance but fiery temperament, he sat on the kapia where, one 
lovely summer's day, he summoned the Turkish leaders of the town 
and began to incite them to fight against the Austrians He assured 
them that the greater part of the regular army would remain in 
Bosnia despite its orders and would join with the people to oppose 
the new conqueror, and called on the young men to join him and the 
townspeople to send provisions to Sarajevo. The mufti knew that 
the people of Vi§egrad had never had the reputation of being en- 
thusiastic fighters and that they preferred to live foolishly rather 

113 



rhan to die foolishly, but he was none the less surprised at the luke- 
warm response that he encountered Unable to control himself any 
longer he threatened them with the justice of the people and the 
anger of God, and then left his assistant Osman Effendi Karamanli 
to go on convincing the people of ViSegrad of the need for their par- 
ticipation in a general insurrection. 

During the discussions with the multi, the greatest resistance had 
been shown by Alihodja Mutevelid His family was one of the oldest 
and most respected in the town They had never been noted for their 
fortune, but rather for their honesty and openness They had always 
been reckoned obstinate men, but not susceptible to bribes, intimida- 
tion, flattery or any other consideration of lower type For more than 
200 years the oldest member of their family had been the muteveha, 
the guardian and administrator of Mehmed Pasha’s foundation in the 
town. He looked after the famous Stone Han near the bridge We 
have seen how, aftei the loss of Hungary, the Stone Han lost the 
revenues on which it depended for its upkeep and by force of cir- 
cumstances became a ruin Of the Vezir's foundation there remained 
only the bridge, a public benefit which did not require special main- 
tenance and brought in no revenue. So there remained for the 
Mutevelids only their family name as a proud memorial of the call- 
ing which they had honourably carried out for so many years That 
calling had in fact ceased at the time when Dauthodja had suc- 
cumbed in his struggle to maintain the Stone Han, but the pride had 
remained and with it the traditional custom that the Mutevelid 
family was called upon above all others to look after the bridge and 
that It was in some way responsible for its fate, since the bridge was 
an integral part of the great religious foundation which the family 
had administered and which had so pitiably dried up Also by long 
established custom one of the Mutevelid family went to school and 
belonged to the ulema, the learned body of the Moslem clergy Now 
it was Alihodja Otherwise the family had greatly diminished both in 
numbers and property. They now had only a few serfs and a shop, 
which they had kept for a long time past, in the best position in the 
market-place, quite close to the bridge. Two elder brothers of 
Alihodja had died in the wars, one in Russia and the other in 
Montenegro. 

Alihodja himself was still a young man, lively, healthy and 
smiling. Like a real Mutevelid he held contrary opinions in every- 
thing, defending them tenaciously and sticking to them obstinately. 
Because of his outspoken nature and independence of his thought 
he was frequently at odds with the local ulema and the Moslem 
notables. He had the title and rank of hodja but neither carried out 



any of the duties of that office nor received any income from that 
calling In order to be as independent as possible, he himself looked 
after the shop which had been left by his father. 

Like the majority of the ViSegrad Moslems, Alihodja too was 
opposed to any armed resistance. But in his case there could be no 
question of cowardice or religious lukewarmness. He loathed the 
foreign Christian power and all that it would bring with it as much 
as the multi or any of the insurgents. But seeing that the Sultan had 
in fact left Bosnia at the mercy of the Schwabes (for so they called 
the Austrians) and knowing his fellow-citizens, he was opposed to 
any disorganized popular resistance which could only end in disaster 
and make their misfortune the greater. When once this idea was 
firmly implanted in his mind, he preached it openly and defended 
it with spirit On this occasion too he kept on asking awkward ques- 
tions and made sarcastic comments which greatly disconcerted the 
multi. Thus unintentionally he sustained among the people of Vise- 
grad, who in any case would not have been so swift to battle or 
much inclined to make sacrifices, a spirit of open resistance against 
the multi's warlike intentions. 

When Osman Effendi Karamanli remained in the town to con- 
tinue his discussions with the people, he found himself faced with 
Alihodja Those few begs and agas who swallowed their words and 
measured their phrases and who in fact were in complete agreement 
with Alihodja left it to the sincere and ebullient hodja to come into 
the open and enter into conflict with Karamanli. 

Thus early one evening the leading Vi&grad Turks were sitting on 
the kapia, cross-legged in a circle. In the centre was Osman Effendi, 
a tall thin pale man Every muscle of his face was unnaturally set, his 
eyes were feverish and his forehead and cheeks marked all over with 
scars like an epileptic Before him stood the hodja, reddish in face 
and small in stature, yet somehow impressive, asking more and more 
questions in his thin reedy voice. What forces had they? Where were 
they to go’ With what means? How? What for? What will happen 
in case of failure? The cold and almost mischievous pedantry with 
which the hodja treated the matter only served to conceal his own 
anxiety and bitterness at the Christian superiority and the evident 
weakness and disorder of the Turks. But the hot-headed and sombre 
Osman Effendi was not the man to notice or understand such things. 
Of violent and uncontrolled temper, a fanatic with overstrung 
nerves, he quickly lost patience and control and attacked the hodja 
at every sign of doubt or wavering as if he were a Schwabe This 
hodja irritated him and he replied to him only with generalities and 
big words. The main thing was not to allow the foe to enter the coun- 



try Without resistance, and whoever asked too many questions only 
hindered the good work and aided the enemy In the end, completely 
beside himself, he replied with scarcely concealed disdain to every 
question of the hodja The time has come to die', ‘We will lay down 
our lives', ‘We shall all die to the last man' 

‘But,’ bioke in the bodja, ‘1 understood that you wanted to drive 
the Schw^abes out of Bosnia and that was the reason why you were 
collecting us If it is only a question of dying, then we too know how 
to die, Effendi, even without your assistance There is nothing easier 
than to die ’ 

*Ama, I can see that you will not be one of those who die,’ broke 
in Karamanli, harshly. 

‘I can see that you will be one,’ answered the hodja sarcastically, 
‘only I do not see w^hy you ask for our company m this senseless 
attempt.’ 

The conversation then degenerated into an open quarrel m which 
Osman Effendi referred to Alihodja as a renegade, one of those 
traitors whose heads, like the Serbs’, should be exposed on the kapia, 
while the hodja imperturbably went on splitting hairs and demand- 
ing proofs and reasons, as if he had not even heard those threats and 
insults 

Indeed it would have been hard to find two worse negotiators or 
more unsuited contestants Nothing more could have been expected 
of them than increasing general anxiety and the creation of one 
quarrel the more That was to be regretted, but there was nothing to 
be done about it, for such moments of social upset and great inevit- 
able change usually throw up just such men, unbalanced and incom- 
plete, to turn things inside out or lead them astray. That is one of the 
signs of times of disorder. 

None the less this barren quarrel was a boon to the begs and agas 
for the question of their participation in the insurrection remained 
unanswered and they themselves were not compelled to take sides 
at once. Quivering with rage and shouting insults at the top of his 
voice, Osman Effendi left the next day with a few of his men to 
follow the mufti to Sarajevo, 

The news which arrived in the course of the month only served 
to confirm the agas and begs in their opportunist view that it would 
be better to preserve their town and their homes. By mid-August the 
Austrians entered Sarajevo. A little later there was a disastrous clash 
on Glasinac, which was also the end of all resistance. Remnants of 
the routed Turkish bands began to descend the steep road from 
Lijeska through OkoliSte. Amongst them were some regular soldiers 
who despite the Sultan’s order had joined the resistance movement 

ii6 



of the local insurgents on their own account. The soldiers only asked 
for bread and water and the way on to Uvac, but the insurgents were 
bitter and angry men whom the rout had not broken. Blackened, 
dusty and in rags, they replied curtly to the questions of the peace- 
able ViSegrad Turks and made ready to dig trenches and defend the 
bridge. 

Alihodja was again to the fore; he pointed out indefatigably and 
regardless of consequences that the town could not be defended and 
that resistance was senseless since the ‘Schwabes had already swept 
through Bosnia from end to end’ The insurgents knew that well 
enough themselves but did not want to acknowledge it, for these 
well-fed and well-clothed men who had saved their houses and pro- 
perties by keeping wisely and cravenly far from the revolt irritated 
and provoked them With them came that same Osman Effendi 
Karamanli, as if out of his mind, paler and thinner than ever, even 
more frenzied and warlike He was one of those men for whom 
failure has no meaning. He spoke of resistance in any place and at 
any price and continually of the need to die Before his furious 
ardour everyone retreated or withdrew, save only Alihodja. He 
proved to the aggressive Osman Effendi, without the slightest malice, 
coldly and brutally, that what had happened to the revolt was 
exactly what he had foreseen a month ago on this very kapia He 
recommended him to leave with his men as quickly as possible for 
Plevlje and not to make bad worse. The hodja was now less aggres- 
sive, even to a certain extent compassionate towards this Karamanli 
as towards a sick man For within himself, beneath all his outward 
obstinacy the hodja was greatly shaken by the approaching misfor- 
tune He was unhappy and embittered as only a true-believing Mos- 
lem could be who sees that a foreign force is approaching inexor- 
ably, before whose onslaught the ancient order of Islam could not 
long survive That hidden rancour could be felt in his own words 
even against his will. 

To all Karamanli’s insults he replied almost sadly: 

‘Do you think, Effendi, that it is easy for me to be alive to await 
the coming of the Schwabes to our land? As if we did not know what 
is in store for us in the times to come^ We know where it hurts us 
and what we are losing; we know it only too well. If you came here 
to tell us this, you should not have returned here. Indeed there was 
no need for you to come from Plevlje at all For, as I see, you do not 
understand matters Had you done so, you would not have done 
what you have done or said what you have said. This is a worse tor- 
ment, Effendi, than you can think; nor do I know a remedy for it, 
but I know that what you suggest is not a remedy.' 



But Osman Effendi was deaf to everything that did not accord 
with his deep and sincere passion for resistance and he hated this 
hodja as much as the Schwabes against whom he had revolted. So is 
It always when an overwhelming enemy is near and a great defeat 
certain In every society appear fratricidal hatreds and mutual quar- 
rels Not finding anything fresh to say, he went on calling Alihodja a 
traitor, ironically recommending him to get baptized before the 
Schwabes came 

‘My ancestors were not baptized, nor will I be I, Effendi, have no 
wish either to be baptized with a Schwabe or to go to war with an 
idiot,* the hodja replied calmly. 

All the leading Vi§egrad Turks were of the same opinion as Ali- 
hodja, but all did not think it discreet to say so, especially so harshly 
and uncompromisingly They were afraid of the Austrians who were 
coming but they w^ere also afraid of Karamanli who with his men 
had taken over control of the town. Therefore they shut themselves 
up in their houses or withdrew to their properties outside the town, 
and when they could not avoid meeting Karamanli and his men 
they looked away or replied with equivocal phrases looking for 
the most convenient pretext and the safest way of extricating 
themselves. 

On the level space in front of the ruins of the caravanserai Kara- 
manh held open court from morning to evening A motley crowd 
was always about him, his own men, chance passers-by, those who 
came to beg something from the new master of the town and 
travellers whom the insurgents brought more or less by force in 
front of their leader. And Karamanli talked incessantly Even when 
he was talking to one man he shouted as if he were addressing hun- 
dreds Still paler, he rolled his eyes, in which the whites had notice- 
ably yellowed, and white foam gathered at the corners of his lips. 
One of the townsmen had told him of the Moslem tradition about 
Sheik Turhama who had died there long ago defending the passage 
of the Drma against an infidel army and now rested in his grave on 
the farther bank just above the bridge, but who without doubt 
would rise again the moment the first infidel soldier stepped on to 
the bridge. He seized on this legend, feverishly and passionately, ex- 
pounding it to the people as a real and unexpected aid. 

‘Brothers, this bridge was a Vezir's bequest. It is written that an 
infidel force shall never cross it. It is not we alone who are to defend 
it but also this “holy one** whom rifles cannot hit nor swords cut. 
Should the foe come, he will rise from his grave and will stand in the 
centre of the bridge with outstretched arms; and when the Schwabes 
see him their knees will tremble, and their hearts fail so that they will 



not even be able to run away. Turkish brothers, do not disperse but 
all follow me to the bridge.’ 

So Karamanh shouted to the crowd. Standing stiffly in his black 
shabby cloak, stretching out his arms and showmg how the ‘holy 
one’ would stand, he looked exactly like a tall thin black cross with 
a turban on top. 

This the ViSegrad Turks knew even better than Karamanli, for 
every one of them had heard and told this legend countless times in 
his childhood, but they none the less showed not the least desire to 
mingle fact with legend or reckon on the help of the dead since noth- 
ing could be expected of the living. Alihodja, who had not moved 
far from his shop, but to whom the people told all that was said 
or done before the Stone Han, only waved his arms sorrowfully and 
compassionately. 

‘I knew that that idiot would not leave either the living or the 
dead in peace Allah selamet ohun' May God help us!’ 

But Karamanli, helpless before the real enemy, turned all his fury 
against Alihodja. He threatened, he shouted and swore that before 
he was forced to leave the town he would nail the obstinate hodja to 
the kapia like a badger to await the Schwabes in that way, since he 
did not want to fight or to allow others to do so 

All this bickering was cut short by the appearance of the Austrians 
on the Lijeska slopes Then it was seen that the town really could 
not be defended Karamanli was the last to leave the town, abandon- 
ing on the raised level space before the caravanserai both the iron 
cannons that he had dragged there But before he left he carried out 
his threat He ordered his servant, a smith by profession, a man of 
giant size but with the brain of a bird, to bind Alihodja and to nail 
him by the right ear to that oak beam wedged between two stone 
steps on the kapia. which was all that remained of the former 
blockhouse. 

In the general crush and confusion which reigned in the market- 
place and around the bridge, all heard that order given in a loud 
voice but no one even dreamed that it would be carried out in the 
form in which it was given In such circumstances all sorts of things, 
brave words and loud curses, can be heard. So too it was in this case 
At first sight the thing seemed inconceivable. It was to be considered 
a threat or an insult or something of the sort. Nor did Alihodja him- 
self take the matter very seriously. Even the smith himself who had 
been ordered to carry it out and who was busy spiking the guns 
hesitated and seemed to think it over. But the thought that the hodja 
must be nailed to the kapia was in the air and the suspicious and em- 
bittered townsmen turned over in their minds the prospects and 



piobabilities of such a cnmc being earned out or not earned out. 
Would It be, or would it not be’ At first the majority of them 
thought the affair to be, as indeed it was, senseless, ugly and impos- 
sible But in moments of general excitement, something has to be 
done, something big and unusual, and that was the only thing to be 
done. Would it be— or would it not be’ The possibility seemed 
stronger and became eveiy moment and with every movement more 
probable and more natural Why not’ Two men already held the 
hodja who did not defend himself overmuch They bound his hands 
behind his back But all this was still far from so mad and terrible a 
reality. But it was coming nearer and nearer. The smith, as if sud- 
denly ashamed of his weakness and indecision, produced from some- 
where or other the hammer with which a short time before he had 
been spiking the guns The thought that the Schwabes were so to 
speak already here, half an hour’s march from the town, gave him 
the resolution to bring the matter to a head And with this same 
painful thought the hodja obstinately maintained his indifference to 
everything, even towards that mad, undeserved and shameful 
punishment lO which they had condemned him 

So in a few moments there took place what in any one of those 
moments would have seemed impossible and incredible There was 
no one who w'ould have considered that this deed was good or pos- 
sible, yet everyone to some extent played his part in the fact that 
the hodja found himself on the biidge nailed by his right ear to a 
wooden beam which was on the kapia', and when everyone fled in 
all directions before the Schwabes who were coming down the 
slopes into the town, the hodja remained in this strange but comic 
position, forced to kneel motionless since every movement, even the 
slightest, was exceedingly painful and threatened to tear off his ear, 
which seemed to him as heavy and as large as a mountain. He cried 
out, but there was no one to hear him or release him from his pain- 
ful situation for everything living had hidden in the houses or scat- 
tered into the villages for fear, partly of the Schwabes who were 
coming and partly of the insurgents who were leaving The town 
seemed dead and the bridge as empty as if death had swept it clean 
There was neither living nor dead to defend it, only on the kapia the 
motionless Alihodja crouched down with his head stuck to the beam, 
groaning with pain but even in this position thinking up fresh proofs 
against Karamanli 

The Austrians approached slowly: from the farther bank their 
patrols had seen the two cannons in front of the caravanserai and 
they at once halted to await the arrival of their mountain guns. 
About midday they fired a few shells from the shelter of a little wood 


120 



at the deserted caravanserai They damaged the already ruined ban 
and destroyed those exceptionally fine window grilles, each cut 
from a single piece of soft stone. Only after they had got the range 
and overturned the two Turkish cannons and seen that they were 
abandoned and that no one replied did the Schwabes cease their fire 
and begin to approach the bridge and the town with every precau- 
tion. Some Magyar honveds approached the kapia slowly with their 
rifles at the ready. They halted in uncertainty before the huddled 
hodja who in fear of the shells, which had whistled and grumbled 
above his head, had for a moment forgotten the pain from his nailed 
ear When he saw the hated soldiers with their rifles trained on him, 
he began to utter piteous and prolonged sobs, since that was a 
language that everyone understood. This prevented him from being 
shot. Some of them continued their slow advance step by step across 
the bridge while others remained by him looking at him more closely 
and unable to understand his position Only when a hospital orderly 
arrived did they find a pair of pliers, carefully extracted the nail, one 
of those used for shoeing horses, and released Alihodja. So stiff and 
exhausted was he that he collapsed on the stone step, groaning and 
sobbing The orderly dressed his ear with some sort of liquid which 
stung Through his tears the hodja as if in a strange dream looked at 
the broad white band on the soldier’s left arm and on it a large regu- 
lar cross in red material. Only in fever could such repulsive and ter- 
rible sights be seen. This cross swam and danced before his eyes and 
filled his whole horizon like a nightmare. Then the soldier bound up 
his wound and fixed his turban over the bandage. His head thus ban- 
daged, and as if broken in his loins, the hodja dragged himself to his 
feet and remained so for some moments leaning on the stone parapet 
of the bridge. With difficulty he collected himself and regained his 
calm. 

Opposite him, on the far side of the kapia, beneath the Turkish in- 
scnption in the stone, a soldier had affixed a large white paper. 
Though his head was throbbing with pain the hodja could not re- 
strain his curiosity and looked at that white placard. It was a pro- 
clamation by General Filipovid, in Serbian and Turkish, addressed 
to the population of Bosnia and Herzegovina on the occasion of the 
entry of the Austrian army into Bosnia Screwing up his right eye, 
Alihodja spelt out the Turkish text, but only those sentences printed 
in large letters: 

‘People of Bosnia and Herzegovina! 

‘The Army of the Emperor of Austria and King of Hungary has 
crossed the frontier of your country. It does not come as an enemy 
to take the land by force. It comes as a fnend to put an end to the 


I2I 



disorders which for years past have disturbed not only Bosnia and 
Herzegovina but also the frontier districts of Austria-Hungary. 

The King-Umperor could no longer see how violence and disorder 
ruled in the neighbourhood of his dominions and how misery and 
misfortune knocked at the frontiers of hiS lands 

‘He has drawn the attention of the European States to your posi- 
tion and at a Council of the Nations it has been unanimously decided 
that Austria-Hungary shall restore to you the peace and prosperity 
that you have so long lost. 

*His Majesty the Sultan who has your good at heart has felt it 
necessary to confide you to the protection of his powerful friend the 
King-Emperor 

The King-Emperor decrees that all sons of this land shall enjoy the 
same rights before the law and that the lives, faith and property of 
all shall be protected 

‘People of Bosnia and Herzegovina* Put yourselves with confi- 
dence under the protection of the glorious standards of Austria- 
Hungary Welcome our soldiers as friends, submit yourselves to the 
authorities and return to your occupations The fruits of your toil 
wnll be protected.’ 

The hodjQ read haltingly, sentence by sentence He did not under- 
stand eveiy woid, >et every word caused him pain, a special sort of 
pain completely distinct from those pains which he felt in his 
wounded ear, in his head and in his loins Only now, from these 
words, these ‘imperial w'ords’, was it at once clear to him that every- 
thing was ended for them, all that was his and theirs, ended m some 
strange fashion once and for all; eyes go on seeing, lips speaking, 
man goes on living but life, real life, exists no more A foreign tsar 
had put his hand on them and a foreign faith ruled. That emerged 
clearly from those big words and obscure commands, and still more 
clearly from that leaden pam in his breast which was fiercer and 
harder to bear than any human pain that could be imagined It was 
not thousands of fools like that Osman Karamanli who could do 
anything or change anything (thus the hodja continued to argue 
within himself). ‘We shall all die', ‘We must die'. What was the use 
of all that hullabaloo when, here and now, there had come for a man 
a time of disaster in which he could neither live nor die, but rotted 
like a stake in the earth and belonged to whomever you wished but 
not himself That was the great misery which the Karamanlis of all 
sorts did not see and could not understand and which by their lack 


122 



of understanding they made even heavier and more shameful. 

Deep in his thoughts Alihodja slowly left the bridge. He did not 
even notice that the Austrian red-cross man was accompanying him. 
His ear did not pain him as much as that leaden and bitter pain which 
had risen in his breast after reading ‘the imperial words’. He walked 
slowly and it seemed to him that never again would he cross to the 
farther bank, that this bridge which was the pride of the town and 
ever since its creation had been so closely linked with it, on which 
he had grown up and beside which he had spent his life, was now 
suddenly broken in the middle, right there at the kapw, that this 
white paper of the proclamation had cut it in half like a silent ex- 
plosion and that there was now a great abyss; that individual piers 
still stood to right and to left of this break but that there was no way 
across, for the bridge no longer linked the two banks and every man 
had to remain on that side where he happened to be at this moment. 

Alihodja walked slowly, immersed in these feverish visions. He 
seemed like a seriously wounded man and his eyes continually filled 
with tears. He walked hesitantly as if he were a beggar who, ill, was 
crossing the bridge for the first time and entering a strange unknown 
town. Voices aroused him. Beside him walked some soldiers. 
Amongst them he saw that fat, good-natured, mocking face of the 
man with a red cross on his arm who had taken out the nail. Still 
smiling, the soldier pointed to his bandage and asked him something 
in an incomprehensible language. The hodja thought that he was 
offering to help him and at once stiffened and said sullenly: 

‘I can myself 1 need no one’s help.’ 

And with a livelier and more determined step he made his way 
home. 


123 



X 




T he formal and official entry of the Austrian troops took 
place the following day 

No one could remember such a silence as then fell on the 
town. The shops did not even open The doors and windows 
of the houses remained shuttered though it was a warm sunny day 
towards the end of August The streets were empty, the courtyards 
and gardens as if dead. In the Turkish houses depression and confu- 
sion reigned, in the Christian houses caution and distrust. But every- 
where and for everyone there was fear The entering Austrians 
feared an ambush The Turks feared the Austrians The Serbs feared 
both Austrians and Turks The Jews feared everything and every- 
one since, especially in times of war, everyone was stronger than 
they The rumbling of the previous day’s guns was in everyone’s 
ears But even if men were now only listening to their own fear, no 
one living that day would have dared to poke his nose out of doors. 
But man has other masters The Austrian detachment which had 
entered the town the day before had routed out the police chief and 
gendarmes. The officer in command of the detachment had returned 
his sword to the police chief and ordered him to continue his duties 
and maintain order m the town. He told him that at one hour before 
noon next day the commandant, a colonel, would arrive and that 
the leading men of the town, that was to say the representatives of 
the three faiths, were to be there to meet him when he entered the 
town. Grey and resigned, the police chief at once summoned Mula 
Ibrahim, Husseinaga the schoolmaster. Pop Nikola, and the rabbi 
David Levi and informed them that as ‘recognized notables’ they must 
await the Austrian commandant next day at noon on the kapia, must 
welcome him in the name of the citizens and accompany him to the 
market-place. 

Long before the appointed time the four ‘recognized notables’ met 
on the deserted square and walked with slow steps to the kapia Al- 
ready the assistant chief of police, Salko Hedo, with the aid of a 
gendarme, had spread out a long Turkish carpet in bright colours to 

124 



cover the steps and the middle of the stone seat on which the Aus- 
trian commandant was to sit They stood there together for some 
time, solemn and silent, then seeing that there was no trace of the 
commandant along the white road from OkoliSte, they looked at one 
another and as if by common consent sat down on the uncovered 
part of the stone bench. Pop Nikola drew out a huge leather tobacco 
pouch and offered it to the others. 

So they sat on the kapia as they had once done when they were 
young and carefree and like the rest of the young people wasted their 
time there. Only now they were all advanced in years. Pop Nikola 
and Mula Ibrahim were old, and the schoolmaster and the rabbi in 
the prime of life. They were all in their best clothes, filled with 
anxiety both for themselves and for their flocks. They looked at one 
another closely and long in the fierce summer sun, and each seemed 
to the others grown old for his years and worn out Each of them 
remembered the others as they had been in youth or childhood, when 
they had grown up on this bridge, each in his own generation, green 
wood of which no one could tell what would be 

They smoked and talked of one thing while turning another over 
m their minds, glancing every moment towards Okoliste whence the 
commandant upon whom everything depended was to come and 
who could bring them, their people and the whole town, either good 
or evil, either peace or fresh dangers. 

Pop Nikola was undoubtedly the most calm and collected of the 
four, or at least seemed so He had passed his seventieth year but was 
still fresh and strong Son of the celebrated Pop Mihailo whom the 
Turks had beheaded on this very spot. Pop Nikola had passed a 
stormy youth. He had several times fled into Serbia to take refuge 
there from the hatred and revenge of certain Turks. His indomitable 
nature and his conduct had often given occasion both for hatred and 
revenge. But when the troublous years had passed. Pop Mihailovs son 
had settled down in his old parish, married, and calmed down. Those 
times were long ago and now forgotten. (‘My character has changed 
long ago and our Turks have become peaceable,' Pop Nikola would 
say in jest.) For fifty years now Pop Nikola had administered his 
widespread, scattered and difficult frontier parish calmly and ^wisely, 
without other major upheavals and misfortunes than those which 
life brings normally in its tram, with the devotion of a slave and the 
dignity of a prince, always just and equitable with Turks, people 
and leaders. 

Neither before him nor after him in any class of men or in any 
faith was there a man who enjoyed such general respect and such a 
reputation amongst all the townspeople without distinction of faith. 


I2S 



sex or years, as this priest whom everyone called ‘grandad* He re- 
presented for the whole town the Serbian church and all that the 
people called or regarded as Christianity The people looked on him 
as the perfect type of priest and leader so far as this town in these 
conditions could imagine one 

He was a man of great stature and exceptional physical strength, 
not over literate but of great heart, sound common sense and a serene 
and open spirit His smile disarmed, calmed and encouraged It was 
the indescribable smile of a man who lives at peace with himself and 
with everything around him; his big green eyes contracted into nar- 
row slits whence flashed golden sparks And so he remained in old 
age In his long overcoat of fox-fur, with his great red beard just be- 
ginning to turn grey with the years and which covered his whole 
chest, with his enormous hood beneath w'hich his flowing hair was 
plaited into a pigtail, he walked through the market-place as if he 
had indeed been the priest of this town beside the bridge and all this 
mountainous district, not for fifty years only and not for his church 
only, but from time immemorial, from those times when the people 
were not divided into their present faiths and churches. From the 
shops on both sides of the market-place the merchants greeted him, 
whatever their faith Women stood to one side and waited with 
bowed head for ‘grandad’ to pass The children (even the Jewish 
ones) left off their play and stopped shouting and the oldest among 
them, solemnly and timidly, would come up to the enormous hand 
of ‘grandad’ to feel it for a moment on their shaven heads and faces 
heated by play, and hear his merry and powerful voice fall upon 
them like a good and pleasant dew: 

‘God grant you life! God grant you life, my son!’ 

This token of respect towards ‘grandad’ had become a part of the 
ancient and universally recognized ceremonial in which generations 
of the townsfolk had grown up. 

But even in Pop Nikola’s life there was one shadow His marriage 
had remained childless That was, without doubt, a heavy blow but 
no one could recall having heard a bitter word or seen a regretful 
glance either from him or from his wife. In their house they always 
maintained at their own expense at least two children belonging to 
some of their relatives in the villages These they would look after 
until they married, and then find others. 

Next to Pop Nikola sat Mula Ibrahim, a tall, thin, dried up man 
with a sparse beard and pendulant moustaches He was not much 
younger than Pop Nikola, had a large family and a fine property left 
him by his father, but he was so slipshod, thin and timid, that he 
seemed with his clear blue childlike eyes more like some hermit or 

126 



some poor and pious pilgrim than the hodja of ViSegrad, descendant 
of many hodjas Mula Ibrahim had one affliction: he stuttered in his 
speech, long and painfully ('A man must have nothing to do before 
he can talk with Mula Ibrahim,* the townsmen used to say in jest) . 
But Mula Ibrahim was known for far around for his goodness and 
generosity. Mildness and serenity breathed out of him and at the first 
meeting men forgot his outward appearance and his stutter. He 
attracted all who were overburdened by illness, poverty or any other 
misfortune. From the most distant villages men came to ask advice 
of Mula Ibrahim Before his house there was always a crowd to see 
him, and men and women often stopped him in the street to seek his 
advice. He never refused anyone and never handed out expensive 
charms or amulets as other hodjas did. He would sit down at once in 
the first patch of shade or on the first stone, a little to the side; the 
man would then tell all his troubles in a whisper. Mula Ibrahim 
would listen attentively and sympathetically, then say a few good 
words to him, always finding the best possible solution for his 
troubles, or would thrust his thin hand into the deep pocket of his 
cloak, taking care not to be overseen by anyone, and slip a few coins 
into his hand Nothing was difficult or repugnant or impossible to 
him if It were a question of helping some Moslem For that he could 
always find time and money. Nor did his stutter hinder him in this, 
for when whispering with his co-religionist in misfortune he forgot 
to stutter. Everyone went away from him if not completely con- 
soled, then at least momentarily relieved, for it could be seen that 
he felt their misfortunes as if they were his own Continually sur- 
rounded with every sort of trouble and need and never thinking of 
himself, he none the less, or so it seemed, passed his whole life 
healthy, happy and rich. 

The ViSegrad schoolmaster, Hussein Effendi, was a smallish plump 
man, well dressed and well cared for. He had a short black beard 
carefully trimmed in a regular oval about his pink and white face 
with round black eyes. He had been well educated and knew a good 
deal, but pretended to know much more and deceived himself that 
he knew even more He loved to talk and to have an audience He 
was convinced that he spoke well and that led him to speak a lot. 
He expressed himself carefully and affectedly with studied gestures, 
holding his arms up a little, both at the same height, with white soft 
hands with pinkish nails, shadowed by short black hairs. When 
speaking he behaved as if he were in front of a mirror He had the 
largest library in the town, a bound chest full of books kept care- 
fully locked, which had been bequeathed him by his teacher, the 
celebrated Arap-hodja, and which he not only conscientiously pre- 


127 



served from dust and moth but even on rare occasions read. But the 
mere knowledge that he had .so great a number of such valuable 
books gave him lepute amongst men who did not know what a book 
was, and raised his value in his own eyes It was known that he was 
writing a chronicle of the most important events in the history of the 
town Among the citizens this gave him the fame of a learned and 
exceptional man, for it was considered that by this he held in some 
way the fate of the town and of every individual in it in his hands 
In actual fact that chronicle was neither extensive nor dangerous In 
the last five or six years, since the schoolmaster had first begun this 
work, only four pages of a small exercise book had been filled For 
the greater number of the town’s events were not considered by the 
schoolmaster as of sufficient importance to warrant entry into his 
chronicle and for that reason it remained as unfruitful, dry and 
empty as a proud old maid 

The fourth of the ‘notables’ was David Levi, the ViSegrad rabbi, 
grandson of that famous old rabbi Had]i Liacho who had left him as 
inheritance his name, position and property but nothing of his spirit 
and his serenity. 

He was pale and puny, with dark velvety eyes and melancholy ex- 
pression. He was inconceivably timid and silent He had only re- 
cently become rabbi and had married not long before In order to 
seem bigger and more important he wore a wide rich suit of heavy 
cloth and his face was overgrown with beard and whiskers, but be- 
neath all this one could discern a weak sickly body and the childish 
oval of his face peered out fearfully from the black sparse beard. He 
suffered terribly whenever he had to appear in public and take his 
part in discussions and decisions, always feeling himself to be weak 
and undeveloped. 

Now all four of them sat in the sun and sweated under their for- 
mal clothes, more moved and anxious than they wished to show. 

‘Let’s light another one. We’ve time, by the soul of my grand- 
mother! He’s no bird to fly down to the bridge,’ said Pop Nikola, 
like a man who has long learnt how to conceal with a jest his own 
and others’ thoughts and fears. 

All looked at the OkoliSte road and then went on smoking 

The conversation flowed slowly and carefully, forever coming 
back to the imminent welcome to the commandant. All were agreed 
that it was Pop Nikola who should greet him and bid him welcome. 
With half-closed eyes and brows furrowed so that his eyes became 
those two golden-studded slits that formed his smile. Pop Nikola 
looked at the three others long, silently and intently. 

The rabbi was quivering with fright. He had hardly strength to 

128 



puff the smoke away from him but let it linger in his moustaches and 
beard. The schoolmaster was no less scared. All his eloquence and his 
dignity as a man of learning had vanished suddenly the day before 
He was very far from realizing how disconsolate he looked and how 
greatly he was scared, for the high opinion which he had of himself 
did not allow him to believe anything of the sort. He tried to deliver 
one of his literary addresses with his studied gestures that explained 
everything, but his fine hands only fell into his lap and his words be- 
came mixed up and halting. Even he himself wondered where his 
customary dignity had vanished, and vainly tormented himself try- 
ing to recover it, as something to which he had long been accustomed 
and which now, when he needed it most, had somehow deserted 
him. 

Mula Ibrahim was somewhat paler than usual but otherwise calm 
and collected. He and Pop Nikola looked at one another from time to 
time as if they understood one another by their eyes alone They 
had been close acquaintances smce youth and good friends, insofar 
as one could speak of friendship between a Turk and a Serb in times 
as they then were. When Pop Nikola in his youthful years had had 
his ‘troubles’ with the ViSegrad Turks and had had to fly for refuge, 
Mula Ibrahim, whose father had been very influential m the town, 
had been of some service to him. Later, when more peaceful times 
had come and relations between the two faiths had become more 
bearable and the two of them were already grown men, they had 
made friends and called one another ‘neighbour’ in jest, for their 
houses were at opposite ends of the town On occasions of drought, 
flood, epidemic or other misfortune they found themselves working 
together, each among men of their own faith Otherwise, whenever 
they met at Mejdan or OkoliSte, they greeted one another and asked 
after one another’s health, as priest and hodja never did elsewhere. 
Then Pop Nikola would often point with his pipestem at the town 
beside the river and say half in jest: 

‘All that breathes or creeps or speaks with human voice down 
there is either your or my responsibility.’ 

‘It is so, neighbour,’ Mula Ibrahim would stutter in reply, ‘indeed 
they are.’ 

(And so the townsmen who could always find time to mock at 
everyone and everything would say of men who lived in friendship: 
‘They are as close as the priest and the hodja’’, and this saying became 
a proverb with them.) 

These two now understood one another perfectly though they did 
not exchange a word. Pop Nikola knew how hard it was for Mula 
Ibrahim and Mula Ibrahim knew that it was not easy for the priest. 

E 129 



The> looked at one another as they had done so many times before 
in their lives and on so many different occasions, as two men who 
had on their souls that double burden of the town, the one for those 
w ho crossed themselves, the other for those who bowed down in the 
mosque 

At that moment the sound of trotting was heard and a Turkish 
gendarme hurried up on a scraggy pony. Scared and out of breath, 
he shouted at them from a distance like a town-cner. 

‘Here he is, the one on the white horse’* 

The police chief too arrived, alw^ays calm, always amiable, always 
silent 

Dust rose from along the Okoliste road 

These men, born and brought up in this remote district of Turkey, 
the rotten-npe Turkey of the nineteenth century, had naturally never 
had the chance of seeing the real, powerful and well-organized army 
of a great power All that they had been able to see till then had been 
the incomplete, badly fed, badly clothed and badly paid units of the 
Sultan’s askers or, which was even worse, the Bosnian irregulars, the 
bashibazouks, recruited by force, undisciplined and fanatic. Now for 
the first time there appeared before them the real ‘power and force’ 
of an Empire, victorious, glistening and sure of itself. Such an army 
dazzled them and checked the words in their throats. At the first 
sight of the saddlery and the tunic-buttons another world could be 
sensed behind these hussars and jaegers in parade kit. Their astonish- 
ment was great and the impression profound. 

First rode two trumpeters on two fat bays, then a detachment of 
hussars on black horses. The horses were well groomed and moved 
like girls with short tidy steps. The hussars, all young and fresh, with 
waxed moustaches, m red shakos and yellow frogged tunics, seemed 
rested and vigorous as if they had just come out of barracks. Behind 
them rode a group of six officers led by a colonel. All eyes were fixed 
on him. His horse was larger than the others, a flea-bitten grey with a 
very long and curved neck. A little behind the officers came the in- 
fantry detachment, jaegers, in green uniforms, with a panache of 
feathers on their leather caps and white bands across their chests 
They shut out everything save themselves and seemed like a moving 
forest. 

The trumpeters and hussars rode past the priest and the police 
chief, halted on the market-place, and drew up along the sides. 

The men on the kapia, pale and shaken, stood in the centre of the 
bridge facing the officers. One of the younger officers spurred his 
horse up to the colonel and said something to him. All slowed down 
A few paces in front of the ‘notables’ the colonel suddenly halted 



and dismounted, as did the officers behind him as if by order The 
soldiers whose duty it was to hold the horses hurried up and led them 
a tew paces back. 

As soon as his foot touched the ground, the colonel seemed another 
man He was a small, undistinguished, overtired, unpleasant and 
aggressive man, behaving as if he alone had fought for all of them 
Only now could it be seen that he was simply dressed, dishevelled 
and ungroomed, in contrast to his pale-faced smartly-uniformed 
officers He was the image of a man who drives himself mercilessly, 
who continually overtaxes himself. His face was flushed, his beard 
untnmmed, his eyes troubled and anxious, his tall helmet a little on 
one side and his crumpled uniform seemingly too big for his body 
He was wearing cavalry boots of soft unpolished leather. Walking 
with legs apart like a horseman he came closer, swinging his riding- 
crop One of the officers spoke to him, pointing out the men ranged 
before him The colonel looked at them shortly and sharply, the 
angiy glance of a man continually occupied with difficult duties and 
great dangers It was at once evident that he did not know how to 
look in any other way. 

At that moment Pop Nikola began to speak in a calm deep voice. 
The colonel looked up and fixed his gaze on the face of the big man 
m the black cloak That broad serene mask of a biblical patriarch 
held his attention for a moment. It may be that he did not under- 
stand, or that he pretended not to listen to, what the old man was 
saying, but that face could not go unnoticed. Pop Nikola spoke 
fluently and naturally, addressing himself more to the young officer 
who was to translate his words than to the colonel himself In the 
name of all the faiths here present, he assured the colonel that they, 
and their people, were willing to submit themselves to the coming 
authorities and would do all that was in their power to maintain 
peace and order as the new authorities demanded. They asked the 
army to protect them and their families and make a peaceful life and 
honest toil possible for them. 

Pop Nikola spoke shortly and ended abruptly. The nervous 
colonel did not have any excuse to lose patience. But all the same he 
did not wait for the end of the young officer’s translation. Brandish- 
ing his ridmg-crop, he interrupted him in a harsh and uneven voice* 

‘Good, good! All those who behave themselves will be protected 
Peace and order must be maintained ever>’where. It must be, whether 
they like it or not ’ 

Then, shaking his head, he moved onward without a glance or a 
greeting. The ‘notables’ moved aside The colonel passed them, fol- 
lowed by the officers and the orderlies with the horses. None of them 



paid the least attention to the ‘notables’ who remained alone on the 
kapia 

All of them were disillusioned. For the day before, and all through 
the previous night, in which not one of them had slept much, each 
had asked himself a hundred times what that moment would be like 
when they had to welcome the commandant of the Imperial Army on 
the kapia They had imagined him in every sort of way, each accord- 
ing to his nature and intelligence, and had been ready for the worst. 
Some of them had already seen themselves tarried away immediately 
to exile in faraway Austria, never again to see their homes or their 
town. Others remembered the stones about Hairuddin who at one 
time used to cut off heads on this very kapia. They had imagined in 
every possible way, save that m which it had actually happened, the 
meeting with that small but curt and bad-tempered officer to whom 
war was life, who did not think of himself or pay any heed to others, 
but saw all men and all lands only as a subject or an occasion for 
war and conflict, and who behaved as if he were waging war on his 
own account and in his own name. 

So they stood, looking at one another in uncertainty. Each of their 
looks seemed to say dumbly: ‘We have got out of this alive. Have we 
really gone through the worst? What is still in store for us and what 
must be done?' 

The police chief and Pop Nikola were the first to come to them- 
selves. They came to the conclusion that the ‘notables’ had done their 
duty and that nothing more was left for them to do but to go home 
and tell the people not to be frightened and run away, but to take 
good care what they did The others, without blood in their faces or 
thoughts in their heads, accepted this conclusion as they would have 
accepted any other, since they themselves were in no state to come 
to any conclusion. 

The police chief, whom nothing could ruffle, w'ent about his duties. 
The gendarme rolled up the long multicoloured carpet which had not 
been fated to receive the visit of the commandant, with Salko Hedo 
standing beside him as cold and unfeeling as Fate. Meanwhile the 
‘notables’ dispersed each in his own way and each in his own direc- 
tion. The rabbi hurried off with tiny steps in order to get home as 
soon as possible and feel again the warmth and protection of the 
family circle in which his mother and his wife lived. The school- 
master left more slowly, deep in thought. Now that everything had 
passed so unexpectedly well and easily, though harshly and un- 
pleasantly enough, it seemed to him quite clear that there had never 
been any real reason for panic and it seemed to him that he had 
never in fact been afraid of anyone. He thought only what import- 

132 



ance this event should have in his chronicle and how much space 
should be devoted to it. A score of lines should be enough. Perhaps 
even fifteen, or maybe less. The nearer he got to his house the more 
he reduced the number With every line spared it seemed to him that 
he saw all around him diminished in importance while he, the 
schoolmaster, became greater and more important in his own eyes. 

Mula Ibrahim and Pop Nikola walked together as far as the slope 
leading to Mejdan. They both remained silent, astonished and dis- 
couraged at the appearance and bearing of the Impenal colonel. 
Both were hastening to get home as soon as possible and foregather 
with their families. At the point where their paths diverged, they 
stood and looked at one another for a moment in silence. Mula 
Ibrahim rolled his eyes and moved his lips as if continually chewing 
over some word that he was unable to utter Pop Nikola, who had 
once more recovered his smile of golden sparks which encouraged 
both himself and the hodja, uttered his own and the hod]a*s thought: 

*A bloody business, this army, Mula Ibrahim!' 

Tou are right, a b-b-b-bloody business,' stuttered Mula Ibrahim 
raising his arms and saying farewell with a movement of his head. 

Pop Nikola went back to his house by the church, slowly and 
heavily His wife who was waiting for him asked no questions. She 
at once took off his boots, took his cloak and removed the hood 
from the thick sweaty mass of red and grey hair He sat down on a 
low divan. On its wooden arm a glass of water and a lump of sugar 
were ready waiting. After refreshing himself and lighting a cigar he 
closed his eyes wearily. But in his inmost thoughts still flashed the 
image of that colonel, like a flash of lightning that dazzles a man and 
fills his whole field of vision so that nothing else may be seen and yet 
it is impossible to look away from it. The priest puffed his smoke far 
away from him with a sigh and then spoke quietly as if to himself: 

‘A strange sort of bastard, on my grandmother's soul!' 

From the town could be heard a drum and then a bugle of the 
jaeger detachment, gay and penetrating, a new and unusual melody 


^33 



XI 




T hus the great change in the life of the town beside the bridge 
took place without sacrifices other than the martyrdom of 
Alihodja After a few days life went on again as before 
and seemed essentially unchanged Even Alihodja himself 
plucked up his courage and opened his shop near the bridge like 
all the other traders, save that now he wore his turban slightly 
tipped to the right so that the scar on his wounded ear could not 
be seen That ‘leaden weight’ which he had felt in his chest after 
seeing the led cross on the arm of the Austrian orderly and reading 
the ‘Imperial words’ had not actually vanished, but it had become 
quite small like the bead of a rosary, so that it was possible to live 
with It. Nor was he the only one who felt such a weight 
So began the new era under the occupation which the people, 
unable to prevent, considered in their hearts to be temporary. What 
did not pass across the bridge m those first few years after the 
occupation! Yellow military vehicles rumbled across it in long 
convoys bringing food, clothing and furniture, instruments and 
fittings hitherto unheard of. 

At first only the army was to be seen. Soldiers sprang up, like 
water from the earth, behind every corner and every bush The 
market-place was full of them, but they were also in every part 
of the town. Every minute of the day some fnghtened woman 
would scream, having unexpectedly come across a soldier in her 
courtyard or in the plum-orchard behind her house. In dark blue 
uniforms, tanned by two months of marching and fighting, glad 
that they were alive and eager for rest and enjoyment, they 
sauntered through the town and the country around. Few of the 
citizens went to the kapia for now it was always full of soldiers. 
They would sit there, singing in various languages and buying 
fruit in their blue leather-peaked caps with a yellow metal cocitede 
on which was cut the imperial initials FJI. 

But when autumn came the soldiers began to move away. Slowly 
and imperceptibly there seemed fewer and fewer of them. There 


134 



remained only the gendarme detachments. These requisitioned 
houses and prepared for a long stay. At the same time officials 
began to arrive, civil servants with their families and, after them, 
artisans and craftsmen for all those trades which up till then had 
not existed m the town. Among them were Czechs, Poles, Croats, 
Hungarians and Austrians 

At first it seemed that they had come by chance, as if driven 
by the wind, and as if they were coming for a short stay to live 
more or less the same life as had always been lived here, as though 
the civil authorities were to prolong for a short time the occupation 
begun by the army. But with every month that passed the number 
of newcomers increased. However, what most astonished the 
people of the town and filled them with wonder and distrust was 
not so much their numbers as their immense and incomprehensible 
plans, their untiring industry and the perseverance with which they 
proceeded to the realization of those plans. The newcomers were 
never at peace; and they allowed no one else to^live in peace. 
It seemed that they were resolved with their impalpable yet ever 
more noticeable web of laws, regulations and orders to embrace 
all foims of life, men, beasts and things, and to change and alter 
everything, both the outward appearance of the town and the 
customs and habits of men from the cradle to the grave All this 
they did quietly without many words, without force or provocation, 
so that a man had nothing to protest about If they encountered 
resistance or lack of understanding, they at once stopped, discussed 
the matter somewhere out of sight and then changed only the 
manner and direction of their work, still carrying out whatever 
was in their minds Every task that they began seemed useless 
and even silly. They measured out the waste land, numbered the 
trees m the forest, inspected lavatories and drains, looked at the 
teeth of horses and cows, asked about the illnesses of the people, 
noted the number and types of fruit-trees and of different kinds 
of sheep and poultry. (It seemed that they were playing games, 
so incomprehensible, unreal and futile all these tasks of theirs 
appeared to the people.) Then all that they had carried out with 
so much care and zeal vanished somewhere or other as if it had 
been lost without trace or sound. But a few months later, some- 
times even a year later, when the whole thing had been completely 
forgotten by the people, the real sense of these measures which 
had seemed so senseless was suddenly revealed The mukhtars of 
the individual quarters would be summoned to the konak (the 
administrative centre) and told of a new regulation against forest 
felling, or of the fight against typhus, or the manner of sale of 


135 



fruit and sweetmeats, or of permits for the moiement of cattle. 
Every day a fresh regulation With each regulation men saw their 
individual liberties curtailed or their obligations increased, but 
the life of the town and the villages, and of all their inhabitants as a 
mass, became wider and fuller. 

But in the homes, not only of the Turks but also of the Serbs, 
nothing was changed They lived, worked and amused themselves 
in the old way Bread was .still mixed in kneading troughs, coffee 
roasted on the hearth, clothes steamed in coppers and washed 
with soda which hurt the women’s fingers; they still span and wove 
on tambours and hand-looms Old customs of slavas (patronal 
feasts), holidays and weddings were kept up in every detail and as 
for the new customs which the newcomers had brought with them 
there were only whispers here and there as of something far off 
and incredible. In short, they lived and worked as they had always 
done and as in most of the houses they would continue to work 
and live for another fifteen or twenty years after the occupation. 

But on the other hand the outward aspect of the town altered 
visibly and rapidly Those same people, who in their own homes 
maintained the old order in every detail and did not even dream 
of changing anything, became for the most part easily reconciled 
to the changes in the town and after a longer or shorter period 
of wonder and grumbling accepted them. Naturally here, as always 
and everywhere in similar circumstances, the new life meant in 
actual fact a mingling of the old and the new. Old ideas and old 
values clashed with the new ones, merged with them or existed 
side by side, as if waiting to see which would outlive which 
People reckoned in florins and kreutzers but also in grosh and para, 
measured by arshin and oka and drams but also by metres and 
kilos and grams, confirmed terms of payment and orders by the 
new calendar but even more often by the old custom of payment 
on St. George's or St. Dimitri’s day. By a natural law the people 
resisted every innovation but did not go to extremes, for to most 
of them life was always more important and more urgent than 
the forms by which they lived. Only in exceptional individuals was 
there played out a deeper, truer drama of the struggle between the 
old and the new. For them the forms of life were indivisibly 
and unconditionally linked with life itself. 

Such a man was Shemsibeg Brankovid of Cm2e, one of the richest 
and most respected begs in the town. He had six sons, of whom 
four were already married. Their houses comprised a whole small 
(Quarter surrounded by fields, plum-orchards and shrubberies. Shem- 
sibeg was the undisputed chief, the strict and silent master of this 

156 



community Tall, bent with years, with a huge white gold-em- 
broidered turban on his head, he only came down to the market 
to pray m the mosque on Fridays. From the first day of the occupa- 
tion he stopped nowhere in the town, spoke to no one and would 
not look about him. Not the smallest piece of new clothing or 
costume, not a new tool or a new word was allowed to enter 
the Brankovid house Not one of his sons had any connection with 
the new authorities and his grandchildren were not allowed to go 
to school All the Brankovid community suffered from this; amongst 
his sons there was dissatisfaction at the old man’s obstinacy but 
none of them dared to oppose him by a single word or a single 
glance. Those Turks from the market-place, who worked and 
mingled with the newcomers, greeted Sheipsibeg when he passed 
through the market with a dumb respect in which was mingled 
fear and admiration and an uneasy conscience. The oldest and most 
respected Turks of the town often went to Crnfe as if on a pil- 
grimage to sit and talk with Shemsibeg. Those were meetings of 
men who were determined to persevere in their resistance to the 
end and were unwilling to yield in any way to reality. These 
were, in fact, long sessions without many words and without real 
conclusions. 

Shemsibeg sat and smoked on a red rug, cloaked and buttoned 
up m summer as in winter, with his guests around him. Their 
conversation was usually about some new incomprehensible and 
sinister measure of the occupation authonties, or of those Turks 
who were more and more accommodating themselves to the new 
order Before this harsh and dignified man, they all felt the need 
to give vent to their bitterness, their fears and their uncertainties 
Every conversation ended with the questions- where is all this 
leading and where will it stop? Who and what were these strangers 
who, it seemed, did not know the meaning of rest and respite, knev. 
neither measure nor limits? What did they want? With what plans 
had they come? What was this restlessness which continually 
drove them on, like some curse, to new works and enterprises 
of which no one could see the end? 

Shemsibeg only looked at them and for the most part remained 
silent. His face was darkened, not by the sun, but by his inner 
thoughts. His glance was hard, but absent and as if lost. His eyes 
were clouded and there were whitish-grey circles around the black 
pupils as m an ageing eagle. His big mouth, with scarcely per- 
ceptible lips, was firmly set but moved slowly as if he were always 
turning over in his mind some word which he did not pronounce. 

None the less, men left him with a feeling of comfort, neither 


137 



calmed nor consoled, but touched and exalted by his firm and 
hopeless intransigence 

Whenever Shemsibeg went down to the market-place on Fridays, 
he was met with some fresh change in men or buildings which 
had not been there the Friday before In order not to have to 
look at it, he kept his eyes fixed on the ground but there, in the 
drying mud of the streets, he saw the marks of horses’ hooves 
and noticed how alongside the broad rounded Tuikish shoes the 
sharp-pointed bent Austrian horseshoes were becoming more and 
more common So that even there in the mud his gaze read the 
same merciless judgment that he read everywhere in men’s faces 
and in the things about him, a judgment of time which would 
not be halted 

Seeing that there was nowhere to rest his eyes, Shemsibeg ceased 
altogether to come down into the market He withdrew completely 
to his CrnJe and sat theie, a sdent but strict and implacable master, 
severe towards all but most of all towards himself. The oldest 
and most respected Turks of the town continued to visit him there, 
regarding him as a sort of living saint (amongst them, in particular, 
Alihodja). At last, in the third year of the occupation, Shemsibeg 
died without ever having been ill He passed away without ever 
pronouncing that bitter word which was for ever on the tip 
of his old lips and never again setting foot m the market-place, 
where all men had set out on the new ways. 

Indeed the town changed rapidly in appearance, for the new- 
comers cut down trees, planted new ones in other places, repaired 
the streets, cut new ones, dug drainage canals, built public buildings 
In the first few years they pulled down m the market-place those 
old and dilapidated shops which were out of line and which, to 
tell the truth, had up till then inconvenienced no one In place 
of those old-fashioned shops with their wooden drop-counters, new 
ones were built, well sited, with tiled roofs and metal rollers on 
the doors, (Alihodja’s shop too was destined to be a victim of 
these measures, but the hodja opposed it resolutely, took the affair 
to law, contested it and dragged it on in every possible way until 
at last he succeeded, and his shop remained just as it was and 
just where it was.) The market-place was levelled and widened. 
A new konak was erected, a great building intended to house the 
law courts and the local administration. The army, too, was working 
on its own account, even more rapidly and inconsiderately than 
the civil authorities. They put up barracks, cleared waste land, 
planted and changed the appearance of whole hills. 

The older inhabitants could not understand, and wondered; just 

138 



when they thought that all this incomprehensible energy had come 
to an end, the newcomers started some fresh and even more 
incomprehensible task. The townsmen stopped and looked at all 
this work, but not like children who love to watch the work of 
adults but as adults who stop for a moment to watch children’s 
games. This continual need of the newcomers to build and rebuild, 
to dig and to put back again, to put up and modify, this eternal 
desire of theirs to foresee the action of natural forces, to avoid 
or surmount them, no one either understood or appreciated. On 
the other hand all the townsmen, especially the older men, saw 
this unhealthy activity as a bad omen Had it been left to them 
the town would have gone on looking as any other little oriental 
tovra. What burst would be patched up, what leant would be 
shored up, but beyond that no one would needlessly create work 
or make plans or interfere in the foimdations of buildings or 
change the aspect which God had given to the town. 

But the newcomers went on with their tasks, one after the 
other, quickly and logically, according to unknown and well pre- 
pared plans, to the even greater wonder and astonishment of the 
townsfolk. Thus unexpectedly and quickly came the turn of the 
dilapidated and abandoned caravanserai, which was always re- 
garded as an integral part of the bridge, even as it had been 300 
years before In fact what had been known as the Stone Han had 
long ago become completely ruined The doors had rotted, those 
lace-like grilles of soft stone on the windows broken, the roof 
had fallen into the interior of the building and from it grew a 
great acacia and a welter of nameless shrubs and weeds, but the 
outer walls were still whole, a true and haimonious rectangle 
of stone still standing upnght. In the eyes of the townspeople, 
from birth to death, this was no ordinary ruin but the completion 
of the bndge, as much an integral part of the town as their own 
houses, and no one would ever have dreamt that the old han could 
be touched or that it was necessary to change anything about it 
that time and nature had not already changed. 

But one day its turn came too. First engineers who spent a long 
time measuring the ruins, then workmen and labourers who began 
to take it down stone by stone, frightening and driving away all 
sorts of birds and small beasts which had their nests there. Rapidly 
the level space above the market-place by the bridge became 
bald and empty and all that was left of the ban was a heap of 
good stone carefully piled. 

A little more than a year later, instead of the former caravanserai 
of white stone, there rose a high, massive two-storied barracks. 


139 



washed in pale-blue, roofed with grey corrugated iron and with 
loopholes at the comers Soldiers drilled all day on the open space 
and stretched their limbs or fell head first in the dust like suppliants 
to the loud shouts of the corporals In the evening the sound of 
incomprehensible soldiers’ songs accompanied by an accordion 
could be heard from the many windows of the ugly building This 
went on until the penetrating sound of the bugle with its melancholy 
melody, which set all the dogs of the town howling, extinguished 
all these sounds together with the last lights in the windows So 
disappeared the lovely bequest of the Vezir and so the barracks, 
which the people true to ancient custom went on calling the 
Stone Han, commenced its life on the level by the bridge in complete 
lack of harmony with all that surrounded it. 

The bridge now remained completely isolated 
To tell the truth, things were happening on the bridge too, 
where the old unchanging customs of the people clashed with 
the innovations which the newcomers and their way of life 
brought with them, and in these clashes all that was old and 
local was always forced to give way and adapt itself 
As far as the local people were concerned, life on the kapia went 
Its way as of old Only it was noticed that now Serbs and Jews 
came more freely and in greater numbers to the kapia and at all 
times of day, paying no heed as they once had done to the habits 
and privileges of the Turks Otherwise all went on as before. In 
the daytime merchants sat there waiting for the peasant woman 
and buying from them wool, poultry and eggs, and beside them 
the lazy and idle who moved from one part of the town to another 
in keeping with the movements of the sun. Towards evening other 
citizens began to arrive and the merchants and workers gathered 
there to talk a little or to remain silent for a time looking at the great 
green river bordered by dwarf willows and sandbanks. The night 
was for the young. They had never known, nor did they know 
now, any limits for the time that they stayed on the bridge nor 
for what they did there. 

In that night-time life of the kapia there were, at least at first, 
changes and misunderstandings. The new authorities had introduced 
permanent lighting in the town. In the first years of the occupation 
they put lanterns on green standards, in which petrol lamps burned, 
m the main streets and at the crossroads. The lanterns were cleaned, 
filled and lit by big Ferhat, a poor devil with a house full of 
children, who until then had been a servant in the municipality. 
He discharged the petards announcing Ramazan and carried out 
similar jobs, without any fixed or certain wages The bridge too 



was lighted at several points, including the kapia. The standard 
for this lantern was fixed to that oak beam which was all that 
remained of the former blockhouse. This lantern on the kapia had 
to endure a long struggle with the local jokers, with those who 
loved to sing in the darkness or to smoke and chat on the kapia 
as also with the destructive impulses of the young men in whom 
love-yearning, solitude and plum brandy mingled and clashed. That 
flickering light irritated them and so cotmtless times both the 
lantern and the lamp inside were smashed to pieces There were 
many fines and sentences because of that lantern. At one time a 
special police agent was told to keep an eye on the light So the 
nightly visitors now had a living witness, even more unpleasant 
than the lantern. But time exercised its influence and the new 
generation grew accustomed to it and so reconciled to its existence 
that they gave free vent to their night feelings under the weak 
light of the municipal lantern, and no longer threw at it whatever 
came to hand, sticks, stones or anything else. This reconaliation 
was made so much the easier because on moonlit nights, when the 
kapia was most visited, the lantern was generally not lit. 

Only once a year the bridge had to experience a great illumination. 
On the eve of August i8th every year, the Emperor’s birthday, 
the authorities decorated the bridge with garlands and lines of 
young pine trees and, as darkness fell, lit strings of lanterns and 
fairy-lights; hundreds of army ration tins, filled with lard and fat, 
flamed in long rows along the parapet of the bridge. They lit up 
the centre of the bridge, leaving the ends and the piers lost m the 
darkness, so that the illuminated part seemea as if floating in 
space But every light quickly bums out and every feast comes to 
an end. By the next day the bridge was once again what it had 
always been. Only in the eyes of some of the children there 
remained a new and unusual picture of the bridge under the short- 
lived play of light, a bright and striking vision, but short and 
transient as a dream. 

Besides permanent lighting, the new authorities also introduced 
cleanliness on the kapia, or more exactly that special sort of 
cleanliness that accorded with their ideas. The fmit peelings, melon 
seeds and nutshells no longer remained for days on the flagstones 
until the rain or the wind carried them away. Now a municipal 
sweeper brushed them up every morning But that irritated no one, 
for men quickly become accustomed to cleanliness even when it 
forms no part of their needs or habits; naturally on condition 
that they personally do not have to observe it. 

There was still one more novelty which the occupation and 



the newcomers brought with them, women began to come to the 
kapia for the fitst time m its existence The wives and daughters 
of the officials, their nursemaids and servants would stop there 
to chat or come to sit there on holidays woth their military or 
civil escorts This did not happen very often, but none the less 
It was enough to distuib the older men who came there to smoke 
their pipes in peace and quiet over the water, and disconcerted 
and confused the younger ones. 

There had, naturally, always been a link between the kapia and 
the women in the tow n, but only in so far as the menfolk gathered 
there to pass compliments to the girls crossing the bridge or to 
express their joys, pains and quarrels over women and find relief 
from them on the kapia Many a lonely man would sit for hours 
or even days singing softly to himself ‘for my soul only’, or 
wreathed in tobacco smoke, or simply watching the swift waters 
in silence, paying tribute to that exaltation to which we must 
all pay due and from which few escape. Many a contest between 
rivals was settled there, many love intrigues imagined Much was 
said or thought about w'omen and about love, many passions 
were born and many extinguished. All this there was, but women 
had never stopped or sat on the kapia, neither Christian nor, still 
less, Moslem Now all that was changed. 

Now on Sundays and holidays on the kapia could be seen cooks 
tightly laced and red in the face, with rolls of fat overflowing 
above and below their corsets in which they could scarcely breathe. 
With them were their sergeants in well brushed uniforms, with 
shining metal buttons and riflemen’s pompoms on their chests 
And on working days at dusk, officers and civil servants strolled 
there with their wives, halted on the kapia, chatted in their m- 
comprehensible language, strolled about at their ease and laughed 
loudly. 

These idle, laughing women were a cause of scandal to all, 
some more some less. The people wondered and felt insulted for 
a time and then began to grow accustomed to them, as they had 
grown accustomed to so many other innovations, even though 
they did not approve them. 

In fact it could be said that all these changes on the bridge 
were insignificant, fleeting and superficial. The many and important 
changes which had taken place in the spirits and habits of the 
citizens and in the outward appearance of the town seemed as 
though they had passed by the bridge without affecting it. It 
seemed that the white and ancient bridge, across which men had 
passed for three centuries, remained unchanged without trace or 



mark even under the ‘new Emperor’ and that it would triumph 
over this flood of change and innovation even as it had always 
triumphed over the greatest floods, arising once more, white and 
untouched, from the furious mass of troubled waters which had 
wanted to flow over it. 


143 



XII 




N ow life on the kapia became even livelier and more varied. 

A large and variegated crowd, locals and newcomers, old 
and young, came and went on the kapia all day long until 
a late hour of the night. They thought only of themselves, 
each one wrapped up in the thoughts, moods and emotions which 
had brought him to the kapia. Therefore they paid no heed to the 
passers-by who, impelled by other thoughts and by their own cares, 
crossed the bridge with lowered heads or absent glances, looking 
neither to right nor left and paying no attention to those seated on 
the kapia. 

Among such passers-by one was certainly Milan Glasl^anin of 
OkoliSte. He was tall, thin, pale and bowed. His whole body seemed 
transparent and without weight, yet attached to leaden feet, so that 
he swayed and bent in his walk like a church banner held in a child’s 
hands during the procession. His hair and moustaches were grey, 
like those of an old man, and his eyes were always lowered. He did 
not notice that anything had changed on the kapia or among the 
people gathered there, and passed among them almost unnoticed by 
those who came there to sit, to dream, to sing, to trade, to chat or 
simply to waste time. The older men had forgotten him, the younger 
men did not recall him and the newcomers had never known him. 
But none the less his fate had been closely bound up with the kapia, 
at least judging from what was said about him or whispered in the 
town ten or twelve years before. 

Milan’s father, Nikola GlasiCanin, had settled in the town about 
the time when the insurrection in Serbia was at its height. He had 
bought a fine property at OkoliSte. It was generally believed that he 
had fled from somewhere or other with a large but ill-gotten fortune. 
No one had any proof of this and everyone only half believed it. But 
no one ever definitely denied it. He had married twice but none the 
less had few children. He had brought up one child only, his son 
Milan, and left him all that he possessed, whether open or hidden. 
Milan, too, had only a single son, Peter. His property would have 


144 



been sufficient and he would have left that to his son after his death 
had he not had one vice, only one. but that an overwhelming passion 
—gambling. 

The real townsmen were not gamblers by nature. As we have seen, 
their passions were other and different; an immoderate love of 
women, an inclmation to alcohol, song, lounging and idle dreamings 
beside their native river. But man’s capacities are limited, even in 
such matters Therefore their vices often clashed with one another, 
contradicted one another and often completely cancelled one 
another out. This did not mean that in the town there were not men 
addicted to this vice, but the actual number of gamblers was always 
few in comparison with other tovras, and for the most part they 
were strangers or newcomers. Anyhow, Milan GlaSicanin was one 
of them. From his earliest youth he had been entirely given over to 
gambling When he could not find the company he needed in the 
town, he would go to nearby districts whence he would return, either 
weighed down with money like a merchant from a fair or with 
empty pockets, without watch or chain, tobacco pouch or rings, but 
always pale and washed out like a sick man. 

His habitual place was in Ustamujid’s inn at the far end of the 
ViJegrad market. There, m a narrow windowless room where a 
candle burned day and night, could always be found three or four 
men to whom gambling was dearer than anything else on earth. In 
that room, shut off from the world, they would aouch in the tobacco 
smoke and stale air, with bloodshot eyes, dry mouths and quivering 
hands. They met there frequently, day or night, slaves to their 
passion like martyrs. In that little room Milan passed a great part 
of his youth and there left a good part of his strength and pro- 
perty. 

He had not been much more than thirty when that sudden and to 
most people mexplicable change took place in him, which cured him 
for ever of his driving passion but at the same time altered his whole 
way of life and completely transfigured him. 

One autumn, some fourteen years before, a stranger had come to 
the inn. He was neither young nor old, neither ugly nor handsome, 
a man of middle age and medium height, silent and smiling only wdth 
his eyes. He was a man of business, entirely wrapped up in the affairs 
for which he had come. He passed the night there and at dusk entered 
that little room in which the gamblers had been shut up since early 
afternoon. They greeted him with distrust but he behaved so quietly 
and meekly that they did not even notice when he too began to put 
small stakes on the cards. He lost more than he won, frowned un- 
certainly and with an unsure hand took some silver money from an 


145 



inner pocket After he had lost a considerable sum, they had to give 
him the deal At first he dealt slow ly and carefully, then more swiftly 
and freely He played without showing his feelings but was prepared 
to stake the limit. The pile of silver coins before him grew One by 
one, the players began to drop out. One offered to stake a gold chain 
on a caid, but the newcomer refused coldly, saying that he played 
for money only 

About the time of the last prayei the game broke up, for no one 
had any ready money left Milan Glasi^anin was the last, but in the 
end he too had to w ithdraw. The newcomer politely took his leave 
and retired to his own room 

Next day they played again Again the stranger alternately lost 
and won, but always won more than he lost, so that once again the 
townsmen were left without ready money They looked at his hands 
and his sleeves, watched him from every angle, brought fresh cards 
and changed places at the table, but all to no purpose. They were 
playing that simple but ill-famed game called otuz bir (thirty-one) 
which they had all known from childhood, but none the less they 
were not able to follow the newcomer's mode of play Sometimes 
he drew twenty-mne and sometimes thirty, and sometimes he stood 
pat at twenty-five He accepted every stake, the smallest as well as 
the greatest, overlooked the petty irregularities of individual players 
as if he had not noticed them, but denounced more serious ones 
curtly and coldly 

The presence of this newcomer at the inn tormented and irritated 
Milan Glasi^anm He was in any case at that time feverish and 
washed out. He swore to himself that he would play no more, but 
came again, and again lost his last com, returning home filled with 
gall and shame. The fourth and fifth evenings he managed to con- 
trol himself and remained at home. He had dressed and prepared his 
ready money but none the less stood by his resolution. His head felt 
heavy and his breath came in fits and starts. He ate his supper in 
haste, scarcely knowing what he was eating Finally he went out, 
smoked, walked up and down in front of his house several times, 
and looked at the silent town in the clear autumn night. After he 
had walked thus for some time, he suddenly saw a vague figure going 
along the road who turned and stopped before his house. 

‘Good evening, neighbour!* shouted the unknown. Milan knew 
the voice. It was the stranger from the inn. Clearly the man had 
come to see him and wanted to talk to him. Milan came up to the 
fence. 

‘Why didn't you come to the inn tonight?* the stranger asked 
casually, calm and indifferent. 


146 



*I was not in the mood today. Are the others there?* 

There is no one left. They all left earlier than usual. Come along 
and let's have a hand together.* 

‘It is too late, and there's nowhere to go.' 

‘Let us go down and sit on the kapia. The moon will soon be rising/ 
‘But It IS not the right time,' Milan objected. His lips were dry 
and his words seemed as if another had spoken them. 

The stranger went on waiting, certain that his suggestion would 
be accepted. 

And, in fact, Milan unlatched his gate and followed the man, as 
though his words and thoughts and efforts had all given way before 
that calm power which drew him on and from which he could not 
free himself, however much he felt humiliated by this stranger who 
roused in him resistance and revulsion. 

They descended the slope from Okoliste quickly. A large and wax- 
ing moon was rising behind Stani§evac. The bridge seemed endless 
and unreal, for its ends were lost in a milky mist and the piers merged 
into the darkness; one side of each pier and of each arch was brightly 
lit while the other remained in the deepest shadow. These moonlit 
and darkened surfaces were broken and cut into sharp outlines, so 
that the whole bridge seemed like a strange arabesque created by a 
momentary play of light and darkness 
On the kapia there was not a living soul. They sat down. The 
stranger took out a pack of cards. Milan started to say how unsuit- 
able this was, that they could not see the cards well and could not 
distinguish the money, but the stranger paid no attention to him. 
They began to play. 

At first they still exchanged an occasional word, but as the game 
grew faster they fell silent. They only rolled cigarettes and lit them 
one after the other. The cards changed hands several times, only to 
remain finally in the hands of the stranger. The money fell sound- 
lessly on the stones which were covered by a fine dew. The time had 
come, which Milan knew so well, when the stranger drew a two to 
twenty-nine or an ace to thirty. His throat contracted and his gaze 
clouded. But the face of the stranger, bathed in moonlight, seemed 
calmer than usual. In not quite an hour Milan no longer had any 
ready money. The stranger proposed that he should go home and get 
some more and said that he would accompany him. They went there 
and returned and went on with the game. Milan played as if dumb 
and blind, guessing at the cards and showing by signs what he 
wanted. It almost seemed as if the cards between them had become 
incidental, a pretext in this desperate and unrelenting duel. When 
he again ran out of money, the stranger ordered him to go home and 


147 



bring some more, while he himselt remained on the kapia smoking. 
He no longer thought it necessary to accompany him, for he could 
no longer imagine that Milan would not obey, or play a trick on him 
and remain at home Milan obeyed, went without argument and re- 
turned humbly Then the luck suddenly changed Milan won back 
all that he had lost. The knot in his throat tightened more and more 
under the stress of emotion The stranger began to double the stakes 
and then to treble them. The game grew more and more swift, more 
and more intense The cards flew between them weaving a web of 
gold and silver. Both were silent. Only Milan breathed excitedly, 
sweating and feeling chilled alternately in the mild moonlit night 
He played, dealt and covered his cards, not from the pleasure of the 
game but because he had to. It seemed to him that this stranger 
wanted to draw out of him not only all his money, ducat by ducat, 
but also the marrow from his bones and the blood from his veins, 
drop by drop, and that his strength and his will-power were leaving 
him with every new loss in the game From time to time he stole a 
glance at his opponent He expected to see a satanic face with bared 
teeth and eyes like red-hot coals, but on the contrary he still saw 
before him the stranger’s ordinary face with the intent expression of 
a man working at an everyday task, hastening to finish the work in 
hand which was neither easy nor pleasant. 

Once more Milan rapidly lost all his ready money Then the 
stranger proposed staking cattle, land and property 

'I wager four good Hungarian ducats against your bay with its 
saddle. Is it a deal?’ 

‘I agree.’ 

So the bay went, and after it two packhorses, then cows and 
calves. Like a careful and meticulous merchant, the stranger num- 
bered all the beasts in Milan’s stables by name and set down 
accurately the value of each head, as if he had been born and reared 
in the house. 

‘Here are thirteen ducats for that field of yours you call salkusha 
Have I your word?’ 

Tou have.’ 

The stranger dealt. Milan’s five cards totalled twenty-eight. 

‘More?’ asked the stranger calmly. 

‘One,’ muttered Milan in a scarcely audible voice and all his blood 
rushed to his heart. 

The stranger slowly turned a card. It was a two, a lucky draw 
Milan muttered indifferently through closed teeth. 

‘Enough,’ 

He closed his cards, concealing them feverishly. He tried to make 

148 



his voice and expression indifferent, to prevent his opponent from 
guessing how he stood. 

Then the stranger began to draw for himself, with open cards. 
When he got to twenty-seven he stopped and looked Milan in the 
eyes, but Milan looked away. The stranger turned another card. It 
was a two He sighed quickly, scarcely audibly. It seemed that he 
would stand pat at twenty-nine and the blood began to flow back to 
Milan’s head in a joyful presentiment of victory. Then the stranger 
started, expanded his chest and threw back his head so that his eyes 
and forehead shone in the moonlight and turned up another card. 
Another two. It seemed impossible that three twos should turn up 
one after the other, but so it was On the turned-up card Milan 
seemed to see his field, ploughed and harrowed as it was in spring 
when it was at its best The furrows whirled about him as in delirium, 
but the calm voice of the stranger recalled him to himself. 

'Otuz Mr! The field is mine!’ 

Then came the turn of the other fields, then both houses and then 
the oak grove at Osojnica. They invariably agreed on the values. 
Sometimes Milan would win and would snatch up the ducats. Hope 
shone before him like gold but after two or three unlucky hands he 
was again without money and again began staking his property. 

When the game had swept away everything like a torrent both 
players stopped for a moment, not to take breath for both of them it 
seemed feared to do so, but to consider what else they could wager 
The stranger was calm like a conscientious worker who has finished 
the first part of his task and wants to hasten on with the second 
Milan remained tense as if turned to ice; his blood was beating in his 
ears and the stone seat beneath him rose and fell. Then the stranger 
suggested in that monotonous, even, somewhat nasal voice; 

‘Do you know what, friend? Let us have one more turn at the 
cards, but all for all. I will wager all that I have gained tonight and 
you your life. If you win. everything will be yours again just as it 
was, money, cattle and lands. If you lose, you will leap from the 
kapia into the Drina.’ 

He said this in the same dry and business-like voice as he had said 
everything else, as if it were a question of the most ordinary wager 
between two gamblers absorbed by their play. 

So it has come to losing my soul or saving it, thought Milan and 
made an effort to rise, to extricate himself from that incomprehen- 
sible whirlpool that had taken everything from him and even now 
drew him on with irresistible force, but the stranger sent him back 
to his place with a glance. As if they had been playing at the inn for 
a stake of three or four grosh he lowered his head and held out his 


149 



hand They both cut The stranger cut a four and Milan a ten. It was 
his turn to deal and that filled him vsith hope He dealt and the 
stranger asked for a complete new hand 

‘More^ More! More’’ 

The man took f]\e cards and only then said ‘Enough’’ Now it was 
Milan’s turn When he i cached tw^enty-eight he stopped for a second, 
looked at the cards m the stranger’s hand and at his enigmatic face. 
He w^as unable to get any idea at how^ many the stranger had stopped, 
but It was exceedingly likely that he had more than twenty-eight; 
firstly, because ail e\cning he had ne\er stopped at low scores and 
secondly, becviuse he had five cards Summoning the last of his 
strength Milan turned over one more card It was a four, that meant 
thirty-two He had lost 

He looked at the card but was unable to believe his eyes It seemed 
to him impossible that he should have lost everything so quickly. 
Something fiery and noisy seemed to course through him, from his 
feet to his head Suddenly everything became clear; the value of life, 
what It meant to be a man and the meaning of his curse, that inex- 
plicable passion to gamble ivith friends or strangers, with himself 
and with all around him. All was clear and light as if the day had 
dawned and he had only been dreaming that he had gambled and 
lost, but everything was at the same time tiue, irrevocable and irre- 
parable. He wanted to make some sound, to groan, to cry out for 
help, even were it only a sigh, but he could not summon up enough 
strength. 

Before him the stranger stood waiting 

Then, all of a sudden, a cock crowed somewhere on the bank, high 
and clear, and immediately after, a second It was so near that he 
could hear the beating of its wings At the same time the scattered 
cards flew away as if carried off by a stoi m. the money was scattered 
and the whole kapia rocked to its foundations. Milan closed his eyes 
in fear and thought that his last hour had come. When he opened 
them again he saw that he was alone. His opponent had vanished 
like a soap bubble and with him the cards and the money from the 
stone flags. 

An orange-coloured moon swam on the horizon. A fresh breeze 
began to blow. The roar of waters in the depths became louder. 
Milan tentatively fingered the stone on which he was sitting, trying 
to collect himself, to remember where he was and what had hap- 
pened; then he rose heavily and as if on someone else’s legs moved 
slowly homeward to OkoliSte. 

Groaning and staggering he scarcely reached the door of his house 
before he fell like a wounded man, striking the door heavily with his 



body Those in the house, wakened by the noise, carried him to bed. 

For two months he lay in fever and delirium. It was thought that 
he would not survive. Pop Nikola came and consecrated the holy 
oils None the less he recovered and got up again, but as a different 
man. He was now a man old before his time, an eccentric who lived 
in a world apart, who spoke little and associated with other men 
as little as possible. On his face, which never smiled, was an expres- 
sion of painful and concentrated attention. He concerned himself 
only with his own house and went about his own business, as if he 
had never heard of company or of cards. 

During his illness he had told Pop Nikola all that had happened 
that night on the kapia, and later he told it all to two good friends of 
his, for he felt that he could not go on living with that secret on his 
mind. The people heard the rumours of what had happened but, as 
if what had actually happened had been a small matter, they added 
further details and elaborated the whole story, and then, as is usually 
the case, turned their attention elsewhere and forgot all about Milan 
and his experience. So what was left of the one-time Milan GlasiSanin 
lived, worked and moved among the townsfolk. The younger genera- 
tion only knew him as he was in their time and never suspected that 
he had been different. And he himself seemed to have forgotten 
everything When, descending from his house to the town, he crossed 
the bridge with his heavy slow sleepwalker’s step, he passed by the 
kapia without the least emotion, even without any memory of it. It 
never even crossed his mind that that sofa with its white stone seats 
and carefree crowd could have any connection with that terrible 
place, somewhere at the ends of the earth, where he had one night 
played his last game, staking on a deceiving card all that he pos- 
sessed, even his own life in this world and the next. 

Often Milan asked himself if all that night episode on the kapia 
had been only a dream which he had dreamt as he lay unconscious 
before the door of his house, the consequence and not the cause of 
his illness. To tell the truth, both Pop Nikola and those two friends in 
whom he had confided were more inclined to regard the whole of 
Milan’s tale as a hallucination, a fantasy which had appeared to him 
in a fever. For none of them believed that the devil played otuz bit 
or that he would take anyone he wished to destroy to the kapia But 
our experiences are often so heavy and clouded that it is no wonder 
that men justify themselves by the intervention of Satan himself, 
considering that this explains them or at least makes them more 
bearable. 

But whether true or not, with the devil’s help or without it, in 
dream or in fact, it was sure that Milan Glasifanin, since he had lost 



his health and his youth and a large sum of money overnight, had 
by a miracle been finally liberated for ever from his vice. And not 
only that. To the story of Milan Glasifanin was added yet another 
tale of yet another destiny, whose thread started also from the kapia 
The day after the night when Milan Glasiianm (in dream or in 
waking) had played his terrible final game on the kapia dawned a 
sunny autumn day. It was a Saturday. As always on Saturdays, the 
ViSegrad Jews, merchants with their male children, were gathered 
on the kapia. At leisure and in formal dress, with satin trousers and 
woollen waistcoats, with dull red shallow fezzes on their heads, they 
strictly observed the Sabbath Day, walking beside the river as if look- 
ing for someone in it. But for the most part they sat on the kapia, 
carrying on loud and lively conversations in Spanish, only usmg 
Serbian when they wanted to swear 
Among the first to arrive on the kapia that morning was Bukus 
Gaon, the eldest son of the pious, poor and honest barber, Avram 
Gaon. He was sixteen and still had not found permanent work or a 
regular occupation. The young man, unlike all the other Gaons, was 
somewhat scatter-brained and this had prevented him from behaving 
reasonably and settling down to a trade, and drove him to look for 
something higher and better for himself. When he wanted to sit 
down, he looked to see if the seat was clean. It was while doing this 
that he saw, in a crack between two stones, a thin line of shining 
yellow. That was the shine of gold, so dear to men’s eyes. He looked 
more closely. There could be no doubt; a ducat had somehow fallen 
there. The young man looked around him, to see if anyone was 
watching, and searched for something to pry loose the ducat which 
laughed at him from its hiding place. Then suddenly he remembered 
that it was a Saturday and that it would be a shame and a sin to do 
any kind of work. Excited and embarrassed, he went on sitting on 
that spot and did not move until noon. When it was time for lunch 
and all the Jews, old and young, had gone home, he found a thick 
barley stalk and, forgetting the sm and the holy day, carefully pried 
the ducat loose from between the stones. It was a real Hungarian 
ducat, thin and weighing no more than a dead leaf. He was late for 
lunch. When he sat down at the sparse table around which all thir- 
teen of them (eleven children, father and mother) were sitting, he 
did not hear how his father scolded him and called him a lazy 
wastrel who could not even be in time for lunch. His ears hummed 
and his eyes were dazzled. Before him opened those days of unheard- 
of luxury of which he had often dreamed. It seemed to him that he 
was carrying the sun in his pocket. 


152 



Next day, without much reflection, Bukus went to Ustamujid’s inn 
and edged his way into that little room where at almost any time 
of the day or night the cards were in play He had always dreamed 
of doing this, but had never had enough money to dare to go in and 
try his luck. Now he was able to realize that dream. 

There he passed several hours filled with anguish and emotion. At 
first they had all greeted him with disdain and mistrust. When they 
saw him change the Hungarian ducat they at once thought that he 
had stolen it from someone but they agreed to accept him and his 
stake (for if gamblers questioned the origin of every stake, the game 
would never begin). But then fresh miseries commenced for the be- 
ginner. Whenever he won, the blood rushed to his head and his eyes 
clouded with sweat and heat. When he made a rather greater loss it 
seemed to him that he stopped breathing and his heart died. But de- 
spite all his torments, each of which seemed insoluble, he none the 
less left the inn that evening with four ducats in his pocket. Though 
he was broken and feverish with emotion as if he had been beaten 
with fiery rods, he walked proud and erect. Before his glowing imagi- 
nation opened far and glorious prospects which threw a glittering 
sheen over his poverty and swept away the whole town down to its 
foundations. He walked with a solemn pace as though drunk. For the 
first time in his life he was able to feel not only the shimmer and the 
sound of gold but also its weight. 

That same autumn, though still young and green, Bukus became a 
gambler and a vagabond and left the family home. Old Gaon 
shrivelled up from shame and grief for his eldest son, and the whole 
Jewish community felt the misfortune as if it had been its own. Later 
he left the town and went out into the world with his evil gambler's 
destiny. And nothing more was ever heard of him for all those four- 
teen years. The cause of all that, they said, was that 'deviVs ducat' 
which he had found on the kapia and had pried loose on the Sabbath 
Day. 



XIII 




I t was the fourth year of the occupation. It seemed as if every- 
thing had somehow or other calmed down and ‘was working' 
Even if the sweet peace of Turkish times had not been restored, 
at least order had been established according to the new ideas 
But then there were once more troubles in the land, fresh troops 
arrived unexpectedly and a guard was once again mounted on 
the kapia. This was the way of it. 

The new authorities that year began recruiting m Bosnia and 
Herzegovina This piovoked great agitation among the people, 
especially the Turks. Fifty years before, when the Sultan had intro- 
duced the nizam (the first Turkish regular army), clothed, drilled 
and equipped in the European manner, they had revolted and waged 
a series of small but bloody wars, for they would not wear the 
infidel clothing and put on belts which crossed over the chest and 
so created the hated symbol of the cioss Now they had to put on 
that same odious ‘tight clothing' and that, furthermore, in the 
service of a foreign ruler of another faith. 

In the first years after the occupation, when the authorities had 
begun numbering houses and taking a census of the population, 
these measures had already excited mistrust among the Turks and 
stirred up undefined but deeply felt misgivings. 

As always in such cases, the most learned and respected of the 
Visegrad Turks met stealthily to discuss the significance of these 
measures and the attitude they should adopt towards them. 

One May morning these leaders gathered on the kapia as if by 
chance and occupied all the seats on the soia Peacefully drinking 
their coffee and looking straight in front of them, they talked in 
whispers of the new and suspicious measures of the authorities 
They were all ill at ease about the new ideas, the very nature 
of which was contrary to their ideas and habits, for each of them 
considered this interference by the authorities in his personal affairs 
and his family life as an unnecessary and incomprehensible humilia- 
tion. But no one knew how to interpret the real sense of this 


^54 



numbering, nor could suggest how it could best be resisted. Amongst 
them was Alihodja who otherwise rarely came to the kapia, for 
his right ear always throbbed painfully when he happened to 
look at those stone steps leading up to the sola. 

The Visegrad schoolmaster, Husseinaga, a learned and loquacious 
man, interpreted, as the most competent amongst them to do so, 
what this noting down of houses by number and this counting of 
men and children might mean. 

‘This has, it seems, always been an infidel custom; thirty years 
ago, if not more, there was a Vezir in Travnik, a certain Tahirpasha 
Stambolija. He was one of the converted, but false and insincere. 
He remained a Christian in his soul, as he had once been He kept, 
it is said, a bell beside him and when he wanted to call one of his 
servants he would nng this bell like a Christian priest until someone 
answered It was this Tahirpasha who began to number the houses 
in Travnik and on each house he nailed a tablet with the number 
(it was for this reason that he was known as “the nailer”). But 
the people rebelled and collected all those tablets from the houses, 
made a pile of them and set fire to it. Blood was about to flow for 
this, but luckily a report of this reached Stambul and he was recalled 
from Bosnia May all trace of him be abolished! Now this is some- 
thing of the same sort. The Schwabes want to have registers of 
everything, even our heads.’ 

They all stared straight in front of them and listened to the 
schoolmaster who was well known to prefer recounting long and 
detailed stories of the past to giving his own opinion shortly and 
clearly on what was taking place in the present. 

As always, Alihodja was the first to lose patience. 

This does not concern the Schwabes’ faith, Muderis Effendi; it 
concerns their interests. They are not playing and do not waste 
their time even when they are sleeping but look well to their own 
affairs. We cannot see today what all this means, but we shall 
see it in a month or two, or perhaps a year. For, as the late lamented 
Shemsibeg Brankovid used to say: "The Schwabes’ mines have long 
fuses!” This numbering of houses and men, or so I see it, is necessary 
for them because of some new tax, or else they are thinking of 
getting men for forced labour or for their army, or perhaps both. 
If you ask me what we should do, this is my opinion. We have 
not got the army to rise at once in revolt. That God sees and 
all men know. But we do not have to obey all that we are com- 
manded. No one need remember his number nor tell his age. Let 
them guess when each one of us was bom. If they go too far and 
interfere with our children and our honour, then we shall not 



give way but will defend ourselves, and then let it be as God 
wills!’ 

They went on discussing the unpalatable measures of the 
authonties for a long time, but in the mam they were in agreement 
with what Alihodja had recommended- passive resistance. Men 
concealed their ages or gave false information, making the excuse 
that they were illiterate And as for women no one even dared 
to ask about them, for that would have been considered a deadly 
insult. Despite all the instructions and threats of the authorities 
the tablets with the house numbers were nailed upside down or 
hidden away in places where they were invisible. Or else they 
immediately whitewashed their houses and, as if by chance, the 
house number was whitewashed too. 

Seeing that the resistance was deep-seated and sincere, though 
concealed, the authorities turned a blind eye, avoiding any strict 
application of the laws with all the consequences and disputes 
which would inevitably have ensued. 

Two years passed The agitation about the census had been for- 
gotten when the recruitment of young men, irrespective of faith 
and class, was actually put into force. Open rebellion broke out 
in Eastern Herzegovina, in which not only Turks but also Serbs 
took part. The leaders of the rebels tried to establish ties with 
foreign countries, especially with Turkey, and claimed that the 
occupation authorities had gone beyond the powers granted them 
at the Berlin Congress and that they had no right to recruit in 
the occupied districts which still remained under nominal Turkish 
suzerainty In Bosnia there was no organized resistance, but the 
revolt spread by way of Fo{a and Gora2da to the borders of the 
ViSegrad district Individual msurgents or the remnants of routed 
bands tried to seek refuge in the Sanjak or in Serbia, crossing the 
bridge at Viiegrad. As always in such circumstances, in addition 
to the rebellion, banditry began to flourish. 

So once more, after so many years, a guard was mounted on 
the kapia. Though it was winter and heavy snow had fallen, two 
gendarmes kept watch on the kapia day and night. They stopped all 
unknown or suspected persons crossing the bridge, interrogated 
them and inspected their belongings. 

A fortnight later a detachment of streifkorps appeared in the 
town and relieved the gendarmes on the kapia. The streiikorps 
had been organized when the rebellion in Herzegovina had begun 
to assume serious proportions. They were mobile storm troops, 
picked men equipped for action in diflicult terrain, and made up 
of well paid volunteers. Amongst them were men who had 

156 



responded to the first call-up with the occupation troops and did 
not want to return to their homes, but remained to serve in the 
streiikorps. Others had been seconded from the gendamaerie to 
the new mobile units. Finally, there were also a certain number of 
local inhabitants who served as informers and guides. 

Throughout that winter, which was neither short nor mild, a 
guard of two streiikorps men kept watch on the bridge. Usually 
the guard consisted of one stranger and one local man. They did 
not build a blockhouse, as the Turks had done during the Karageorge 
insurrection in Serbia There was no killing or cutting off of heads. 
But none the less this time, as always when the kapia was 
closed, there were unusual events which left their trace on the 
town. For hard times cannot pass without misfortune for some- 
one. 

Among the streiikorps men who mounted guard on the kapia was 
a young man, Gregor Fedun, a Ruthenian from Eastern Galicia. This 
young man was then in his twenty-third year, of gigantic stature but 
childlike mind, strong as a bear but modest as a girl. He had almost 
completed his military service when his regiment was sent to Bosnia. 
He had taken part in fighting at Magla] and on the Glasinac Moun- 
tains and had then spent eighteen months on garrison duty in Eastern 
Bosnia When his time was up, he had not wanted to go back to his 
Galician town of Kolomea and to his father’s house which was rich 
m children but in little else. He was in Pest with his group when the 
call for volunteers to enrol m the streiikorps was made. As a soldier 
who knew Bosnia through several months of fighting, Fedun was 
accepted at once. He was sincerely glad at the thought that he was 
again to see the Bosnian townships and hamlets where he had spent 
both hard and pleasant days, of which his memory recalled the days 
of hardship as more beautiful and lively even than the pleasant ones 
He melted with joy and was filled with pride, imagining the faces of 
his parents, brothers and sisters when they received the first silver 
fiorins which he would send them from his ample streiikorps pay. 
Above all he had the good fortune not to be sent into Eastern Herze- 
govina where the fighting with the insurgents was tiring and often 
very dangerous, but to the town on the Dnna where his duties con- 
sisted of patrolling and guard-keeping. 

There he spent the winter, stamping his feet and blowing on his 
fingers on the kapia in the clear frosty nights, when the stones 
cracked in the frost and the sky paled above the town so that the 
large autumn stars became tiny, wicked little candles There he 
awaited the spring and watched its first signs on the kapia: that dull, 
heavy booming of the ice on the Dnna which a man feels deep down 


157 



in his enti ails, and that sullen soughing of some new wind which has 
howled all night through the naked forests on the mountains close 
pressed above the bridge. 

The young man mounted guard in his turn and felt how the spring, 
with all Its signs on the earth and on the waters, was slowly entering 
into him also, flooding his whole being and troubling his senses and 
his thoughts. He kept watch and hummed all the Ruthenian songs 
which were sung in his own country. As he sang it seemed to him, 
more and more every spring day, as if he were waiting for someone 
on that exposed and windy spot. 

At the beginning of March, headquarters sent an order to the de- 
tachment guarding the bridge to double their precautions since, 
according to reliable information, the notorious brigand Jakov 
Cekrlija had crossed from Herzegovina into Bosnia and was now 
hiding somewhere near Visegrad whence, in all likelihood, he would 
try to reach either the Serbian or the Turkish frontier. The streifkorps 
men on guard were given a personal description of him, with the 
comment that the brigand, though physically small and insignificant, 
was very strong, daring and exceptionally cunning, and had already 
several times succeeded in escaping and outwitting the patrols that 
had surrounded him. 

Fedun had listened to this warning when making his report, and 
had taken it seriously as he did all official communications But he 
had considered it to be unnecessarily exaggerated, since he could not 
imagine how anyone could cross unperceived that ten paces which 
constituted the width of the bridge. Calm and unworried he passed 
several hours, by day and by night, on the kapia. His attention was 
indeed doubled, but it was not taken up with the appearance of 
Jakov, of whom there was neither sight nor sound, but with those 
countless signs and portents by which spring announced its arrival 
on the kapia. 

It is not easy to concentrate all one’s attention on a single object 
when one is twenty-three years old, when one’s body is quivering 
with strength and life and when around one, on all sides, spring is 
burgeoning, shining and filling the air with perfume The snow was 
melting in the ravines, the river ran swift and grey as smoked glass, 
the wind which blew from the north-east brought the breath of snow 
from the mountains and the first buds to the valleys. All this intoxi- 
cated and distracted Fedun as he paced out the space from one ter- 
race to the other or, when on night duty, leant against the parapet 
and hummed his Ruthenian songs to the accompaniment of the wind. 
By day or by night the feeling that he was waiting for someone never 
left him, a feeling tormenting and yet sweet, and which seemed to 

1^8 



find confirmation in all that was taking place around him, in the 
waters, the earth and the sky. 

One day about lunchtime a Turkish girl passed the guard. She was 
of the age when Turkish girls, not yet veiled in the heavy feridjab, 
no longer go with uncovered faces but wrap themselves in a large 
thin shawl which conceals the whole body, the hair and the hands, 
chin and forehead, but still leaves uncovered a part of the face: eyes, 
nose, mouth and cheeks She was in that short phase between child- 
hood and womanhood when the Moslem girls show innocently and 
gaily their still childish and yet womanly features which, perhaps 
even the next day, will be covered forever by the feridjah. 

There was not a living soul on the kapia. Fedun's fellow guard was 
a certain Stevan of Praca, one of the peasants attached to the streii- 
korps He was a man of a certain age, by no means averse to plum 
brandy, who sat drowsing, contrary to regulations, on the stone sofa. 

Fedun looked at the girl timidly and cautiously Around her 
floated her gaily-coloured shawl, waving and shimmering in the sun- 
light as if alive, moving with the gusts of wind and in rhythm with 
the girPs pace. Her calm lovely face was closely and tightly framed 
by the stretched weave of the shawl. Her eyes were downcast but 
flickering. So she passed before him and disappeared across the bridge 
into the market. 

The young man paced more briskly from one terrace to the other 
and kept an eye fixed on the market-place. Now it seemed to him 
that he really had someone for whom to wait. After half an hour— 
the noonday lull was still unbroken on the bridge— the Turkish girl 
returned from the market and again crossed before the troubled 
youth This time he looked at her a little longer and more boldly, and 
what was even more wonderful she too looked at him, a short but 
candid glance, with a sort of half-smile, almost cunningly but with 
that innocent cunning with which children get the better of one 
another at their games. Then she swayed away again, moving Slowly 
but none the less vanishing quickly from his sight, with a thousand 
bends and movements of the wide shawl wrapped about her young 
but sturdy figure. The oriental design and lively colours of that shawl 
could long be seen between the houses on the farther bank. 

Only then did the young man wake from his reverie. He stood in 
the same place and in the same position as he had been at the moment 
when she had passed before him. With a start he fingered his rifle and 
looked around him with the sensation of a man who has let slip his 
opportunity. Stevan was still dozing in the deceptive March sun. It 
seemed to the young man that both of them had in some way failed 
in their duty and that a whole army platoon could have passed by 

159 



them without him bemg able to say how many of them there were, 
or what significance they might have had for himself or for others 
Ashamed of himself, he woke Stevan m exaggerated zeal and they 
both remained on guard until their relief arrived. 

All that day, both when he was off duty and while he was mount- 
ing guard, the picture of the young Turkish girl passed like a vision 
coimtless times through his mind. Next day, once again about noon 
when there were very few people on the bridge, she again crossed. 
Fedun agam saw that face framed in the bnghtly-coloured shawl. All 
was as It had been the day before. Only their glances were longer, 
livelier and bolder, almost as if they were playing a game together 
Stevan was again drowsing on the stone bench and later, as he always 
did, swore that he had not been asleep and that even when he was 
at home in bed he could not close an eye. On the way back the girl 
seemed almost ready to stop, looked the streiikorps boy straight m 
the eyes while he muttered a couple of vague and unimportant 
words, feeling as he did so that his legs failed him through emotion 
and forgetting completely where he was. 

Only in dreams do we dare so much. When the girl was once more 
lost to sight on the farther bank the young man shiverecl with fright. 
It was incredible that a young Turkish girl should think of looking 
at an Austrian soldier. Such an unheard-of and imprecedented thing 
could only happen in dreams, in dreams or in spring on the kapia. 
He knew very well that nothing in this land or in his position was as 
scandalous and as dangerous as to touch a Moslem woman. They had 
told him that when he had been in the army and again in the streif- 
korps. The punishment for such daring was a heavy one. There had 
been some who had paid with their lives at the hands of the insulted 
and infuriated Turks. All that he knew, and most sincerely desired to 
keep the orders and regulations, but none the less he acted contrary 
to Aem. The misfortune of imlucky men lies in just this, that those 
things which for them are impossible and forbidden become in a 
moment easy and attainable, or at least appear so. Yet when once 
such things are firmly fixed in their desires they seem once again as 
they were, unattainable and forbidden, with all the ccoisequences 
that they have for those who, despite everything, still attempt them. 

On the third day too, about noon, the Turkish girl appeared. And 
as it is in dreams all took place as he would have wished, like a unique 
reality to which all else was subordinate. Stevan was again drowsing, 
convinced and always ready to convince others that he had not 
closed an eye; there were no passers-by on the kapia. The young man 
spoke again, muttering a few words, and the girl slowed her pace and 
replied, equally timidly and vaguely. 

i6o 



The dangerous and incredible game went on. On the fourth day 
the girl in passing, choosing a moment when there was no one on 
the kapia, asked in a whisper when he would next be on guard. He 
told her that he would be on duty on the kapia again at dusk. 

‘I will bring my old grandmother to the market-place, where she 
is to spend the night, and I will return alone,* whispered the girl with- 
out stopping or turning her head, but darting a provocative and 
eloquent glance at him. And in each of those very ordinary words 
was the hidden joy that she would soon see him again 
Six hours later Fedun was once more on the kapia with his sleepy 
comrade. After the rain a chill twilight had fallen which seemed to 
him full of promise. Passers-by became fewer and fewer Then on 
the road from Osojmca the Turkish girl appeared, wrapped in her 
shawl, its colours dimmed by the twilight. Beside her walked an old, 
bowed Turkish woman bundled up in a thick black leridjah. She 
walked almost on all fours, supporting herself by a staff in her right 
hand and holding on to the girl with her left. 

They passed by Fedun. The girl walked slowly, accommodating 
her pace to the slow walk of the old crone whom she was leading 
Her eyes, made larger by the shadows of early dusk, now gazed 
boldly and openly into the young man*s as if they could not look 
away from him When they disappeared into the market-place, a 
shiver passed through the youth and he began to pace with more 
rapid steps from one terrace to the other as if he wanted to make up 
for what he had lost. With an excitement that was almost fear he 
waited for the girVs return. Stevan was dozing 
‘What will she say to me when she passes?' thought the youth 
‘What shall I say to her? Will she perhaps suggest meeting some- 
where at night in a quiet spot?' He quivered with delight and the ex- 
citement of danger lay in that thought 
A whole hour passed thus, waiting, and the half of another, and 
still the girl did not return. But even in that waiting there was delight 
His eagerness rose with the falling darkness. At last, instead of the 
girl, his relief came. But this time not only the two streiikorps men 
who were to remain there on guard but also the sergeant-major 
Draienovid in person. A strict man with a short black beard, he 
ordered Fedun and Stevan in a sharp and strident voice to go to the 
dormitory as soon as they reached barracks and not to leave it until 
further orders. The blood rushed to Fedun's face at the idea that he 
was in some way to blame. 

The huge chill dormitory with twelve regularly spaced out beds 
was empty. The men were all at supper or in the town Fedun and 
Stevan waited, troubled and impatient, thinking things over and 

F i6r 



making vam guesses why the sergeant-major had been so stern and 
had so unexpectedly confined them to barracks. After an hoim, when 
the first of the soldiers began to come m to sleep, a corporal burst in 
and ordered them loudly and harshly to follow him. From every- 
thing about him, the two felt that the severity against them was in- 
creasing and that all this presaged no good As soon as they left the 
dormitory they were separated and questioned. 

The night wore on. Even the last hghts m the town were ex- 
tinguished, but the windows of the barracks still blazed with light. 
From time to nme there was a ring at the main gates, the clink of keys 
and the thud of heavy doors. Orderhes came and went, hurrying 
through the dark and sleeping town between the barracks and the 
konak, where lamps also burned on the first floor. It could be seen 
from all these signs that something unusual was afoot. 

When, about eleven o'clock at night, they brought Fedun into the 
sergeant-major’s ofiice, it seemed to him that days and weeks had 
passed from those moments on the kapia. On the table burned a 
metal oil-lamp with a shade of green porcelain. By it was seated the 
major, Krimar. The hght fell on his arms up to the elbows, but the 
upper half of his body and his head were in shadow cast by the green 
shade. The young man knew that pale, full, almost womanly face, 
clean-shaven, with fine moustaches and dark rings around the eyes. 
The soldiers feared the slow heavy words of this big placid officer. 
There were few of them who could endure for long the gaze of those 
large grey eyes, and who did not stammer when replying to his ques- 
tions, in which each word was softly yet separately, distinctly and 
clearly enunciated from the first to the last syllable as at school or m 
the theatre. A little away from the table stood the sergeant-major 
Drazenovid. The whole upper part of his body also was in shadow 
and only his hands were strongly illuminated, hanging limply at his 
side; on one finger glistened a heavy gold rmg. 

Draienovid opened the interrogation: 

‘Tell us how you passed the time between five and seven o’clock 
while you were with assistant streilkorps private Stevan Kalacan on 
guard duty on the kapia?" 

The blood rushed to Fedun’s head. Every man passed his time as 
best he could, but no one had ever thought that he would later have 
to answer for it before some strict judge and give account of every- 
thing that had taken place, to the minutest detail, to the most hidden 
thoughts and the last minute. No one, least of all when one is twenty- 
three years old and that time has been spent on the kapia in spring. 
What was he to answer? Those two hours on guard had passed as 
they had always done, as they had done the day before and the day 

162 



before that But at that moment he could not remember anything 
everyday and usual which he could report. Only incidental, for- 
bidden thmgs rose m his memory, things that happen to everyone 
but which are not told to one’s supenors; that Stevan had dozed as 
usual, that he, Fedun, had exchanged a few words with an unknown 
Turkish girl, that then, as dusk was falling, he had sung softly and 
fervently all the songs of his own country awaiting the girl’s return 
and with it something exciting and unusual. How hard it was to 
reply, impossible to tell everything but embarrassing to remain 
silent. And he must hurry, for time was passing and that only in- 
creased his confusion and embarrassment. How long had his silence 
lasted already? 

‘Well?’ said the major. Everyone knew that ‘well’ of his, clear, 
smooth and forceful like the sound of some strong, complex and well 
oiled machine. 

Fedun began to stammer and get confused as though he felt him- 
self guilty from the very start. 

The night wore on, but the lamps were not extinguished either in 
the barracks or in the konak Interrogations, evidence and the con- 
frontation of witnesses followed one another. Others who had 
mounted guard on the kapia that day were also interrogated. But it 
was clear that the net was closing around Fedun and Stevan and, in 
their interrogation, about the old Turkish woman whom a young girl 
had taken across the bridge. 

It seemed to the young man as if all the magical and inextricable 
responsibilities that he had felt in his dreams were falling on his 
shoulders. Before dawn he was confronted with Stevan. The peasant 
closed his eyes cunningly and spoke in a forced /oice, continually 
harking back to the fact that he was an illiterate man, a peasant, and 
sheltering himself from all responsibility by always referring to ‘that 
Mr Fedun’ as he insisted on calling his companion on guard. 

That’s the way to answer, the young man thought to himself His 
entrails were crying out from hunger and he himself was trembling 
all over from emotion though it was still not clear to him what this 
was all about and where exactly lay the question of his guilt or inno- 
cence. But morning brought complete explanation. 

All through that night a fantastic round-dance whirled about him; 
in its centre was the major, cold and implacable. Himself dumb and 
unmoving, he allowed no one else to be silent or at peace. In bearing 
and appearance he no longer seemed like a man, but like duty em- 
bodied, the terrible ministrant of justice inaccessible to weakness or 
sentiment, gifted with supernatural strength and immune from the 
ordinary human needs of food, rest or sleep. When dawn broke, 

163 



Fedun was once again brought before the major There was now in 
the oflSce, besides the major and Dra2enovid, an armed gendarme 
and a woman who, at first sight, seemed unreal to the young man. 
The lamp had been extinguished. The room, facing north, was cold 
and in semi-darkness. The young man felt as if this were a continua- 
tion of his dream of the night before which refused to pale and 
vanish even in the light of day. 

‘Is that the man who was on guard’’ Dra?.enovid asked the woman 

With a great effort which caused him pain Fedun only then looked 
full at her She was the Moslem girl of the day before, only bare- 
headed without her shawl and with her heavy chestnut plaits 
wrapped around her head. She was wearing bnghtly coloured 
Turkish trousers, but the rest of her dress, blouse, sash and bolero, 
was that of the Serbian girls from the villages on the high plateau 
above the town. Without her shawl, she seemed older and sturdier. 
Her face seemed different, her mouth large and bad-tempered, her 
eyelids reddened and her eyes clear and flashing as if the shadows of 
the day before had fled from them. 

‘It is,’ the woman replied indifferently in a hard voice which was 
as new and unusual to Fedun as her present appearance. 

Draienovid went on asking her how many times in all she had 
crossed the bridge, what she had said to Fedun and he to her. She re- 
plied for the most part precisely, but proudly and indifferently. 

‘Good, Jelenka, and what did he say to you the last time you 
crossed’’ 

‘He said something but I don’t know exactly what, for I was not 
listening but only thinking how I could get Jakov across ’ 

‘You were thinking of that’’ 

‘Of that,’ answered the woman unwillingly She was clearly worn 
out and did not want to say more than she must. But the sergeant- 
major was inexorable. In a threatening voice which betrayed his con- 
viction that he must be answered without argument he forced the 
woman to repeat all that she had said at her first interrogation at the 
konak. 

She defended herself, shortened and skipped various bits of her 
earlier evidence, but he always checked her and by sharp and skilful 
questioning made her go back over it all again. 

Little by little the whole truth was laid bare. Her name was 
Jelenka and she came from the village of Tasid in Upper Lijeska. Last 
autumn the haiduk Jakov Cekrlija had come into her district to pass 
the winter hidden in a stable above her village. They had brought him 
food and clothing from her house. For the most part it had been she 
who had brought it. They had liked the look of each other and had 

164 



become lovers. When the snow began to melt and the streUkorps 
squads came more frequently, Jakov had decided to cross into Serbia 
at all costs. At that time of year the Dnna was hard to cross even if it 
had not been patrolled and there had not been a permanent guard on 
the bridge She had gone with him, determmed to help him even at 
the risk of her life They had first descended to Lijeska and then to 
a cave above OkoliSte. Earlier, on Glasmac, Jakov had obtained some 
Turkish women’s clothes from some gipsies; a fendjab, Turkish 
trousers and a shawl. Then she, on his instructions, began to cross 
the bridge at a time when there were not many Turks about, since 
one of them might ask whose was that unknown girl, and m order 
that the guard might grow accustomed to her. Thus she crossed three 
days running, and then decided to take Jakov with her. 

‘And why did you take him across when this particular soldier 
was on guard’’ 

‘Because he seemed to me the softest of them.’ 

‘So?’ 

‘So’ 

At the sergeant-major’s insistence the woman continued. When 
everything had been prepared, Jakov had wrapped himself in the 
feridjah and just as it was beginning to get dark she took him dis- 
guised as her old grandmother across the bridge past the guard. The 
guard had noticed nothing, for this young man was looking at her 
and not at the old woman, while the other, older guard was sitting 
on the sofa dozing. 

When they got to the market-place, they had taken the precaution 
of not going nght across it, but had used the side-streets. It was this 
had proved their undoing. They had lost their way in the town, 
which neither of them knew, and instead of coming out at the bridge 
across the Rzav and thus joining the road which led from the town 
towards both frontiers, they had found themselves in front of a 
Turkish caf4 just as some people were coming out One of them was 
a Turkish gendarme, bom in the town. This closely wrapped up old 
woman and the girl whom he had never seen before seemed suspect 
to him, and he followed them. He kept them in sight as far as the 
Rzav. Then he came nearer to ask them who they were and where 
they were going. Jakov, who had been watching him attentively 
through his face-veil, considered that the moment had come to flee. 
He threw off his feridjah, and pushed Jelenka at the gendarme so 
violently that they both lost their footing (‘for he is small and in- 
significant to look at, but as strong as the earth and courageous above 
all other men’). She, as she calmly and clearly confessed, tangled hor- 
self with the legs of the gendarme. By the time that the gendarme had 

Ids 



freed himself of her, Jakov had already rushed across the Rzav as if 
it had been a stream, though the water was above his knees, and was 
lost in the willow clumps on the farther side. Then they had taken 
her to the koaak, beaten and threatened her, but she had nothing 
more to say and would say nothing more. 

In vain the sergeant-major tried evasive questions, flatteries and 
threats to get something more out of the girl, to learn from her about 
others who helped or sheltered bandits, or about Jakov’s further in- 
tentions. All this had not the slightest effect on her. She had spoken 
freely enough of what she wanted to tell but despite all Dra2enovid’s 
efforts they could not get a word out of her about what she did not 
want to tell. 

‘It would be better for you to tell us all you know than for us to 
question and torture Jakov who has surely by now been caught on 
the frontier.’ 

‘Caught who? Him? Ha, Ha!’ 

The girl looked at the sergeant-major with pity, as at a man who 
does not know what he is talking about, and the right corner of her 
upper lip rose disdainfully. In fact the movement of this upper lip, 
which looked like a wnthing leech, expressed her feelings of anger, 
disdain or pride, whenever those feelings grew more than she could 
express in words. That writhing movement gave for a moment to her 
otherwise beautiful and regular face a troubled and impleasant ex- 
pression. Then with some quite childlike and fervent expression 
completely in contrast to that ugly writhing she looked out of the 
window as a peasant looks at a field when he wants to gauge the in- 
fluence of the weather on the harvest. 

‘God help you! It’s dawn now. From last night till now he has had 
time to get across all Bosnia, not merely to cross a frontier only an 
hour or two’s march away. I know that much. You can beat me and 
kill me, I came with him for that, but him you will never see again. 
Don’t even dream of it! Ha!’ 

Her upper lip writhed and lifted and her whole face seemed sud- 
denly older, more experienced, bold and ugly. And when that lip 
suddenly ceased to writhe, her face again took on that childlike ex- 
pression of bold and innocent daring. 

Not knowing what more to do, Dra2enovi<f looked at the major, 
who gave a sign to send the girl away. Then he resumed the interro- 
gation of Fedun. This could no longer be either long or hard. The 
young man admitted everything and had nothing to put forward in 
his own defence, not even what Dra2enovi<5 himself had hinted at in 
his questions. Not even the major's words which contained a merci- 
less and implacable judgment, but in which none the less there was 


i66 



restrained pain because of their own severity, could wake the youth 
from his torpor. 

‘I had always considered you, Fedun,* KrJmar said in German, ‘a 
serious young man, conscious of your duties and of your aim in life, 
and I had thought that one day you would become a perfect soldier, 
a credit to our unit. But you have been blinded by the first female 
animal to run in front of your nose. You have behaved like a weak- 
ling, like one to whom serious work cannot be entrusted. I am forced 
to hand you over to court-martial. But whatever its sentence may 
be, your greatest punishment will be to know that you have not 
shown yourself worthy of the confidence placed in you and that at 
the right moment you were unable to behave at your post like a man 
and a soldier. Now go!’ 

Not even these words, heavy, curt, carefully enunciated, could 
bring anything fresh to the young man’s mind He felt all that al- 
ready. The appearance and speech of that woman, the bandit’s mis- 
tress, the behaviour of Stevan and the whole course of that short en- 
quiry had suddenly revealed to him in its true light his thoughtless, 
naive and unpardonable spring fever on the kapia. The major’s words 
only seemed to him to place the official seal on all that, they were 
more necessary to the major himself, in order to satisfy some un- 
written but eternal demand for law and order, than to Fedun. As be- 
fore a prospect of unsuspected grandeur, the young man found him- 
self faced with a knowledge that he could not grasp; the meaning of 
a few moments of forgetfulness in an evil hour and m a dangerous 
place Had they been lived through and remained unknown, there on 
the kapia, they would have meant nothing at all; one of those youth- 
ful pranks later told to friends during dull patrol duties at night. But 
thus, reduced to a question of definite responsibility, they meant 
everything They meant more than death, they meant the end of 
everything, an unwanted and unworthy end. There would be no 
more full and frank explanations either to himself or to comrades. 
There w^ould be no more letters from Kolomea, no more family 
photographs, no money orders such as he had sent home with pride. 
It was the end of one who has deceived himself and allowed others 
to deceive him. 

Therefore he found not a word to reply to the major. 

The supervision over Fedun was not particularly strict. They gave 
him breakfast, which he ate as though with someone else’s mouth, 
and ordered him to pack up his personal effects, hand in his arms and 
all government property and be ready to leave at ten o’clock accom- 
panied by a gendarme by the postal courier for Sarajevo, where he 
would be handed over to the garrison court. 

167 



While the young man was taking down his things from the shelf 
above his bed, those of his comrades who were still in the dormitory 
tiptoed out, closing the door carefully and silently behind them. 
Around him grew that circle of loneliness and deep silence which is 
always formed around a man whom ill fortune has struck, as around 
a sick animal. First he took off its hooks the black tablet on which 
his name, rank, detachment number and unit were written in oil 
colours in German and placed it on his knees, with the writing down. 
On the black back of the tablet the young man scribbled hastily with 
a scrap of chalk: ‘All that I leave please send to my father at Kolomea. 
I send greetings to all my comrades and beg my superiors to pardon 
me. G. Fedun ’ Then he looked once more through the window, 
relishing that little piece of the outside world that he was able to see 
through its narrow frame. Then he took down his rifle, loaded it with 
a single charge of ball still sticky with grease. Then he took off his 
shoes and ivith a penknife cut his stocking over his big toe, lay down 
on the bed, wrapped his arms and legs around the rifle so that the top 
of the barrel was pressed firmly beneath his chm, shifted his right leg 
so that the hole in his stocking fitted over the trigger and pressed. The 
sound of the shot rang through the barracks. 

After a great decision, everything becomes simple and easy. The 
doctor came. A Commission of Enquiry was held and attached to its 
findings a record in duplicate of Fedun’s interrogation. 

Then arose the question of Fedun’s bunal. Draienovid was ordered 
to go to Pop Nikola and discuss the matter with him; could Fedun be 
buried in the graveyard even though he had taken his own life, and 
would the priest agree to conduct the service, for the deceased was 
by faith a Uniate. 

In the last year Pop Nikola had suddenly grown old and weak in 
his legs, so he had taken as assistant for his great parish Pop Joso, a 
taciturn and nervous sort of man, thin and black as a spent match. 
In the previous few months, he had carried out almost all the duties 
of the priest and the services in the town and villages, while Pop 
Nikola, who could only move with difficulty, dealt mainly with 
what he could do at home or in the church next to his house. 

By the major’s order, Draienovid went to Pop Nikola. The old man 
received him lying on a divan; by him stood Pop Joso. After 
Draienovid had explained the circumstances of Fedun’s death and 
the question of his burial, both priests remained silent for a moment. 
Seeing that Pop Nikola did not speak. Pop Joso began first, timidly 
and xmcertainly; the matter was exceptional and unusual, there were 
difficultly both in the canons of the church and in established ctis- 
tom, but if it could be shown that the suicide had not been of sound 


i68 



mind then something might be done. But then Pop Nikola sat up on 
his hard and narrow couch, covered with an old and faded rug. His 
body once again assumed that monumental form which it had once 
had when he walked through the market-place and was greeted on 
all sides. The first word that he said illuminated his broad and still 
ruddy face, with his huge moustaches which tangled in his beard 
and his heavy almost white eyebrows, thick and bushy, the face of 
a man who has learnt from birth how to think independently, to give 
his opinion sincerely and to defend it well. 

Without hesitation and without big words he answered both priest 
and sergeant-major directly: 

‘Now that the misfortune has happened, there is nothing more to 
be done about it. Who with a sound mind would ever raise his hand 
against himself? And who would dare to take it on his soul to bury 
him as if he were without faith, somewhere behind a fence and with- 
out a priest? But you, sir, go and give orders that the dead man be pre- 
pared and we shall bury him as soon as we can. In the graveyard, 
most certainly! I will sing his requiem. Later, if ever some priest of 
his law should happen to pass this way, let him add or alter as he 
wishes, should he not find everything to his liking ' 

When Draienovid had left, he turned once more to Pop Joso, 
who was astonished and humiliated. 

‘How could we forbid a Christian to be buried in the graveyard? 
And why should I not sing his requiem^ Isn't it enough that he had 
bad luck when he was alive^ There, on the other side, let those ask 
about his sins who will ask all the rest of us about ours.' 

Thus the young man who had made his mistake on the kapia re- 
mained for ever in the town. He was buried the following morning. 
Pop Nikola sang the requiem, assisted by the sacristan Dimitrije. 

One by one his comrades of the streifkorps filed past the grave and 
each threw on it a handful of earth. While two sextons worked 
rapidly, they stood there a few seconds longer as if waiting for 
orders, looking across to the far side of the river where, close to their 
own barracks, rose a straight white column of smoke There, on the 
level patch of grass above the barracks, they were burning the blood- 
stained straw from Fedun's mattress. 

The cruel fate of the young streifkorps boy, whose name no one 
ever remembered and who had paid with his life for a few spring 
moments of inattention and emotion on the kapia, was one of those 
incidents for which the townspeople had much understanding and 
long remembered and repeated. The memory of that sensitive and 
unlucky youth lasted far longer than the guard on the kapia. 

By next autumn the insurrection in Herzegovina had fizzled out. 

169 



A few of the more important leaders, M?5Slems and Serbs, fled to 
Montenegro or Turkey. There remained only a few haiduks who in 
fact never had much real connection with the insurrection about 
conscription but had worked for themselves. Then those too were 
either captured or driven away. Herzegovina was pacified. Bosnia 
gave recruits without resistance. But the departure of the first re- 
cruits was neither simple nor easy. 

Not more than loo young men were taken from the entire dis- 
trict, but on the day they were mustered before the konak, peasants 
with their bags and a few townsmen with their wooden chests, it 
seemed as if there were plague and uproar in the town. Many of the 
recruits had been drinking steadily from early morning and mixing 
their drinks The peasants were in clean white shirts There were 
few who had not been drinking and these sat near their belongings, 
drowsing behind a wall. The majority were excited, flushed with 
drink and sweating in the heat of the day. Four or five boys from the 
same village would embrace, and then put their heads close together 
and swaying like a living forest begin a harsh and long-drawn chant- 
ing as if they were the only people in the world. 

‘Oy my mai-ai-ai-ai-den! O-o-o-y!’ 

A far greater commotion than that made by the recruits them- 
selves was made by the women, mothers, sisters and other relatives 
of the young men, who had come from distant villages to say fare- 
well, to see them for the last time, to weep, to wail and to give them 
some last gift or final sign of love. The square near the bridge was 
packed with women. They sat there as if turned to stone, talked 
among themselves and from time to time wiped away their tears 
with the fringes of their kerchiefs. In vain it had been earlier ex- 
plained to them in their villages that the young men were going 
neither to war nor to slavery, but that they would serve the Emperor 
in Vienna, and be well fed, well clothed and well shod; that after a 
term of two years they would return home, and that young men 
from all the other parts of the Empire served in the army, and that 
they served for a three-year term. All that passed over their heads 
like the wind, foreign and completely incomprehensible. They 
listened only to their instincts and would only be guided by them. 
These ancient and inherited instincts brought tears to their eyes and 
a wail to their throats, forced them persistently to follow as long as 
they could and try to get a last glance at him whom they loved more 
than life and whom an unknown Emperor was carrying off into an 
unknown land, to unknown trials and tasks. In vain even now the 
gendarmes and officials from the konak went among them and 
assured them that there was no reason for such exaggerated grief. 


170 



and advised them not to block the way nor rush after the recruits 
and create trouble and disorder, for they would all return hale and 
hearty. But it was all in vain. The women listened to them, agreed to 
all they said dully and humbly and then returned once more to their 
tears and wailing. It seemed as if they loved their tears and their 
wailing as much as they loved those for whom they wept. 

When the time came to move and the young men were drawn up 
in four ranks in the correct manner and moved across the bridge, a 
crowding and rushing began in which even the most equable of gen- 
darmes could hardly retain his composure. The women ran and tore 
themselves from the hands of the gendarmes in order to be beside 
someone of their own, pushing and overturning one another. Their 
wails were mingled with cries, entreaties and last moment recom- 
mendations. Some of them even ran in front of the line of recruits 
whom four gendarmes were keeping in file and fell under their feet, 
clutching at their bare breasts and shouting- 

‘Over my body! Over my body!’ 

The men lifted them up with difficulty, carefully disentangling 
boots and spurs from dishevelled hair and disordered skirts. 

Some of the recruits, ashamed, tried by angry gestures to make the 
women return home. But most of the young men sang or shouted, 
increasing the general disorder. The few townsmen among them, pale 
with emotion, sang together in the town manner: 

'In Sarajevo and Bosnia 
Every mother mourns 
Who has sent her son 
As a recruit for the Emperor 

This song created even greater weeping. 

When, somehow or other, they crossed the bridge towards which 
the whole convoy was headed and took the Sarajevo road, all the 
townspeople were awaiting them, drawn up on each side of the road, 
in order to see the recruits and to weep for them as if they were 
being taken away to be shot. There were many women there too who 
wept for every one of them although none of their own relations was 
amongst those who were going. For every woman has some reason 
to weep and weeping is sweetest when it is for another’s sorrow. 

But little by little the ranks along the road became sparser. Even 
some of the peasant women gave up. The most persistent were the 
mothers who ran around the convoy as though they were fifteen 
years old, leapt the ditch at the side of the road from one side to the 
other and tried to outwit the gendarmes and stay as long as possible 
close to their sons. When they saw that, the young men themselves. 


171 



pale with emotion and a sort of embarrassment, turned and shouted: 

‘Get along home when I tell you!’ 

But the mothers went on for long, blind to all save the sons that 
were being taken from them and listening to nothing save their own 
weeping. 

But even these troublous days passed. The people dispersed to their 
villages and the town again grew calm. When letters and the first 
photographs from the recruits m Vienna began to arrive, everything 
became easier and more tolerable The women wept for long over 
those letters and photographs, but more gently and more calmly. 

. The streilkorps was disbanded and left the barracks. For a long 
time there had been no guard on the kapia and the townsfolk went 
on sitting there as they had done before. 

Two years quickly pass. That autumn the first recruits returned 
from Vienna, clean, close-cropped and well-fed. The people clus- 
tered around them as they told tales of army life and of the greatness 
of the cities they had seen, their talk interlarded with strange names 
and unfamiliar expressions At the next call-up there was less weep- 
ing and agitation. 

Generally speaking, everything became easier and more normal 
Young men grew up who no longer had any clear or lively memory 
of Turkish times and who had to a great extent accepted the new 
ways. But on the kapia they still lived according to the ancient cus- 
tom of the town. Without regard for the new fashions of dress, new 
professions and new trades, the townspeople still went on meeting 
there as they had done for centuries past, in those conversations 
which had always been and still were a real need of their hearts and 
their imaginations The recruits went to their service without uproar 
and without commotion. The haiduks were mentioned only in old 
men’s tales. The streilkorps was forgotten as completely as that 
earlier Turkish guard when there had been a blockhouse on the 
kapia. 


172 



XIV 




L ife in the town beside the bridge became more and more 
animated, seemed more and more orderly and fuller, assuming 
an even pace and a hitherto tinknown balance, that balance 
towards which all life tends, everywhere and at all times, 
and which is only rarely, partially and temporarily achieved. 

In the far off cities unknown to the townsmen whence at that 
time the power and administration over these districts originated, 
there was— in the last quarter of the nineteenth century— one of 
those short and rare lulls in human relationships and social events. 
Something of that lull could be felt even in these remote districts, 
just as a great calm at sea may be felt even in the most distant 
creeks. 

Such were those three decades of relative prosperity and apparent 
peace in the Franz-Josef manner, when many Europeans thought 
that there was some infallible formula for the realization of a 
centuries-old dream of full and happy development of individuality 
in freedom and in progress, when the nineteenth century spread 
out before the eyes of millions of men its many-sided and deceptive 
prosperity and created its fata morgana of comfort, security and 
happiness for all and everyone at reasonable prices and even on 
cr^t terms. But to this remote Bosnian township only broken 
echoes penetrated of all this life of the nineteenth century, and 
those only to the extent and in the form in which this backward 
oriental society could receive them and in its own manner under- 
stand and accept them 

After the first years of distrust, misunderstanding and hesitation, 
when the first feeling of transience had passed, the town began 
to find its place in the new order of things. The people found 
order, work and security. That was enough to ensure that here 
too life, outward life at least, set out ‘on the road of perfection 
and progress’. Everything else was fiushed away into that dark 
background of consciousness where live and ferment the basic 
feelings and indestructible beliefs of individual races, faiths and 


173 



castes, which, to all appearances dead and buried, are prepanng for 
later far-off times unsuspected changes and catastrophes without 
which, it seems, peoples cannot exist and above all the peoples 
of this land. 

The new authorities, after the first misunderstandings and clashes, 
left among the townspeople a definite impression of firmness and 
of permanence (they were themselves impregnated with this belief 
without which there can be no strong and permanent authonty). 
They were impersonal and indirect and for that reason more easily 
bearable than the former Turkish rulers. All that was cruel and 
grasping was concealed by the dignity and glitter of traditional 
forms. The people still feared the authorities but in much the same 
way as they feared sickness and death and not as one fears malice, 
misery and oppression. The representatives of the new authonty, 
military as well as civil, were for the most part newcomers to the 
land and unskilful m their dealings with the people and were 
themselves of little importance, but with every step they made 
they felt themselves to be part of a greater mechanism and that 
behind each one of them stood more powerful men and greater 
organizations in long rows and countless gradations That gave 
them a standing which far surpassed their own personality and a 
magic influence to which it was easier to submit. By their titles 
which appeared to be great, by their calm and their European 
customs, they aroused among the people, from whom they so 
greatly differed, feelings of confidence and respect and did not 
excite envy or real criticism, even though they were neither pleasant 
nor loved. 

On the other hand, after a certain time, even these newcomers 
were unable to avoid completely the influence of the unusual 
oriental milieu in which they had to live. Their children introduced 
the children of the townspeople to strange phrases and foreign 
names, brought with them new games and toys, but equally they 
easily picked up from the local children the old songs, ways of 
speech, oaths and the traditional games of knucklebones, leap-frog 
and the like. It was the same with the grown-ups; they too brought 
a new order, with unfamiliar words and habits, but at the same 
time they too accepted every day somethmg of the speech and 
manner of life of the older inhabitants. It is true that the local 
people, especially the Christians and Jews, began to look more 
and more like the newcomers in dress and behaviour, but the 
newcomers themselves did not remain unchanged or imtouched 
by the milieu in which they had to live. Many of these officials, 
the fiery Magyar or the haughty Pole, crossed the bridge with 


174 



reluctance and entered the town with disgust and, at first, were 
a world apart, hke drops of oil in water. Yet a year or so later 
they could be found sitting for hours on the kapia, smoking through 
thick amber cigarette-holders and, as if they had been bom in the 
town, watching the smoke expand and vanish under the clear 
sky m the motionless air of dusk; or they would sit and wait for 
supper with the local notables on some green hillock, with plum 
brandy and snacks and a little bouquet of basil before them, 
conversing leisurely about trivialities or drinking slowly and 
occasionally munchmg a snack as the townsmen knew how to do 
so well. There were some among these newcomers, officials or 
artisans, who married in the town and had decided never to leave it. 

But for none of the townspeople did the new life mean the 
realization of what they felt deep down within themselves and 
had always desired; on the contrary all of them, Moslems and 
Christians alike, had taken their place in it with many and definite 
reservations, but these reservations were secret and concealed, 
whereas life was open and powerful with new and apparently 
great possibilities. After a longer or shorter period of wavering, most 
of them fell in with the new ideas, did their busmess, made fresh 
acquisitions, and lived according to the new ideas and customs 
which offered greater scope and, it seemed, gave greater chances 
to every individual. 

Not that the new existence was in any way less subject to 
conditions or less restricted than in Turkish times, but it was easier 
and more humane, and those conditions and restrictions were now 
far away and skilfully enforced, so that the individual did not 
feel them directly. Therefore it seemed to everyone as if the life 
around him had suddenly grown wider and clearer, more varied 
and fuller. 

The new state, with its good administrative apparatus, had 
succeeded in a painless manner, without brutality or commotion, 
to extract taxes and contributions from the local people which 
the Turkish authorities had extracted by crude and irrational 
methods or by simple plunder; and, moreover, it got as much or 
more, even more swiftly and surely. 

Even as the gendarmes, in their own time, had replaced the 
soldiers and after the soldiers had come the officials, so now, after 
the officials, came the merchants. Felling began in the forests and 
brought with it foreign contractors, engineers and workers, and 
provided varied sources of gain for the ordinary people and traders, 
with changes in dress and speech. The first hotel was built, of 
which we shall have much to say later. Canteens and workshops 


m 



sprang up which had not been known hitherto. Besides the Spanish 
speaking Jews, the Sephardi, who had been living in the town 
for hundreds of years, for they had first settled there about the 
timp when the badge had been built, there now came the Galician 
Jews, the Ashkenazi. 

Like fresh blood, money began to circulate in hitherto unknown 
quannties and, which was the mam thmg, publicly, boldly and 
openly. In that exciting circulation of gold, silver and negotiable 
paper, every man could warm his hands or at least ‘gladden his 
eyes’, for it created even for the poorest of men the illusion that 
his own bad luck was only temporary and therefore the more 
bearable. 

Earlier too there had been money and rich people, but these 
last had been rare and had concealed their money like a snake 
its legs and hdd revealed their superiority only as a form of power 
and protection, difficult both for themselves and for those about 
them. Now wealth, or what passed as such and was so named, 
was openly displayed m the form of pleasure and personal satisfac- 
tion therefore the mass of the people could see something of its 
glitter and its gleanmgs. 

So it was with all else. Pleasures which up till then had been 
stolen and concealed, could now be purchased and openly displayed, 
which increased their attraction and the number of those who 
sought them. What had earlier been unattainable, far off and ex- 
pensive (forbidden by law or all-powerful custom) now became, 
in many cases, possible and attainable to all who had or who 
knew. Many passions, appetites and demands which till then had 
been hidden in remote places or left completely unsatisfied could 
now be boldly and openly sought and fully or at least partially 
satisfied. In fact even m that there was greater restriction, order 
and legal hindrance; vices were punished and enjoyments paid 
for even more heavily and dearly than before, but the laws and 
methods were different and allowed the people, in this as in all 
else, the illusion that life had suddenly become wider, more 
luxurious and freo-. 

Thwe were not many more real pleasures nor, certainly, more 
happiness but it was undoubtedly easier to come by such pleasures 
and it seemed that there was room for everyone’s happiness. The 
old inborn partiality of the people of ViSegrad for a carefree life 
of enjoyment found both support and possibilities of realization 
in the new customs and the new forms of trading and profit brought 
by the newcomers. Immigrant Polish Jews with their numerous 
families based all thdr business on that. Schreiber opened what 

176 



he called a ‘general store’, Gutcnplan a canteen for the soldiers, 
Zahler ran a hotel, the Sperling brothers set up a soda-water factory 
and a photographer’s ‘atelier’ and Zveker a jeweller’s and watch- 
maker’s shop. 

After the barracks which had replaced the Stone Han, Municipal 
Offices were built of the stone that remained, with local administra- 
tive offices and courts. After these, the largest building in the 
town was the Zahler hotel It was built on the river bank just 
beside the bndge. That right bank had been supported by an 
ancient retaining wall which shored up the bank on both sides 
of the bridge and had been built at the same time So it happened 
that both to left and right of the bridge stretched two level spaces, 
like two terraces above the water. On these open spaces, which 
were called racecourses by the people of the town, children had 
played from generation to generation. Now the local authorities 
took over the left-hand ‘racecourse*, put a fence round it and made 
a sort of municipal botanical garden. On the right-hand one the 
hotel was built Until then the first building at the entry to the 
market-place had been Zanje’s mn It was ‘in the right place’, for 
the tired and thirty traveller on entering the town from across 
the bridge must first light on it Now it was overshadowed by the 
great building of the new hotel; the low old inn seemed every day 
lower and more humiliated as if it had sunk into the earth. 

Officially the new hotel had been given the name of the bridge 
beside which it had been built. But the townspeople named every- 
thing according to their own special logic and according to the 
real significance it had for them. Over the entrance of the Zahler 
Hotel the inscription ‘Hotel zur Brucke*, which a soldier skilled 
in the trade had painted in large letters, quickly faded. The people 
called it ‘Lotte’s Hotel’ and the name stuck For the hotel was run 
by the fat and phlegmatic Jew, Zahler, who had a sickly wife, 
Deborah, and two little girls, Mina and Irene, but the real pro- 
prietress was Zahler’s sister-in-law Lotte, a young and very pretty 
widow with a free tongue and a masculine energy 

On the top floor of the hotel were six clean and well furnished 
guest-rooms and on the ground floor two public rooms, one large 
and one small. The large one was patronized by the humbler clients, 
ordinary citizens, non-commissioned officers and artisans The 
smaller one was separated from the larger by large frosted-glass 
doors on one of which was written EXTRA and on the other 
ZIMMER. That was the social centre for officials, officers and the 
richer townspeople. One drank and played cards, sang, danced, 
held serious conversations and closed business deals, ate well and 


177 



slept well in clean sheets at Lotte’s. It often happened that the 
tarns group of begs, merchants and officials would sit from dusk 
until dawn and still go on until they collapsed from dnnk and 
lack of sleep or grew so tired over their cards that they could no 
longer distinguish them (they no longer played hidden away secretly 
in that dark stuffy cubby-hole at Ustamujid’s inn). Those who had 
drunk too much or had lost all they had Lotte would see off the 
premises and then turn to welcome fresh and sober guests eager 
for drink and play. No one knew and no one ever asked when that 
woman rested, when she slept or ate and when she found time 
to dress and freshen herself up. For she was always there (or at 
least so it seemed) at everyone’s beck and call, always amiable, 
always the same and always bold and discreet. Well bmlt, plump, 
with ivory-white skin, black hair and smouldering eyes, she had 
a perfectly assured manner of dealing wnth guests, who would 
spend freely but were often aggressive and crude when overcome 
by drink. She would talk sweetly, boldly, wittily, sharply, flatter- 
ingly with all of them, smoothing them down. Her voice was 
hoarse and uneven but could at moments become a sort of deep 
and soothing cooing She spoke incorrectly, for she never learnt 
Serbian well, in her own piquant and picturesque language in 
which the cases were never right and the genders uncertain, but 
which in tone and meaning was entnely in keeping wdth the local 
v/ay of expression. Every client had her at his disposal to listen to all 
his troubles and desires in recompense for the money he spent and 
the time he wasted But these two things, spending money and 
wasting time, were all he could be sure of, everyone thought there 
would be more to it, whereas in fact there was not. For two genera- 
tions of the nch spendthrifts of the town Lotte was a glittering, ex- 
pensive and cold fata morgana who played with their senses. Those 
rare individuals who had supposedly got something out of her, 
but who were quite unable to say what or how much, were the 
subject of local stories. 

It was no simple matter to know how to deal with the rich and 
drunk townsmen in whom unsuspected and coarse desires were 
often roused. But Lotte, that untiring and cold woman of chilled 
passions, quick intelligence and masculine heart tamed every fury, 
silenced every demand of uncontrolled men by the inexplicable 
play of her perfect body, her great cunning and her no less great 
daring, and always succeeded in maintaining the necessary distance 
between herself and them, which only served to inflame their desires 
and increase her own value. She played with these uncontrolled men 
in their coarsest and most dangerous moments of drunkenness and 

178 



rage, like a torero with a bull, for she quickly got to know the 
people with whom she had to deal and easily found the key to 
their apparently complex demands and all the weak points of 
those cruel and sensual sentimentalists. She offered them every- 
thing, promised much and gave little, or rather nothing at all. For 
their desires were, of their very nature, such as never could be 
satisfied and in the end they had to content themselves with little. 
With most of her guests she behaved as if they were sick men 
who from time to time had passing crises and hallucinations. In 
fact it could be said that despite her trade, which of its nature 
was neither pleasant nor particularly chaste, she was an imder- 
standing woman of kind nature and compassionate heart who 
could help and console whoever had spent more than he should 
on drinks or had lost more than he should at cards. She sent them 
all mad, for they were naturally mad, deceived them for they 
wanted to be deceived and, finally, took from them only what they 
had already been determined to throw away and lose. In fact she 
earned very much, took good care of her money and in the first 
few years had already managed to accumulate a considerable 
fortune, but she also knew how to ‘write off' a debt magnanimously 
and to forget a loss without a word. She gave to bcggers and the 
sick and with much tact and care helped rich families who had fallen 
into destitution, orphans and widows from better houses, all those 
‘ashamed poor’ who did not know how to beg and were embarrassed 
at accepting alms. All this she did with the same skill as she showed 
in running the hotel and controlling the drunken, lustful and 
aggressive guests, taking from them all that she could, giving them 
nothing and yet never refusing them finally or completely. 

Men who knew the world and its history often thought that it 
was a pity that fate had given this woman so narrow and undis- 
tinguished a part to play. Had her fate not been what or where 
it was, who knows what this wise and humane woman, who did not 
think only of herself and who. predatory yet unselfish, beautiful 
and seductive but also chaste and cold, ran a small town hotel and 
emptied the pockets of petty Casanovas, could have been or could 
have given to the world. Perhaps she would have been one of those 
famous women of whom history tells and who have controlled 
the destinies of great families, of courts or states, always turning 
everything to good. 

At that time, about 1885, when Lotte was at the height of her 
powers, there were rich men’s sons who spent days and nights in 
the hotel, in that special room with doors of milky frosted glass. 


179 



In the early evening they would drowse there, beside the stove, 
forgetting in dreams or fatigue where they were or why they were 
sitting there or what they were waiting for Profiting by this lull, 
Lotte would withdraw into a little room on the first floor intended 
for the potboys, which she had converted mto her ‘office’ where 
she allowed no one to enter. That tiny room was heaped up with 
every kind of furniture, with photographs and objects of gold, silver 
and crystal There too, hidden behind a curtain, was Lotte’s green 
steel safe and her little desk which was quite mvisible beneath a 
pile of papers, bills, receipts, accounts, Austrian newspapers, 
cuttings about the money market and lottery lists. 

In that tiny overcrowded and stuffy room, whose only window, 
smaller than any other in the building, looked directly and at short 
range on to the smallest arch of the bridge, Lotte spent her spare 
moments and lived that second, hidden part of her life which 
belonged to her alone. 

In it Lotte, in those hours of stolen freedom, read money market 
reports and studied prospectuses, wrote up accounts, answered 
letters from banks, made decisions, gave instructions, dealt with 
bank deposits and made fresh payments. To all those downstairs 
and to the world in general this was an unknown side of Lotte’s 
work, the true and invisible part of her life. There she cast aside 
the smiling mask and her face grew hard and her glance sharp 
and sombre From this room she corresponded with her very 
numerous relatives, the Apfelmaiers of Tarnovo, her married sisters 
and brothers, various nephews and nieces and all the hordes of 
Jewish poor from Eastern Galicia, now scattered throughout Galicia, 
Austria and Hungary. She controlled the destimties of a whole 
dozen Jewish families, entered into the minutest details of their 
lives, arranged their marrying and giving in marriage, sent healing 
to the sick, warned and admonished the workshy and spendthrift 
and praised the thrifty and industrious. She resolved their family 
quarrels, gave counsel in cases of misunderstanding and doubt, 
and incited all of them to a more understanding, better and more 
dignified way of life and at the same time made this more possible 
and easier for them. For with each of her letters she sent a money 
order for a sum sufficient to ensure that her counsels were listened 
to and her advice followed and that certain spiritual or bodily 
needs be satisfied or shortages avoided. In this raising of the standard 
of the whole family and the setting of each individual member on 
his feet, she found her sole real satisfaction and a reward for all 
the burdens and renunciations of her life. With each member of 
the Apfelmaier family who rose even a single step in the social 

i8o 



scale, Lotte felt that she too rose and in that found her reward 
for her hard work and the force to struggle onward. 

Sometimes it happened that when she came up from the Extra- 
zimmer so exhausted or disgusted that she had not even the strength 
to write or to read letters and accounts she simply went to the little 
window to breathe the fresh air from the river. Then her gaze 
would fall on that strong and graceful arch of stone, which filled 
the entire view, and the swift waters beneath. At dusk or dawn, 
in sunshine, winter moonlight or the soft light of the stars, that 
arch was always the same. Its two sides swept upwards, met at 
the sharp apex and supported one another in perfect and unwavering 
balance. As the years rolled on that became her only and familiar 
view, the dumb -witness to whom this Jewess with the two faces 
turned in the moments when she demanded rest and freshness and 
when in her trade and her family tnals, which she always solved 
for herself, she came to a dead centre and a point where there was 
no way out. 

But such restful moments never lasted long for it always happened 
that they were interrupted by some cry from the caf^ below; or 
new clients demanding her presence or some drunkard, awakened 
and ready for renewed onslaughts, shouting for more drinks, for 
the lamps to be lighted, for the orchestra to come, and always 
calling for Lotte Then she would leave her lair and, carefully locking 
the door with a special key, go down to welcome the guests, or 
by her smile and her special vocabulary to smooth down the 
drunkard like a newly awakened child and to help him to a chair 
where he could recommence his nightly session of drinking, con- 
versation, song and spending 

Down below everything went wrong when she was not there. 
The guests squabbled among themselves A beg from Cm2e, young, 
pale and haggard, spilled every drink brought to him, retorted 
to everything said to him and insisted on picking quarrels with 
the staff or the guests Save for a few short intervals, he had been 
drmking in the hotel for days past, and lusting after Lotte, but 
he had drunk so much and longed so greatly that it was clear that 
some deeper, much greater misery unknown even to himself was 
driving him on, something greater than his unrequited love for, and 
unreasonable jealousy of, the lovely Jewess from Tarnovo. 

Lotte went up to him fearlessly, easily and naturally 

‘What is It, E)mb7 What are you making such a noise about^’ 

•Where have you been’ I want to know where you have been . . 
stammered the drunkard in a voice already appeased and looking 
at her as if she were a vision. ‘They are giving me some sort of 

i8i 



poison to drink. They are poisoning me, but they do not know 
that I . . . if I . . 

‘Sit down, sit down quietly,’ the woman consoled him, with 
her white perfumed hands playing just in front of the young 
beg’s face ‘Sit down I will get you bird’s milk to dnnk if you 
want it. I will get it for you myself.’ 

She called the waiter and gave an order in German. 

‘Don’t talk that lingo which 1 don’t understand in front of me; 
all this Rrtzen-furtzen, for I . . . well you know me . . .' 

‘I know, I know, Eyub- I know no one better than you, Eyub, 
but you I know. . . .’ 

‘Hm! Who have you been with^ Tell me!’ 

The conversation between the drunk man and the sober woman 
maundered on without end or meaning, without sense or conclu- 
sion, beside bottles of some expensive wine and two glasses; one, 
Lotte’s, always full and the other, Eyub’s, continually filled and 
emptied 

While the young spendthrift stuttered and muttered on in his 
thick drunkard’s voice about love, death, hopeless yearning and 
nmilar matters which Lotte knew by heart, for they were the 
stock in trade of every local drunkard, she rose, went over to the 
other tables at which sat the other guests who met regularly every 
evening in the hotel. 

At one table was a group of young worthies who had only 
just begun to frequent the cafds and drink, town snobs for whom 
Zarije’s inn was too boring and too ordinary and who were still 
intimidated by the hotel. At the others were officials, strangers, 
with an officer or two who had abandoned the officers’ mess for 
that day and come down to the civilian hotel with the aim of 
touching Lotte for a quick loan. At a third were the engineers who 
were building the first forest railway for the export of timber. 

In a comer reckoning something sat Pavle Rankovid, one of 
the young but richer merchants and some Austrian or other, a 
contractor for the railway. Pavle was in Turkish style dress with 
a red fez which he did not take off in the cafe. His small eyes 
looked like two lighted slits, black and thin in his pale face, but 
which could widen and become unusually large and diabolically 
merry in exceptional moments of joy or triumph. The contractor 
was in a grey sports suit with high yellow laced boots which reached 
to his knees The contractor was writing with a gold pencil attached 
to a silver chain, and Pavle with a short stub which some wood 
dealer, a military contractor, had left behind in his shop five years 
before when buying nails and hinges. They were concluding an 

182 



agreement for the feeding of the workers on the line. Completely 
wrapped up in their tasks, they multiplied, divided and added; they 
ranged rows of figures, one set visible, on paper, by which each 
hoped to convince and deceive the other, and another, invisible 
and in their heads, closely and quickly reckoned, in which each 
for himself sought for hidden possibilities and profits. 

For each of these guests Lotte found the right words, a full 
smile or even a silent glance full of understanding. Then she 
returned once more to the young beg who was again beginning 
to become uneasy and aggressive. 

In the course of that night, throughout the whole drinking bout, 
with all Its noisy, yearning, lachrymose or coarse phases, which 
she knew so well, Lotte would find a few moments in which she 
could go back once again to her room and in the milky light of 
the porcelain lamp continue her rest or her correspondence, until 
downstairs some scene would begin again or until they called 
her down. 

Tomorrow was another day, just such another with the same 
scene of drunken spending, and for Lotte the same anxieties which 
she must meet with a smiling face and the same task which always 
seemed an easy yet desperate game. 

It seemed incomprehensible and inexplicable how Lotte could 
manage the quantity and variety of tasks which she carried out 
day after day and which demanded of her more cunning than a 
woman has and more strength than any man could muster. But 
none the less she was able to finish everything, never complaining, 
never explaining anything to anyone, never speaking about any task 
which she had just finished or which still awaited her. Despite all 
that she always managed to find an hour or two every day for 
Alibeg PaSid. He was the only man whom the town believed had 
won Lotte’s sympathy, genuinely and independently of any source 
of profit. But he was also the most reserved and taciturn man in 
the town. The eldest of the four Pali^ brothers, he had never 
married (in the town it was believed that this was because of 
Lotte), never took part m business or public life. He never drank 
to excess or went into cafds with men of his own age. He was 
always of the same mood, universally amiable and restrained 
towards all, without distinction. Quiet and reserved, he did not 
avoid society or conversation, yet no one ever remembered any 
opinion expressed by him or ever repeated anything that he had 
said. He was sufficient unto himself and completely satisfied with 
what he was and what he seemed in the eyes of others. He himself 
had no need to be or to seem in any way different from what he 

183 



was and no one expected him or asked him to be anything else 
He was one of those men who bear their social position as some 
heavy and noble calling which completely fills their lives; an inborn, 
great and dignified position justified by itself alone and which 
cannot be explained, nor denied nor imitated. 

With the guests in the large hall Lotte had little contact That 
was the job of the waitress MalSika and the ‘zahlkelner’ Gustav. 
Malcika was a shrewd Hungarian girl well known to the whole 
town who looked like the wife of some lion tamer, and Gustav, a 
small, reddish Czech-German of irrascible nature, bloodshot eyes, 
bow legs and flat feet. They knew all the guests and all the towns- 
people, they knew who were or were not good payers, their habits 
when drunk, whom to receive coldly and whom to welcome 
cordially and whom not to allow to enter at all for ‘he was not for 
this hotel’ They took care that the guests should dnnk a lot and 
should pay regularly, but that everything should end smoothly and 
well since it was Lotte’s motto- “Nur kein Skandal!’ If sometimes, 
exceptionally, it so happened that someone went unexpectedly be- 
serk in his cups or, after already getting drunk at some less reputable 
cafe, should force his way into the room, then Milan the servant 
appeared, a tall broad-shouldered and hairy man from Lika, of gigan- 
tic strength, a man who spoke little and did all the odd jobs He was 
always correctly dressed as a hotel servant (Lotte saw to that) He 
was always in his shirt-sleeves, with a brown waistcoat and white 
shirt, with a long apron of green cloth, with sleeves rolled back 
summer and winter to show his huge forearms as hairy as two 
brushes, and with finely waxed moustaches and black hair stiff with 
perfumed military pomade. Milan was the man who extinguished 
every scandal at its very conception. 

There was a long-established and consecrated tactic for this dis- 
agreeable and undesired operation. Gustav kept the furious and 
drunken guest in conversation until Milan came up behind him; then 
the zahlkelner suddenly moved out of the way and Milan seized the 
drunkard from behind, one arm round his waist and the other round 
his neck, so swiftly and skilfully that no one was ever able to see 
what ‘Milan’s gnp’ really was. TThen even the strongest of the town 
ne’er-do-wells flew like a rag-doll through the doors which Malfika 
held open at just the right moment, and through them into the street. 
At the same moment Gustav threw his hat, stick and anything else 
he had with him after him and Milan put the whole weight of his 
body and clanged down the metal shutter over the door. All this was 
over in the twinkling of an eye, in close co-operation and smoothly, 
and almost before the other guests could turn to look, the unwelcome 

184 



visitor was already in the street and could, if he were really mad- 
dened, beat a few times with knife or stone on the roller-bUnds as 
the marks on it showed. But that was not a scandal in the hotel but 
in the street, a matter for the police who in any case always had a 
man on patTol in front of the hotel. It had never happened to Milan, 
as had been the case in other cafds, that the guest knocked anyone 
down or rushed through the rooms breaking tables and chairs or 
clung with arms and legs to the door so that afterwards not even a 
yoke of oxen could drag him away. Milan never brought any ex- 
cessive zeal or bad humour to his task, no love of fighting or personal 
prejudice; therefore he finished the matter swiftly and perfectly. A 
mmute after the expulsion he was back at his work m the kitchen or 
pantry as if nothing had happened. Gustav only went, as if by 
chance, through the Extrazimmer and looking at Lotte, who sat at 
some table with the better guests, suddenly closed both eyes which 
meant that something had happened but that eveiything was now 
settled. Then Lotte, without stopping her conversation or ceasing to 
smile, also blinked quickly and imperceptibly, which meant: 

‘All right, thank you; keep an eye on it!' 

There remained only the question of what the expelled guest had 
drunk or broken. That sum Lotte wrote off in Gustav’s accounts 
when they made up the accoimts for the day, which they did late at 
night behind a red screen. 


185 



XV 




T here were many ways by which the turbulent and skilfully 
expelled guest, if he were not immediately taken to prison 
from outside the hotel, could recover his spirits and his 
strength after the unpleasantness that had befallen him. He 
could totter to the kapia and refresh himself there in the cool breeze 
from the waters and the surrounding hills; or he could go to Zanje’s 
inn which was only a little farther on, in the main square, and there 
freely and without hindrance grind his teeth, threaten and curse the 
invisible hand that had so painfully and definitely thrown him out 
of the hotel. There, after the solid citizens and artisans who had only 
come to dnnk their ‘evening nip’ or chat with their fellows had dis- 
persed, there was no scandal, nor could there be, for everyone drank 
as much as he liked or as much as he could pay for, and everyone did 
and said what he liked. There was no question of asking a guest to 
spend money and drink up and at the same time behave as if was 
sober. Though if anyone went beyond due measure there was always 
the solid and taciturn Zanje himself whose scowling and bad- 
tempered face discouraged even the most rabid drunkards and 
brawlers. He quietened them with a slow movement of his heavy 
hand and a few words in his gruff voice. 

'Hey you there! Drop it! Enough of your fun and games!’ 

But even in that old-fashioned inn where there were no separate 
rooms or waiters, for there was always some fellow or other from 
the Sanjak to serve the drinks, new habits mingled wondrously with 
the old. 

Withdrawn into the farthest corners the notorious addicts of 
plum brandy sat silent. They were lovers of shadow and silence, sit- 
ting over their plum brandy as if it were something sacred, hating 
movement and commotion. With burnt-out stomachs, inflamed 
livers and disordered nerves, unshaven and uncared for, indifferent 
to everything else in the world and a burden even to themselves, they 
sat there and drank and, while drinking, waited until that magical 
light which shines for those completely given over to drink should 

i86 



at last burst upon them, that joy for which it is sweet to suffer, to 
decay and finally to die, but which unfortunately appears more and 
more rarely and shines more and more weakly. 

The most noisy and talkative were the beginners, for the most part 
sons of local worthies, young men in those dangerous years which 
mark the first steps on the road to ruin, paying that tribute which all 
must pay to the vices of drink and idleness, some for shorter, others 
for longer periods. Most of them did not remain long on this road 
but turned away from it, founded families and devoted themselves to 
thrift and labour, to the daily life of a citizen with vices suppressed 
and passions moderated. Only an insignificant minority, accursed 
and preordained, continued on that road forever, choosing alcohol 
instead of life, that shortest and most deceptive illusion in this short 
and deceptive life; they lived for alcohol and were consumed by it, 
until they became sullen, dull and puffy like those who sat in the 
corners in the shadows. 

Since the new ways of life began, without discipline or considera- 
tion, with more lively trade and better wages, as well as Sumbo the 
Gipsy who had accompanied all the townsmen’s orgies for the past 
thirteen years with his zurla, or peasant clarinet, there now came 
often to the inn Franz Furlan with his accordion. He was a thin red- 
dish man with a gold earring in his right ear, a woodcarver by pro- 
fession, but too great a lover of wine and music. The soldiers and 
foreign workmen loved to listen to him. 

It often happened that a guslar (a player on the one-stringed fiddle) 
could also be found there, usually some Montenegrin, thin as a her- 
mit, poorly dressed but proud in bearing, famished but ashamed, 
proud but forced to accept alms. He would sit for some time in a 
comer, noticeably withdrawn, ordering nothing and looking straight 
in front of him, pretending to notice nothing and to be indifferent to 
everything. None the less it could be seen that he had other thoughts 
and intentions than his appearance revealed. Within him wrestled 
invisibly many contrary and irreconcilable feelings, especially the 
contrast between the greatness that he felt in his soul and the misery 
and weakness of what he was able to express and reveal before 
others. Therefore he was always a little confused and embarrassed. 
Proudly and patiently he waited for someone to ask for a song from 
him and then hesitantly took his gusle out of his bag, breathed on it, 
looked to see if his bow had been slackened by damp, and tuned up, 
all the while quite clearly wanting to attract as little attention as pos- 
sible to these technical preliminaries. When he first passed the bow 
across the string it was still a wavering sound, uneven as a rutted 
road. But just as somehow or other one passes such a road, so he too 

187 



through his nose with closed mouth began softly to accompany the 
sound and complete and harmonize it with his voice. When at last 
the two sounds merged into a single melancholy even note which 
wove an accompaniment for his song, the miserable singer changed 
as if by magic and all his troubled hesitation disappeared, his inner 
contradictions calmed and all his outer cares forgotten The guslar 
suddenly raised his head, like a man who throws off the mask of 
humility, no longer having need to conceal who and what he was, 
and began unexpectedly in a strong voice his introductory verses: 

‘The sprig of basil began to weep, 

O gentle dew, why fall you not upon me’’ 

The guests, who until then had pretended not to notice and had 
been chatting together, all fell silent. At these first verses all of them, 
Turks and Christians alike, felt the same shiver of undefined desire, 
of thirst for that dew which lived in themselves as in the song, with- 
out distinction or difference. But when immediately afterwards the 
guslar continued softly: 

’But It was not the spng of basil . . .’ 

and lifting the veil from his metaphor began to enumerate the real 
desires of Turks and Serbs concealed behmd these words of dew and 
basil, there arose divided feelings among the listeners which led 
them along opposing paths according to what each felt within him- 
self and what each desired or believed But none the less, by some 
unwritten rule, they all quietly listened to the end of the song and, 
patient and enduring, did not reveal their mood, but only looked 
into the glasses before them where, on the shining surface of the 
plum brandy, they seemed to see the victories so desired, the fights, 
the heroes, the glory and the glitter, such as existed nowhere in the 
world. 

It was liveliest in the inn when the younger men, sons of rich local 
worthies, sat down to drink Then there was work for Sumbo and 
Franz Furlan and Corkan the One-Eyed and Saha the Gipsy. 

Saha was a squinting gipsy woman, a bold virago who ^ank with 
anyone who could pay, but never got drunk. No orgy could be 
imagined without Saha and her meaty jokes. 

The men who made merry with them changed, but Corkan, Sumbo 
and Saha were always the same. They lived on music, jokes and plum 
brandy. Their work lay m the time-wasting of others and their re- 
ward in others’ spendings. Their true life was at night, especially in 
those unusual hours 'S^hen healthy and happy men are asleep, when 

i88 



plum brandy and hitherto restrained instincts create a noisy and glit- 
tenng mood and unexpected enthusiasms which are always the 
same yet seem always new and unimaginably beautiful. They were 
close-mouthed paid witnesses before whom everyone dared to show 
himself as he really was, or in the local expression ‘to show the blood 
beneath the skin’, without having afterwards either to repent or be 
ashamed; with them and in their presence everything was permitted 
which would be considered scandalous by the rest of the world and 
at home would be sinful and impossible. All these rich, respected 
fathers and sons of good families could, in their name and to their 
account, be for a moment what they did not dare show themselves, 
at least at certain times and at least in a part of their bemg. The 
cruel could mock at them or beat them, the cowards could shout in- 
sults at them, the prodigal could reward them generously; the vain 
bought their flattery, the melancholic and moody their jokes and 
pleasantries, the debauched their boldness or their services. They 
were an eternal but unrecognized need of the townsmen whose spiri- 
tual lives were stunted and deformed. They were rather in the posi- 
tion of artists m a milieu where art is unknown. There are always 
such people in a town, singers, jesters, buffoons, eccentrics. When 
one of them grew threadbare or died, another replaced him, for be- 
sides the notorious and well known there developed fresh ones to 
shorten the hours and make gay the lives of new generations. But 
much time would have to pass before such another appeared as 
Salko Corkan the One-Eyed. 

When, after the Austrian occupation, the first circus had come to 
the town Corkan had fallen in love with the tight-rope walker and 
because of her had behaved so madly and eccentrically that he had 
been beaten and sent to prison, and the local worthies who had heed- 
lessly led him astray and encouraged him to lose his head had had 
to pay heavy fines 

Some years had passed since then, the people had grown accus- 
tomed to many things and the arrival of strange players, clowns and 
conjurers no longer exated such universal and contagious sensa- 
tion as had the first circus, but Corkan’s love for the dancer was still 
remembered. 

For a long time he had wasted his strength in doing odd jobs by 
day and by night helping the local begs and rich men to forget their 
cares in drmking and brawling. So it went from generation to genera- 
tion. As some sowed their wild oats and withdrew, got married and 
settled down, other and younger ones who wanted to sow theirs 
took their places. Now Corkan was washed out and old before his 
time; he was far more often in the inn than at work and lived not so 



much from what he earned as from free drinks and snacks given him 
by the customers. 

On rainy autumn nights the guests in Zarije’s inn were overcome 
by boredom. Their thoughts came slowly and were all concerned 
with melancholy and unpleasant matters, speech came with diffi- 
culty and sounded empty and irritating, faces were cold, absent or 
mis trustful. Not even plum brandy could enliven and improve their 
mood. On a bench in a corner of the inn Corkan drowsed overcome 
by fatigue, the moist heat and the first glasses of plum brandy; it was 
raining cats and dogs. 

Then one of the sullen guests at the mam table mentioned, as if 
by chance, the dancer from the circus and Corkan’s unhappy love. 
They all glanced at the corner but Corkan did not budge and pre- 
tended to go on dozing Let them say what they liked; he had firmly 
decided that very morning, after a heavy night’s drinking, not to 
reply to their jeering and mocking and not to let them play crude 
jokes on him as some of them had done the night before in that very 
inn. 

‘I believe that they still write to each other,’ said one. 

‘So you see, the bastard writes love-letters to one while another is 
on her knees to him here'’ retorted another 

Corkan forced himself to remain indifferent but the conversation 
irritated and excited him as if the sun were burning his face; his only 
eye seemed as if it forced itself to open and all the muscles of his face 
stretched into a happy laugh. He was no longer able to maintain his 
motionless silence. At first he waved his hand in a casual and indif- 
ferent gesture and then said: 

‘All that is over, over long ago.’ 

‘All over, is it? What a wretch this fellow Corkan is! One girl is 
pining away for him somewhere far away while another is going 
mad for him here. One is all over, this one here will soon be the 
same and then it will be the turn of a third. What sort of a fellow 
are you, you wretch, to turn their heads one after the other?’ 

Corkan leapt to his feet and approached the table. He had for- 
gotten his drowsiness and fatigue and his decision not to be drawn 
into conversation. With hand on heart he assured the guests that it 
had not been his fault and that he was not so great a lover and 
seducer as they made out. His clothes were still damp and his face 
streaked and dirty, for the colour of his cheap red fez ran, but it 
was lighted up with a smile of alcoholic bliss. He sat down near the 
table. 

‘Rum for Corkani’ shouted Santo Papo, a fat and greasy Jew, son 
of Mente and grandson of Morde Papo, leading hardware merchants. 


190 



Corkan had recently begun to drink rum instead of plum brandy 
whenever he could get hold of it. The new drink was as if made for 
such as he; it was stronger, quicker m effect and pleasantly different 
from plum brandy. It came in small flasks of two decis each, with a 
label showing a young mulatto girl with luscious bps and fiery eyes 
with a wide straw hat on her head, great golden earrings and the in- 
scription beneath: Jamaica. (That was something exotic for a Bos- 
nian in the last stages of alcoholism bordering on delirium It was 
made in Slavonski Brod by the firm of Eisler, Sirowatka and Co.) 
When he looked at the picture of the young mulatto girl, Corkan 
also felt the fire and aroma of the new drink and at once thought 
that he would never have been able to know this earthly treasure 
had he died even a year before ‘And how many such wonderful 
things there are in this world!’ He felt deeply moved at this thought 
and therefore always waited for a few pensive moments before he 
opened a bottle of rum. And after the satisfaction of that thought 
came the delight of the drink itself. 

This time too he held the bottle before his face as if conversing 
with it unheard. But he who had first managed to draw him into 
conversation asked him sharply: 

‘Why are you dreaming about that girl, you wretch; are you going 
to take her as your wife or play about with her as you did with all 
the others?’ 

The girl in question was a certain PaSa from Du5Ce. She was the 
prettiest girl in the town, poor and fatherless, a seamstress as was 
also her mother. 

During the countless picnics and drinkmg bouts of the past year 
the young bachelors had talked and sung much about PaSa and her 
inaccessible beauty. Listening to them Corkan had gradually and im- 
perceptibly become enthusiastic too, he himself did not know how 
or why. So they began to tease him about her. 

One Friday they took Corkan with them for aSikovanje (to flirt 
with the town girls in the Turkish manner) when from tehind the 
courtyard gates or the window lattices muflied giggles could be heard 
and the whispering of the unseen girls "within. From one courtyard 
where PaSa and her friends lived a sprig of tansy was thrown over 
the wall and fell at Corkan’s feet. He hesitated in confusion, not 
wanting to tread on the flower and undecided whether to pick it up. 
The youths who had brought him clapped him on the back and con- 
gratulated him that PaSa had chosen him from so many and had 
shown him greater attention than anyone else had ever obtained 
from her. 

That night they had gone drinking beside the river under the wal- 



nut trees at Mezalin and continued until dawn. Corkan sat beside 
the fire, solemn and withdrawn, now joyous, now pensive. That 
night they would not let him serve the drinks or busy himself pre- 
panng coffee and snacks. 

‘Don’t you know, fellow, the meaning of a sprig of tansy thrown 
by a girl’’ said one of them. ‘It means that Pa5a is telling you: I am 
pining away for you like this plucked flower; but you neither ask 
for my hand nor allow me to go to another. That is what it means ’ 

They all began to talk to him about Pa5a, so lovely, so chaste, 
alone in the world, waiting for the hand that should pluck her, and 
that the hand for which she was waiting was Corkan’s and his alone. 

They pretended to get angry and shouted loudly; how did she 
come to cast her eye on Corkan? Others defended him. As Corkan 
went on drinking he came almost to believe in this marvel, only to 
reject it at once as an impossibility. In conversation he insisted that 
she was not the gurl for him, and defended himself against their jeers 
by saying that he was a poor man, that he was growing old and not 
very attractive, but in his moments of silence he let his thoughts 
dwell on Pa§a, her beauty and the joy that she would bring, heed- 
less whether such joy were possible for him or not In that wonderful 
summer night which with the plum brandy and the songs and the 
fire burning on the grass seemed endless, everything was possible or 
at least not completely impossible. That the guests were mockmg 
and ridiculmg him he knew; gentlemen could not hve without 
laughter, someone had to be their buffoon, it always had been and 
always would be. But if all this were only a joke, his dream of a 
marvellous woman and an unattainable love, of which he had always 
dreamed and still dreamed today, was no joke. There was no joke 
in those songs in which love was both real and unreal and woman 
both near and unattainable as in his dream. For the guests all that 
too was a joke, but for him it was a true and sacred thing which he 
had always borne within himself and which had become real and 
indubitable, independent of the guests’ pleasure, of vdne and of song, 
of evorything, even of PaSa herself. 

All tliis he knew well and yet easily forgot. For his soul would 
melt and his mind flow like water. 

So Corkan, three years after his great love and the scandal about 
the pretty German tight-rope walker, fell into a new and enchanted 
love and all the rich and idle guests found a fresh game, cruel and 
exciting enough to give them cause for laughter for months and 
years to come. 

That was in midsummer. But autumn and winter passed and the 
game about Corkan’s love for the beautiful PaSa filled the evenings 


192 



and shortened the days for the merchants from the market-place. 
They always referred to Corkan as the bridegroom or the lover. By 
day. overcome by the night’s drinking and lack of sleep, when 
Corkan did odd jobs m the shops, fetching and carrymg, he was sur- 
prised and angered that they should call him so. but only shrugged 
his shoulders. But as soon as night came and the lamps were lit in 
Zarije’s inn. someone would shout ‘Rum for Corkan!’ and another 
sing softly as if by chance: 

‘Evemns comes and the sim goes down 
On thy face it shines no longer. . . ’ 

then suddenly everything changed. No more burdens, no more shrug- 
ging of shoulders, no more town or inn or even Corkan himself as he 
was in reality, snuffling, unshaven, clothed in rags and cast-off cloth- 
mg of other men. There existed a high balcony lit by the settmg sun 
and wreathed in vines, with a young girl who looked for him and 
waited for the man to whom she had thrown a sprig of tansy. There 
was still, to be true, the coarse laughter around him and the crude 
jests, but they were all far away, as in a fog, and he who sang waj 
near him, close by his ear: 

‘If I could grow warm again 
In the sunlight that you bring me. 

and he warmed himself in that sun, which had set, as he had never 
been warmed by the real sun which rose and set daily over the town. 

‘Rum for Corkan!’ 

So the winter nights passed. Towards the end of that winter Pa2a 
got married. The poor seamstress from Du25e, in all her beauty of not 
quite nineteen years, married Hadji Omer who lived behind the fort- 
ress, a rich and respected man of fifty-five— as his second wife. 

Hadji Omer had already been married more than thirty years. His 
wife came from a famous family and was renowned for her clever- 
ness and good sense. Their property behind the fortress was a whole 
settlement in itself, progressive and rich in everything His shops in 
the town were solidly built and his income assured and large. All 
this was not so much due to the peaceable and indolent Hadji Omer, 
who did little more than walk twice a day to the town and back, as 
to his able and energetic, always smiling wife. Her opinion was 
the last word on many questions for all the Turkish women of the 
town. 

His family was in every way among the best and most respected in 
the town, but the already ageing couple had no children. For long 

G 193 



they had hoped. Hadji Omer had even made the pilgrimage to Mecca 
and his wife had made bequests to religious houses and given alms to 
the poor. The years had passed, everything had increased and pros- 
pered, but m this one most important matter they had received no 
blessing. Hadji Omer and his good wife had borne their evil fortune 
wisely and well but there could be no longer any hope of children. 
His wife was in her forty-fifth year. 

The great inheritance which Hadji Omer was to leave behind him 
was in question. Not only his and his wife's numerous relations had 
concerned themselves in this matter, but to some extent the whole 
town also. Some had wanted the marriage to remain childless to the 
end, while others had thought it a pity that such a man should die 
without heirs and that his goods should be dispersed among the many 
relations, and had therefore urged him to take a second, younger 
wife while there was still a chance of heirs. The local Turks were 
divided into two camps on the question. But the matter was settled 
by the barren wife herself. Openly, resolutely and sincerely, as in 
everything she did, she told her undecided husband: 

The good God has given us everything, all thanks and praise to 
Him, concorn and health and riches, but He has not given us what he 
gives to every poor man; to see our children and to know to whom 
to leave what shall remain after us. That has been my bad fortune 
But even if I, by the will of God, must bear this, there is no reason 
why you should do so. I see that the whole market-place is concern- 
ing Itself with our troubles and urging you to marry again Well, 
since they are trying to marry you off, then it is I who want to 
arrange your marriage for you, for no one is a greater friend to you 
than L' 

She then told him her plan; as there was no longer any likelihood 
that they two could ever have children, then he must bring to their 
home, beside her, a second wife, a younger one, by whom he might 
still be able to have children. The law gave him that right. She, natur- 
ally, would go on living in the house as ‘the old hadjimca* and see 
that everything was done properly. 

Hadji Omer long resisted and swore that he asked no better com- 
panion than she, that he did not need a second wife, but she stuck to 
her opinion and even informed him which girl she had chosen. Since 
he must marry in order to have children, then it were best that he 
take a young, healthy and pretty girl of poor family who would give 
him healthy heirs and, while she was alive, would be grateful for her 
good fortune. Her choice fell on pretty PaSa, daughter of the seam- 
stress from DugJe. 

So it was done. At the wish of his older vdfe and with her assis- 

194 



tance, Hadji Omer married the lovely Pa§a and eleven months later 
Pa§a gave birth to a healthy boy. So the question of Hadji Omer’s in- 
heritance was settled, the hopes of many relations were extinguished 
and the mouths of the market-place sealed. PaSa was happy and ‘the 
old hadjinica’ satisfied, and the two lived in Hadji Omer’s house in 
concord like mother and daughter. 

That fortunate conclusion of the question of Hadji Omer’s heir 
was the beginnmg of Corkan’s great sufferings. That winter the pnn- 
cipal amusement of the idle guests in 2[arije’s inn was Corkan’s sor- 
row at Pasa’s marriage. The imfortunate lover was drunk as he had 
never been before; the guests laughed till they cried. They all toasted 
him and each one of them got good value for his money. They 
mocked him with imaginary messages from Pa5a, assuring him that 
she wept night and day, that she was pming for him, not telling any- 
one the real reason for her sorrow. Corkan was m a frenzy, sang, 
wept, answered all questions seriously and in detail and bewailed the 
fate which had created him so unprepossessing and poor. 

‘Very well, Corkan. but how many years younger are you than 
Hadji Omer?’ one of the guests would ^gin the conversation. 

‘How do I know? And what good would it do me even if I were 
younger?’ Corkan answered bitterly. 

‘Eh, if 1 were to judge by heart and youth, then Hadji Omer would 
not have what he has, nor would our Corkan be sitting where he is,’ 
broke in another guest. 

It did not need much to make Corkan tender and sentimental. They 
poured him rum after rum and assured him that not only was he 
younger and handsomer and more suitable for Pala but that, after 
all, he was not so poor as he thought or as he seemed. In the long 
nights these idle men over their plum brandy thought up a whole 
history; how Corkan’s father, an unknown Turkish officer, whom no 
one had ever seen, had left a great property somewhere in Anatolia 
to his illegitimate son in ViSegrad as sole heir, but that some relations 
down there had stayed the execution of the will; that now it would 
only be necessary for Corkan to appear in the rich and distant city 
of Brusa to counter the intrigues and lies of these false heirs and re- 
cover what rightly belonged to him. Then he would be able to buy 
up Hadji Omer and all his wealth. 

Corkan listened, went on drinking and only sighed. All that pained 
him but at the same time did not stop him from sometimes thmking 
of himself so, and behaving as a man who has been cheated and 
robbed both in this town and over there somewhere m a distant and 
beautiful land, the homeland of his supposed father. Those around 
him pretended to make preparations for his journey to Brusa. Their 


195 



jokes were long, cruel and worked out to the smallest detail. One 
night they brought him a supposedly complete passport, and with 
coarse jokes and roars of laughter pulled Corkan into the centre of 
the mn and turned him round and exammed hun, m order to uiscribe 
his personal characteristics on it. Another time they calculated how 
much money he would need for his trip to Brusa, how he would 
travel and where he would spend his nights. That too passed a good 
part of the long night. 

When he was sober Corkan protested; he both believed and dis- 
believed all he was told, but he disbelieved more than he believed. 
When he was sober he believed, m fact, nothmg at all but as soon as 
he was drunk he behaved as though he believed it all. For when 
alcohol got a grip on him he no longer asked himself what was true 
and what was a lie. The truth was that, after the second little bottle 
of rum, he already seemed to feel the scented air from distant and 
unattainable Brusa and saw, a lovely sight, its green gardens and 
white houses. He had been deceived, unfortunate in everything from 
birth, m his family, his property and his love; wrong had been done 
to him, so great a wrong that God and men were alike his debtors. 
It was clear that he was not what he appeared to be or as men saw 
him. The need to tell all those around him tormented him more with 
every glass, though he himself felt how hard it was to prove a truth 
that was to him clear and evident, but against which cned out all 
that was in him and about him. After the first glass of rum, he ex- 
plained this to everyone, all night long, in broken sentences and with 
grotesque gestures and drunkard’s tears. The more he explained the 
more those around him joked and laughed. They laughed so long 
and heartily that then ribs and their jaws ached from that laughter, 
contagious, irresistible and sweeter than any food or drink. They 
laughed and forgot the boredom of the winter night, and like 
Corkan drank themselves silly. 

‘Kill yourself!’ shouted Mehaga Sara? who by his cold and appar- 
ently senous manner best knew how to provoke and excite Corkan 
‘Since you have not been man enough to seize Pa5a from that weak- 
ling of a Hadji Omer, then you oughtn’t to live any longer. Kill your- 
self, Corkan; that is my advice,’ 

‘Kill yourself, kill yourself!’ wailed Corkan. ‘Do you think I 
haven’t thought of that’ A hundred times I have gone to throw my- 
self into the Drina from the kapia and a hundred times something 
held me back.’ 

‘What held you back? Fear held you back, full breeches, Corkan!’ 

‘No, no. It was not fear, may God hear me, not fear!’ 

In the general uproar and laughter Corkan leapt up, beat his breast 

196 



and tore a piece of bread from the loaf before him and thrust it under 
the cold and immobile face of Mehaga. 

‘Do you see this? By my bread and my blessing, it was not fear, 
but . . / 

Suddenly someone began to hum in a low voice. 

‘On thy face it shines no longer 

Everyone picked up the song and drowned Mehaga’s voice shout- 
ing at Corkan. 

‘Kill . . kill . . your— self. . . f 

Thus singing they themselves fell into that state of exaltation into 
which they had tried to drive Corkan. The evening developed into a 
mad orgy. 

One February night they had thus awaited dawn, driving them- 
selves mad with their victim Corkan, and themselves victims of his 
folly It was already day when they came out of the inn. Heated with 
drink, with veins swollen and crackling, they went to the bridge 
which at the time waS coated with a fine layer of ice. 

With shouts and gusts of laughter, paying no heed to the few 
early passers-by, they bet among themselves; who dares to cross the 
bridge, but along the narrow stone parapet shining under the thin 
coating of ice. 

'Corkan dares!' shouted one of the drunkards 

‘Corkan^ Not on your life!' 

‘Who daren't’ V I dare to do what no living man dares,' shouted 
Corkan beating his breast noisily. 

‘You haven't the guts! Do it if you dare!' 

‘I dare, by God!' 

‘Corkan dares!' 

‘Liar!' 

These drunkards and boasters shouted each other down, even 
though they could scarcely keep their feet on the broad bridge, stag- 
gering, teetering and holding on to one another for support. 

They did not even notice when Corkan climbed on to the stone 
parapet. Then, suddenly, they saw him floating above them and, 
drunk and dishevelled as he was, begin to stand upright and walk 
along the flagstones on the parapet. 

The stone parapet was about two feet wide. Corkan walked along 
it swaying now left now right. On the left was the bridge and on the 
bridge, there beneath his feet, the crowd of drunken men who fol- 
lowed his every step and shouted words at him which he scarcely 
understood and heard only as an incomprehensible murmur; and on 


197 



the right a void, and in that void somewhere far below, the unseen 
river; a thick mist floated upwards from it and rose, like white smoke, 
in the chill morning air. 

The few passers-by halted, temfied, and with wide-open eyes 
watched the drunken man who was walking along the narrow and 
slippery parapet, poised above the void, waving his arms frantically 
to retain his balance. In that company of drunkards a few of the 
more sober who still had some commonsense watched the danger- 
ous game. Others, not realizing the danger, walked along beside the 
parapet and accompanied with their cnes the drunken man who 
balanced and swayed and danced above the abyss. 

All at once, in his dangerous position, Corkan felt himself 
separated from his companions. He was now like some gigantic mon- 
ster far above them. His first steps were slow and hesitating. His 
heavy clogs kept slipping on the stones covered with ice. It seemed 
to him that his legs were failing him, that the depths below attracted 
him irresistibly, that he must shp and fall, that he was already falling. 
But his imusual position and the nearness of great danger gave him 
strength and hitherto unknown powers. Struggling to maintain his 
balance, he made more and more little jumps and bent more and 
more from his waist and knees. Instead of walking he began to dance, 
he himself did not know how, as free of care as if he had been on a 
wide green field and not on that narrow and icy edge. All of a sudden 
he felt himself light and skilful as a man sometimes is in dreams. His 
heavy and exhausted body felt without weight. The drunken 
Corkan danced and floated above the depths as if on wings. He felt as 
if a gay strength flowed through his body which danced to an un- 
heard music and that gave him security and balance. His dance bore 
him onward where his walk would never have borne him No longer 
thinking of the danger or the possibility of a fall, he leapt from one 
leg to the other and sang with outstretched arms as if accompanying 
himself on a drum. 

Tiridam, tiridam, tiritiritintiridam, tiridam, tiridam . . 

Corkan sang and himself beat out the rhythm to which dancing 
surefootedly he made his dangerous crossing. His legs bent at the 
knees and he moved his head to left and right. 

‘Tiridam, tiridam . . . hai . . . hai. . . .’ 

In that unusual and dangerous position, exalted above all the 
others, he was no longer Corkan the One-Eyed, the butt of the town 
and the inn. Below him there was no longer that narrow and slippery 

198 



stone parapet of that familiar bridge on which he had countless times 
munched his bread and, thinking of the sweetness of death in the 
waves beneath, had gone to sleep in the shade of the kapia. 

No, this was that distant and unattainable voyage of which they 
had spoken every night at the inn with coarse jokes and mockery and 
on which now, at last, he had set out. This was that glorious long- 
desired path of great achievements and that in the distance at the 
end of It was the imperial city of Brusa with its real riches and his 
legitimate heritage, the setting sun and the lovely Pa5a with his son; 
his wife and his child. 

So, dancing in a sort of ecstasy, he passed the parapet around the 
sofa and then the second half of the bridge. When he came to the 
end he leapt down and looked confusedly about him, in wonder that 
he had once again landed on the hard and familiar Visegrad road. 
The crowd which till then had accompanied him with encourage- 
ment and jokes welcomed him. Those who had halted in fear rushed 
up. They began to embrace him, to clap him on the back and on his 
faded fez. All of them shouted together: 

‘Aferim, bravo, Corkan, our falcon** 

‘Bravo, hero!* 

‘Rum for Corkanl* yelled Santo Papo in a raucous voice with a 
Spanish accent, thinking that he was in the inn. 

In this general uproar and commotion someone proposed that they 
stay together and not go home, but go on drinking in honour of 
Corkan*s exploit. 

Those children who were then in their eighth and ninth years and 
were that morning hurrying across the frozen bridge to their distant 
school stopped and stared at the unusual sight They opened their 
mouths in astonishment and little clouds of steam rose from them. 
Tiny, muffled up, with slates and schoolbooks under their arms, they 
could not understand this game of the grown-ups, but for the rest of 
their lives they would remember, together with the lines of their 
own bridge, the picture of Corkan the One-Eyed, that man so well 
known to them who now, transfigured and light, dancing daringly 
and joyously as if transported by magic, walked where it was for- 
bidden to walk and where no one ever dared to go. 


199 



XVI 




A score of years had passed since the first yellow Austrian 
military vehicles had crossed the bndge Twenty years of 
occupation— that is a long sequence of days and months. 
Each such day and month, taken by itself, seemed uncertain 
and temporary, but all of them taken together constituted the 
longest period of peace and material progress that the town ever 
remembered, the mam part of the life of that generation which at 
the moment of the occupation had just come to years of discretion 

These were years of apparent prosperity and safe gains, even 
though small, when mothers spealdng of their sons said: ‘May he 
live and be healthy and may God grant him easy bread!*, and when 
even the wife of tall Ferhat, the eternal poor man, who lit the 
municipal street lamps and received for his work the wage of 
twelve florins a month, said with pride: ‘Thanks be to God, even 
my Ferhat has become an official.’ 

The last years of the nineteenth century, years without upheavals 
or important events, flowed past like a broad calm river before 
reaching its unknown mouth Judging from them, it seemed as if 
tragic moments had ceased to disturb the life of the European 
peoples or that of the town beside the bridge. In so far as they 
took place now and again in the world outside, they did not 
penetrate to ViSegrad and were far-off and incomprehensible to 
its townspeople. 

Thus, one summer day after so many years, there once more 
appeared on the kapia a white official notice. It was short and this 
time framed in a heavy black border, and announced that Her 
Majesty the Empress Elizabeth had died in Geneva, the victim of 
a dastardly assassination by an Italian anarchist, Lucchieni. The 
announcement went on to express the disgust and profound sorrow 
of all the peoples of the great Austro-Hungarian Monarchy and 
called on them to rally still more closely around the throne in 
loyal devotion and thereby afford the greatest consolation to the 


200 



ruler whom fate had so heavily bereaved. 

The announcement was pasted up below the white plaque with 
the Turkish inscription, as had at one time been the proclamation 
of General Filipovi(5 about the occupation, and all the people read 
It with emotion since it concerned an Empress, a woman, but 
without any real understanding or deep sympathy. 

For a few evenings there were no songs or noisy gatheungs on 
the kapia by order of the authorities 

There was only one man in the town whom this news deeply 
affected He was Pietro Sola, the only Italian in the town, a con- 
tractor and builder, stone-mason and artist, in short a man of all 
tasks and the specialist of the town Maistor-Pero, as the whole 
town called him, had come at the time of the occupation and had 
remained in the town, marrying a certain Stana, a poor girl of 
not too savoury a reputation She was reddish, powerful, twice as 
big as Maistor-Pero and was considered a woman of sharp tongue 
and heavy hand with whom it was better not to quarrel. Maistor- 
Pero himself was a small, bent, good-natured man with mild blue 
eyes and pendent moustaches He worked well and earned much. 
In time he had become a real townsman only, like Lotte, he was 
never able to master the language and the pronunciation. Because 
of his skilful hands and gentle nature he was loved by the whole 
town and his athletically powerful wife led him through life 
strictly and maternally, like a child 

When, returning home from work grey with stone-dust and 
streaked with paint, Maistor-Pero read the announcement on the 
kapia, he pulled his hat down over his eyes and feverishly bit 
on the thin pipe w'hich was always between his teeth He explained 
to the more serious and respected citizens whom he met that he, 
although an Italian, had nothing in common with this Lucchieni 
and his dastardly crime The people listened to him, consoled him 
and assured him that they believed him and that, furthermore, 
they had never even thought anything of the sort about him. None 
the less, he went on explaining to everyone that he was ashamed 
to be alive, that he had never even killed a chicken in his life 
how much less a human being, and that a woman and so great a 
personage. In the end his timidity became a real mania. The towns- 
people began to laugh at Maistor-Pero's worries, his zeal and his 
superfluous assurances that he had nothing m common with 
anarchists and murderers The urchins of the town at once made 
up a cruel game. Hidden behind some fence they would shout at 
Maistor-Pero: ‘Lucchieni!’ The poor devil defended himself from 
these shouts as from a swarm of wasps, pulled his hat down over 


201 



his eyes and fled home to bewail his fate and weep on the broad 
lap of his Stana 

‘I am ashamed, I am ashamed/ sobbed the little man, can’t 
look anyone m the face/ 

‘Get along, you old fool, what have you to be ashamed of? That 
an Italian has murdered the Empress? Let the Italian king be ashamed 
of that’ But who are you and what have you done to be ashamed of?* 

‘I am ashamed to be alive,’ wailed Maistor-Pero to the woman, 
who shook him and tried to instil a little strength and resolution 
into him and to teach him to walk through the market-place with 
head held high, not lowering his gaze before anyone 

Meanwhile the older men sat on the kapia with stony faces and 
downcast looks and listened to the most recent news, with details 
of the murder of the Austrian Empress. The news was no more 
than an excuse for a discussion on the fate of crowned heads and 
great men. Surrounded by a group of respectable, inquisitive and 
unlettered Turkish merchants, the Visegrad schoolmaster Hussein 
Effendi was holding forth on who and what were anarchists. 

The schoolmaster was just as stiff and solemn, clean and neat, 
as he had been twenty years before when awaiting the arrival of 
the first Schwabes with Mula Ibrahim and Pop Nikola, both of 
whom had long been lying in their respective graveyards His beard 
was already grey but just as carefully trimmed and rounded, his 
whole smooth face calm and peaceful, for men with a rigid under- 
standing and hard heart age slowly. The high opinion which he 
had always had of himself had grown even greater in these last 
twenty years It may be said in passing that the case of books 
on which his reputation as a learned man rested to a great extent 
was still largely unread, and his chronicle of the town had grown 
in these twenty years by four pages only, for the older the school- 
master grew he esteemed himself and his chronicle more and more 
and the events around him less and less. 

Now he spoke in a low voice, slowly as if reading from some 
obscure manuscript and in a dignified manner, solemnly and 
severely, using the fate of the infidel Empress only as a pretext 
which did not in any way enter into the real sense of his inter- 
pretation. According to this interpretation (and that too was not 
his own, for he had found it in the good old books inherited from 
his one-time teacher, the famous Arap-hod]a) those now known 
as anarchists had always existed and would always exist while 
the world lasted. Human life was so ordered— and God, the One, 
the Merciful and Compassionate, had so ordained— that for every 
dram of good there were two ^ams of evil and there could be 


202 



no goodness on this earth without hatred and no greatness without 
envy, even as there was not even the smallest object without its 
shadow That was particularly true of famous people. Beside each 
one of them, alongside their glory, was also their executioner 
waiting for his chance and who seized it, sometimes earlier, some- 
times later. 

Take for example our countryman Mehmed Pasha who has long 
been in Paradise,* said the schoolmaster and pointed to the stone 
plaque above the proclamation, ‘who served three Sultans and was 
wiser than Asaf and who by his power and piety erected even 
this stone on which we are sitting and who too died by the knife. 
Despite all his power and wisdom he was unable to escape his 
appointed hour Those whom the Grand Vezir hindered in their 
plans, and they were a great and powerful party, found a way to 
arm and suborn a mad dervish to* kill him, and that just at the 
moment when he was entering the mosque to pray With his shabby 
dervish cloak on his back and a rosary in his hand the dervish barred 
the way of the Vezir’s suite and humbly and hypocritically asked 
for alms, and when the Vezir was about to put his hand in his 
pocket to give them to him, the dervish stabbed him. And so 
Mehmed Pasha died as a martyr to the faith ' 

The men listened and blowing the smoke of their cigarettes far 
from them looked now at the stone plaque with the mscnption, 
now at the white placard bordered by a black line They listened 
attentively, though not one of them fully understood every word 
of the schoolmaster’s interpretation But, looking through their 
cigarette smoke into the distance, beyond the inscription and the 
placard, they seemed to see somewhere in the world another and 
different life, a life of great ascents and sudden falls, in which 
greatness mingled with tragedy and which m some manner main- 
tained a balance with this peaceful and monotonous existence of 
theirs on the kapia. 

But those days passed too. The old order returned to the kapia 
with Its usual loud conversations, jokes and songs Discussions 
about anarchists ceased; the announcement of the death of that 
foreign and little-known Empress changed under the influence of 
sun, rain and dust until at last the wind tore it away and it floated 
in fragments down river into the void. 

For a little longer the ragamuffins of the town shouted 
‘Lucchieni* after Maistor-Pero without knowing themselves what 
they meant nor why they did so, but solely from that childish 
need to tease and torment weak and sensitive creatures They 
shouted, and then ceased to shout having found some other amuse- 


203 



ment. Stana of Mejdan contributed not a little to this result by 
mercilessly beating two of the most obstreperous of the urchins. 

After a couple of months no one mentioned the Empress's death 
or anarchists any longer That life at the end of the century, which 
seemed tamed and domesticated for ever, concealed everything 
beneath its wide and monotonous course and left among men the 
feeling that a century was opening of peaceful industry leading 
into some distant and unattainable future. 

That unceasing and irresistible activity to which the foreign 
administrators seemed condemned and with which the townspeople 
were with difficulty reconciled, though they had just this to 
thank for their livelihood and their prosperity, changed many 
things in the course of those twenty years, in the outward appear- 
ance of the town and in the costume and habits of its citizens. 
It was natural that it would not stop short of the ancient bridge 
which looked eternally the same. 

It was in 1900, the close of that happy century and the beginning 
of the new, which in the feelings and opinions of many was to be 
even happier, that engineers came to examine the bridge The 
people were already accustomed to such things; even the children 
knew what it meant when these men in leather overcoats, with 
breast-pockets stuffed with varicoloured pencils, began to prowl 
about some hill or some building It meant that something would be 
demolished, built, dug up or changed Only no one was able to 
imagine what they could be doing with the bridge which to every 
living soul in the town meant a thing as eternal and unalterable as 
the earth on which they trod or the skies above them But the 
engineers inspected it, measured it and took notes; then they went 
away and the matter was forgotten But about midsummer, when 
the river was at its lowest, contractors and workmen suddenly 
began to arrive and erect temporary lean-tos to store their tools 
near the bridge. Already the rumour spread that the bridge was 
to be repaired, and complicated scaffolding was erected near the 
piers and on the bridge itself windlass lifts were set up; by their 
help the workers moved up and down the piers as on some narrow 
wooden balcony and stopped at places where there was a hok 
or wheie tufts of grass had grown out of the stonework. 

Every hole was plugged, the grasses plucked out and the birds' 
nests removed. When they had finished this task, work began on 
the waterlogged foundations of the bridge. The current was checked 
and its course altered so that the blackened and corroded stone 
could be seen, together with an occasional oak beam, worn away 
but petrified by the waters in which it had been placed 330 years 

204 



before. The indefatigable lifts lowered cement and gravel, load 
after load, and the three central piers which were the most exposed 
to the strong current and the most corroded were filled in at the 
bases as a rotten tooth is filled at its root. 

That summer there were no sessions on the kapia and the 
customary life around the bridge was suspended. The bridge was 
crowded with horses and carts bringing sand and cement. The 
shouts of the workmen and the orders of the foremen echoed 
from all sides On the kapia itself a wooden toolshed was erected. 

The townsmen watched the work on the great bridge, astonished 
and perplexed. Some made a jest of it, others only waved their 
arms and went their way, and to all of them it seemed that the 
foreigners were doing this work, as they did all other work, only 
because they must work at something. Work for them was a 
necessity and they could not do otherwise No one said this, but 
everybody thought it. 

All those who had been accustomed to pass their time on the 
kapia now sat outside Lotte’s hotel, Zarije's inn or in front of the 
wooden door-shutters of the shops near the bridge. There they 
drank coffee and told stories, waiting until the kapia should be 
free again and that attack on the bridge should pass, as a man 
waits for the end of a shower or some other inconvenience. 

In front of Alihodja’s shop which was sandwiched between the 
Stone Han and Zarije’s inn, where the bridge could be seen from 
an angle, two Turks sat from early morning, two hangers-on in 
the market-place, chatting about everything and more especially 
about the bridge. 

Alihodja listened to them in ill-humoured silence, pensively 
watching the bridge which was swarming with workmen hke ants. 

In those twenty years the hodja had married three times. Now 
he had a wife much younger than himself and malicious tongues 
said that that was the reason he was always ill-humoured until 
noon. By these three wives he had fourteen children. His house 
was filled with a noisy crowd all day long and in the market-place 
they said in jest that the hodja did not know all his own children 
by name. They even told a story of how one of his numerous brood 
met the hodja in a sidestreet and took his hand to kiss it, but the 
hodja only stroked his head and asked: ‘God give you good health, 
son! And whose may you be?* 

To the eye the hodja had not changed greatly; only he was now 
plumper and redder in the face. He no longer moved so briskly and 
went home up that steep slope to Mejdan more slowly than before, 
for his heart had been troubling him for some time, even when 


205 



he was asleep He had therefore gone to the district doctor. Dr 
Marovski, the only one of the newcomers whom he recognized 
and respected. The doctor gave him some drops which did not 
cure his ills, but helped him to bear them, and from him Ahhodja 
learnt the Latm name for his complaint: angina pectoris. 

Alihodja was one of the few local Turks who had accepted 
none of the novelties and changes which the newcomers had 
brought, either in dress, in customs, m speech or m methods of 
trade and business With that same bitter obstmacy with which 
he had at one time stood out against useless resistance, he had 
for years stood out against everything that was Austrian and foreign 
and against everything that was gathering impetus around him. For 
that reason he sometimes came into conflict with others and had 
had to pay fines to the police. Now he was a little tired and 
disillusioned, but he was essentially just the same as he had been 
when he had argued with Karamanh on the kapia, obstinate in 
everything and at all times; save that his proverbial freedom of 
speech had turned to sharpness and his fightmg spmt into a sullen 
bitterness which even the most daring words could not express 
and which was calmed and extinguished only in silence and in 
solitude. 

With time the hodja had fallen more and more into a sort of 
calm meditation in which he had no need of anyone else and found 
all men hard to endure Everyone, the idle merchants of the market- 
place, his customers, his young wife and all that horde of urchins 
which filled his house with noise, irritated him. Before the sun 
rose he fled from his house to his shop which he opened before 
any of the other merchants. There he earned out his mommg 
devotions. There his lunch was brought to him. And when, dunng 
the day, conversation, visitors and business bored him, he put up 
the wooden shutters and withdrew into a tiny closet behmd the 
shop which he called his coffin. That was a secret place, narrow, 
low and dark; the hodja almost filled it when he crawled in. 
He had there a small stool covered with a rug on which he 
could sit with crossed legs, a few shelves with empty boxes, old 
scales and all sorts of rubbish for which there was no room in 
the shop. In that narrow dark hole the hodja could hear through 
the thin Walls of his shop the hum of life in the market-place, the 
sound of horses’ hooves and the cries of the sellers. All that came 
to him as from another world. He could hear too some of the 
passers-by who stopped before his closed shop and made malicious 
jokes and comments about him. But he listened to them calmly, 
for to him these men were dead and had not realized it; he knew 


206 



and foigot them in the same moment. Hidden behind those few 
planks, he felt himself completely protected from all that this life 
could bring him, this life which in his opinion had long become 
rotten and proceeded along evil ways There the hodja shut himself 
in with his thoughts on the destiny of the world and the course 
of human affairs, and forgot all else, the market-place, his worries 
about debts and bad tenants, his too young wife whose youth and 
beauty had suddenly turned into a stupid and malicious ill-humour, 
and that brood of children which would have been a heavy burden 
on an Emperor’s treasury and about which he thought only with 
horror. 

After he had recovered his spirits and rested there, the hodja 
would again take down his shutters as if he had just come back 
from somewhere 

So now he listened to the empty chatter of his two neighbours. 

Tou see now how the times are and the gifts of God, time eats 
away even stone like the sole of a shoe. But the Schwabes will not 
have it so and at once mend what is damaged,’ philosophized one 
of them, a well-known lazybones from the market-place, as he 
sipped Alihodja’s coffee. 

‘While the Drina is the Drina the bridge will be the bridge 
Even if they had not touched it, it would last its appointed time 
All this expense and all this trouble will serve them nothing,’ said 
the other guest, of the same occupation as the first. 

They would have dragged on their idle chatter indefinitely had not 
Alihodja interrupted. 

‘And I tell you that no good will come of their interfering with 
the bridge. You will see, nothing good will come of all this restora- 
tion. What they repair today they will tear down again tomorrow. 
The late lamented Mula Ibrahim used to tell me that he had learnt 
from ancient books that it is a great sin to meddle with living 
water, to turn its course aside or change it, were it even for a 
day or an hour. But the Schwabes do not feel themselves alive 
unless they are hammenng or chiselling something or other. They 
would turn the whole world upside down if they could’’ 

The first of the idlers tried to show that, when all was said and 
done, it was not so bad that the Schwabes should repair the 
bridge. If it did not prolong its life it would at any rate do it 
no harm. 

‘And how do you know that they will do it no harm?’ the hodja 
broke in angnly. ‘Who told you? Don’t you know that a single 
word can destroy whole cities; how much more then such a babel! 
All this earth of God’s was built upon a word. If you were literate 


207 



and educated, as you are not, then you would know that this is 
not a building like any other, but one of those erected by God’s 
will and for God’s love; a certain ume and certain men built it, 
and another time and other men will destroy it. You know what 
the old men say about the Stone Han; there was none other like 
It m the Empire Yet who destroyed it? Had it been a question 
of its solidity and the skill of its construction it would have lasted 
a thousand years; yet it has melted away as if it had been made 
of wax and now on the place where it was the pigs grunt and 
the Schwabes’ trumpet sounds.’ 

‘But, as I think, I believe . . ’ the idler replied. 

Tou believe wrongly,’ interrupted the hodja. ‘According to your 
ideas nothing would ever have been built and nothing destroyed 
That has never occurred to you. But I tell you that all this is not 
good, it foretells evil, for the bridge and for the town and for 
all of us who are looking at it with our own eyes.’ 

‘He is right. The hodja knows best what the bridge is,’ broke in 
the other idler, maliciously recallmg Alihodja’s one-time martydom 
on the kapia. 

‘You needn’t think that I don’t know,’ said the hodja with con- 
viction and at once began, quite calmly to tell one of his stories 
at which the townsfolk used to mock, but to which they loved 
to listen time and time again. 

‘At one time my late lamented father heard from Sheik Dedqe and 
told me as a child how bridges first came to this world and how the 
first bridge was built. When Allah the Merciful and Compassionate 
first created this world, the earth was smooth and even as a finely 
engraved plate. That displeased the devil who envied man this gift 
of God. And while the earth was stUl just as it had come from God’s 
hands, damp and soft as unbaked clay, he stole up and scratched the 
face of God’s earth with his nails as much and as deeply as he could. 
Therefore, the story says, deep rivers and ravines were formed which 
divided one distnct from another and kept men apart, preventing 
them from travelling on that earth that God had given them as a 
garden for their food and their support. And Allah felt pity when he 
saw what the Accursed One had done, but was not able to return to 
the task which the devil had spoiled with his nails, so he sent his 
angels to help men and make things easier for them. When the angels 
saw how unfortunate men could not pass those abysses and ravines 
to finish the work they had to do, but tormented themselves and 
looked in vain and shouted from one side to the other, they spread 
their wings above those places and men were able to cross. So men 
learned from the angels of God how to build bridges, and therefore, 

208 



after fountains, the greatest blessing is to build a bridge and the 
greatest sin to interfere with it, for every bridge, from a tree trunk 
crossing a mountain stream to this great erection of Mehmed Pasha, 
has Its guardian angel who cares for it and maintams it as long as God 
has ordained that it should stand.’ 

'So It IS, so It is, by God’s will!’ the two idlers marvelled humbly. 

So they passed their time m conversation, as the days passed and 
the work went on there on the bridge, whence they could hear the 
squeakmg of carts and the pounding of machines mixing sand and 
cement. 

As always, in this discussion too, the hodja had the last word. No 
one wanted to press an argument with him to the end, least of all 
those two idle and empty-headed fellows who drank their coffee 
there and knew well that the next day also they would have to pass 
a good part of their long day in front of his shop. 

So Alihodja talked to everyone who stopped ^fore the shutters of 
his shop, whether on business or just making a call. They all listened 
to him with mocking curiosity and apparent attention, but no one in 
the town shared his opinions or had any understanding of his pessi- 
mism or his forebodings of evil, which he himself was unable to ex- 
plain or to support by proof. Furthermore they had for long been 
accustomed to look on the hodja as an eccentric and an obsunate 
man who now, under the influence of npening years, difficult cn-- 
cumstances and a young wife, saw the black side of everything and 
gave everything a speaal and ill-omened significance. 

The townspeople were, for the most part, indifferent to the work 
on the bridge, as they were towards everything which the new- 
comers had been doing for years in and about the town. Only the 
children were disappointed when they saw that the workmen with 
their wooden ladders went in through that black opening in the cen- 
tral pier, that ‘room’ in which by universal childish belief the Arab 
lived. From this place the workmen brought out and tipped into the 
nver countless baskets of birds’ droppings. And that was all. The 
Arab never appeared. The children made themselves late for school, 
waiting vainly for hours for the black man to emerge from his dark- 
ness and strike the first workman in his path, strike him so strongly 
that he would fly from his moving scaffolding in a great curve into 
the river. They were furious that this had not happened, and some 
of the urchins tried to say that it had happened already, but they did 
not sound convincing and all their ‘words of honour’ were to no 
purpose. 

As soon as the repair work on the bridge was finished, work began 
on a water supply. Till then the town had had wooden fountains of 


209 



which only two on Mejdan gave pure spring water; all the others, 
down on the level, were connected with water from the Drina or the 
Rzav and ran cloudy whenever the water of those two rivers was 
cloudy, and dried up altogether during the summer heats when the 
nver level fell. Now engineers found that this water was unhealthy. 
The new water was brought right from the mountains on the other 
side of the Drina, so that the pipes had to be taken across the bndge 
into the town. 

Once again there was noise and commotion on the bndge. Flag- 
stones were raised and a channel dug for the conduits. Fires burnt on 
which pitch was boiled and lead melted. Hemp was plaited mto 
ropes. The townspeople watched the work with distrust and 
curiosity as they had always done before. Alihodja was irritated by 
the smoke which drifted across the square to his shop, and spoke dis- 
dainfully of the ‘new’ unclean water which passed through iron 
pipes so that it was not fit to drink or for ablutions before prayer 
and which not even horses would drmk if they were still of the good 
old breed that they once were. He laughed at Lotte who brought the 
water into her hotel. To everyone willmg to listen he proved that the 
waterworks were only one of the signs of the approaching evil which 
sooner or later would fall upon the town. 

However, next summer, the water supply was installed, even as so 
many earlier works had been introduced and completed Clean and 
abundant water, which was no longer dependent either on drought 
or flood, flowed into the new iron fountains. Many brought the water 
into their courtyards and some even into their houses. 

That same autumn the building of the railway began. That was a 
much longer and more important task At first it did not seem to have 
any connection with the bridge. But that was only apparent. 

This was the narrow gauge railway described in newspaper 
articles and official papers as the ‘eastern railway’. It was to link 
Sarajevo with the Serbian frontier at Vardiste and the boundary of 
the Turkish-held Sanjak of Novi Pazar at Uvce. The line ran right 
through the town which was the most important station on it. 

Much was said and written about the political and strategic signi- 
ficance of this line, of the impending annexation of Bosnia and Her- 
zegovma, of the further aims of Austro-Hungary through the Sanjak 
to Salonica and all the complicated problems connected with them. 
But in the town all these things still seemed completely innocent and 
even attractive. There were new contractors, fresh hordes of work- 
men and new sources of gain for many. 

This time everything was on a grand scale. The building of the 
new line, 166 kilometres long, on which were about 100 bridges and 


210 



viaducts and about 130 tunnels, cost the state seventy-four million 
crowns. The people spoke of this great number of millions and then 
looked vaguely into the far distance as if trying in vam to see there 
this great mountain of money which went far beyond any calcula- 
tion or imagining. 'Seventy-four nulhons!' repeated many of them 
knowingly as if they could count them on the palm of their hand. 
For even in this remote little town where life in two-thirds of its 
forms was still completely oriental, men began to become enslaved 
by figures and to believe in statistics. ‘Somethmg less than half a mil- 
lion, or to be accurate 443,782.12 crowns per kilometre.* So the 
people filled their mouths with big figures but thereby neither be- 
came richer nor wiser. 

During the building of the railway, the people for the first time 
felt that the easy, carefree gains of the first years after the occupation 
existed no longer. For some years past the prices of goods and every- 
day necessities had been leaping upward. They leapt upward but 
never fell back and then, after a shorter or a longer period, leapt up 
again It was true there was still money to be made and wages were 
high, but they were always at least twenty per cent less than real 
needs. This was some mad and artful game which more and more 
embittered the lives of more and more people, but m which they 
could do nothing for it depended on something far away, on those 
same unattainable and unknown sources whence had come also the 
prosperity of the first years. Many men who had grown rich immed- 
iately after the occupation, some fifteen or twenty years before, were 
now poor and their sons had to work for others. True, there were 
new men who had made money, but even in their hands the money 
played like quick-silver, like some spell by which a man might easily 
find himself with empty hands and tarnished reputation. It became 
more and more evident that the good profits and easier life which 
they had brought had their counterpart and were only pieces in some 
great and mysterious game of which no one knew all the rules and 
none could foresee the outcome. And yet everyone played his part 
in this game, some with a smaller some with a greater role, but all 
with permanent risk. 

In the summer of the fourth year the first train, decorated with 
green branches and flags, passed through the town. It was a moment 
of great popular rejoicing. The workmen were served with a free 
luncheon with great barrels of beer. The engineers had their pictures 
taken around the first locomotive. All that day travel on the railway 
was free ('One day free and a whole century for money,’ mocked 
Alihodja at those who took advantage of this first train). 

Only now, when the railway had been completed and was work- 


211 



ing. could It be seen what it meant for the bridge and its role in the 
life of the town. The line went down to the Drma by that slope be- 
low Mejdan, cut into the hillside, arcumvented the town itself and 
then went down to the level ground by the farthest houses near the 
banks of the Rzav, where the station was All traffic, both passengers 
and goods, with Sarajevo and beyond Sarajevo to the rest of the wes- 
tern world, now remained on the right bank of the Drina. The left 
bank, and with it the bridge, was completely paralysed. Only those 
from the villages on the left bank now went across the bridge, 
peasants with their httle overburdened horses and bullock carts 
or wagons dragging timber from distant forests to the station. 

The road which led upwards from the bridge across Lijeska to 
Semed and thence across the Glasinac and Romania ranges to 
Sarajevo, and which had at one time echoed to the songs of the 
drovers and the clatter of packhorses, began to be overgrown with 
grass and that fine green moss which gradually accompanies the de- 
cline of roads and buildings. The bridge was no longer used for 
travellmg, farewells were no longer said on the kapia and men no 
longer dismounted there to dnnk the stirrup-cups of plum brandy 
‘for the road’. 

The packhorse owners, their horses, the covered carts and little 
old-fashioned fiacres by which men at one time travelled to Sarajevo 
remained without work. The journey no longer lasted two whole 
days with a halt for the night at Rogatica, as up till now, but a mere 
four hours. That was one of those figures which made men stop and 
think, but they still spoke of them without understanding and with 
emotion, reckoning up all the gains and savings given them by speed 
They looked with wonder at the first townsmen who went one day 
to Sarajevo, finished their business, and returned home again the 
same evening. 

Alihodja, always mistrustful, pig-headed, plain-spoken and apart 
in that as in all else, was the exception. To those who boasted of the 
speed with which they could now finish their business and reckoned 
how much time, money and effort they had saved, he replied ill- 
humouredly that it was not important how much time a man saved, 
but what he did with it when he had saved it. If he used it for evil 
purposes then it had been better he had never had it. He tried to prove 
that the main thing was not that a man went swiftly but where he 
went and for what purpose and that, therefore, speed was not always 
an advantage. 

‘If you are going to hell, then it is better that you should go slowly,’ 
he said curtly to a young merchant. Ton are an imbecile if you think 
that the Schwabes have spent their money and brought their machine 


212 



here only for you to travel quickly and finish your business more 
conveniently. All you see is that you can ride, but you do not ask 
what the machine brings here and takes away other than you your- 
self and others like you. That you can’t get into your head. Ride then, 
my fine fellow, ride as much as you like, but I greatly fear that all 
your riding will lead only to a fall one of these fine days. The time 
will come when the Schwabes will make you ride where you don’t 
want to go and where you never even dreamt of going.' 

Whenever he heard the engine whistle as it rounded the bends on 
the slope behind the Stone Han, Alihodja would frown and his lips 
would move in incomprehensible murmurs and, looking out slant- 
wise from his shop at the unchanging bridge, he would go on 
elaborating his former idea, that the greatest buildings are founded 
by a word and that the peace and existence of whole towns and their 
inhabitants might depend upon a whistle. Or so at least it seemed to 
this weakened man who remembered much and had grown sud- 
denly old. 

But in that as in all else Alihodja was alone in his opinions like an 
eccentric and a dreamer. In truth the peasants too found it hard to 
grow accustomed to the railway. They made use of it, but could not 
feel at ease with it and could not understand its ways and habits 
They would come down from the mountains at the first crack of 
dawn, reaching the town about sunrise, and by the time they reached 
the first shops would begin asking everyone they met: 

‘Has the machine gone^' 

‘By your life and health, neighbour, it has gone long ago,' the idle 
shopkeepers lied heartlessly. 

‘Really gone^' 

‘No matter There’ll be another tomorrow.' 

They asked everyone without stopping for a moment, hurrying 
onwards and shouting at their wives and children who lagged behind 

They arrived at the station running One of the railwaymen re- 
assured them and told them that they had been misinformed and that 
there were still three good hours before the departure of the train. 
Then they recovered their breath and sat down along the walls of 
the station buildings, took out their breakfasts, ate them, and chatted 
or dozed, but remained continually alert. Whenever they heard the 
whistle of some goods engine they would leap to their feet and 
bundle their things together, shouting: 

‘Get up! Here comes the machine!’ 

The station official on the platform cursed them and drove them 
out again: 

‘Didn't I just tell you that it was more than three hours before the 

213 



train comes? What are you rushing for? Have you taken leave of 
your senses?’ 

They went back to their old places and sat down once more, but 
still suspicious and distrustful. At the first whistle or even only at 
some uncertain noise they once more leaped to their feet and crowded 
on to the platform, only to be repulsed once more to wait patiently 
and listen attentively. For however much the officials told them and 
explained to them, they could not get it into their heads that the 
‘machine’ was not some sort of swift, mysterious and deceitful con- 
traption invented by the Schwabes which slipped away from anyone 
inattentive enough to wink an eye and which had only one idea in its 
mind: how to cheat the peasant and leave without him. 

But all these things, the peasants’ stupidity and Alihodja’s bad- 
tempered grumbling, were things of no importance. The people 
laughed at them and at the same time soon grew accustomed to the 
railway as they had to everything else that was new, easy and 
pleasant. They still went out to the bridge and sat on the kapia as 
they had always done, and crossed it on their everyday affairs, but 
they travelled in the direction and manner imposed on them by the 
new times. Quickly and easily they grew reconciled to the idea that 
the road across the bridge no longer led to the outside world and 
that the bridge was no longer what it once had been: the link between 
East and West Better to say, most of them never thought about it. 

But the bridge still stood, the same as it had always been, with the 
eternal youth of a perfect conception, one of the great and good 
works of man, which do not know what it means to change and 
grow old and which, or so it seemed, do not share the fate of the 
transient things of this world. 


214 



XVII 




B ut there, beside the bridge, m the town bound to it by fate, 
the fruits of the new times were ripening. The year 1908 
brought with it great uneasiness and a sort of obscure threat 
which thenceforward never ceased to weigh upon the town. 
In fact this had begun much earlier, about the time of the building 
of the railway line and the first years of the new century. With the 
rise in prices and the incomprehensible but always perceptible fluc- 
tuations of government paper, dividends and exchanges, there was 
more and more talk of politics. 

Till then the townspeople had concerned themselves exclusively 
with what was near to them and well known, with their gains, their 
pastimes and, in the mam, only with questions of their family and 
their homes, their town or their religious community, but always 
directly and within definite limits, without looking much ahead or 
too far into the past. Now, however, more and more frequently in 
conversation questions arose which lay farther away, outside this 
narrow circle In Sarajevo religious and national organizations and 
parties were founded, Serbian and Moslem, which immediately set 
up their sub-committees in Vi§egrad. New papers were started in 
Sarajevo and began to arrive in the town. Reading rooms and choral 
societies were founded; first Serbian, then Moslem and finally Jewish. 
Students from the secondary schools and the universities at Vienna 
and Prague returned to their homes in the vacations and brought 
with them new books, pamphlets and a new manner of expression. 
By their example they showed to the younger townsfolk that they 
did not always have to keep their mouths shut and keep their 
thoughts to themselves as their elders had constantly believed 
and affirmed. Names of new organizations began to come into 
the conversation, religious and national, on wide bases and with 
bold aims, and finally workers’ organizations also. Then the 
word ‘strike’ was heard in the town for the first time. The young 
apprentices became more serious. In the evenings on the kapia 
they carried on conversations incomprehensible to others and ex- 

215 



changed little paper-backed pamphlets with such titles as: ‘What is 
socialism’’. ‘Eight hours of work, eight hours of rest, eight hours of 
self-improvement’ and ‘Aims and ways of the world proletariat’. 

There was talk to the peasants on the agranan problem, the rela- 
nons between serfs and landowners, of Turkish feudal landholding. 
The peasants listened, looking a little aside with imperceptible move- 
ments of their moustaches and little frowns, as if trying to remember 
all that was said in order to think it over later, either alone or m dis- 
cussion with their fellows. 

There were plenty of citizens who continued to keep a discreet 
silence and who rejected such novelties and such boldness of thought 
and language. But there were many more, especially among the 
younger ones, the poor and the idle, who accepted all this as a joyful 
confirmation which corresponded to their inner needs long kept 
silent, and brought into their lives that something great and exciting 
which had up till then been lacking. When reading speeches and 
articles, protests and memoranda issued by party or religious organi- 
zations. each one of them had the feeling that he was casting off 
chains, that his horizon was widening, his thoughts freed and his 
forces linked with those of men more distant and with other forces 
never thought of until then. 

Now they began to look at one another from a point of view they 
had never before taken In short, it seemed to them, in this matter 
also, that their life had become more expansive and richer, that the 
frontiers of the impermissible and the impossible had moved back 
and that there opened before them prospects arid possibilities such 
as had never before existed, even for him who until then had never 
possessed them. 

In actual fact, even now they had nothing new nor were they able 
to see anything better, but they were able to look beyond the every- 
day life of the town, and that gave them the exciting illusion of 
space and power. Their habits had not changed, their ways of life 
and the forms of mutual relations remained the same, only that in 
the time-honoured ritual of sitting idly over coffee, tobacco and 
plum brandy, bold words and new methods of conversation had 
been introduced. Men began to leave their old associates and form 
new groups, to be repelled or attracted according to new criteria and 
new ideas, but under the stress of old passions and ancestral instincts 

Now too, external events began to find their echo in the town. 
First there were the dynastic changes of 1903 in Serbia and then the 
change of rdgime in Turkey. The town which was right on the 
Serbian frontier and not far from the Turkish boundaries, linked by 
deep and invisible bonds to one or other of these two lands, felt these 


216 



changes, lived them and interpreted them, although nothing of all 
that was thought and felt about them was ever said publicly or talked 
of openly. 

The activities and pressure of the authorities began to be felt more 
openly in the town, first the civil authorities and then the military as 
well. And that in quite a new form; at first they had paid attention to 
who did what and how he behaved, and now they inquired about 
who thought what and how he expressed his opinions. The number 
of gendarmes in the surrounding villages along the frontier was 
gradually increased. A special Information Officer, a man from the 
Lika, arrived at the local headquarters. The police arrested and fined 
youths for imprudent declarations or for singing prohibited Serbian 
songs. Suspected foreigners were deported; and differences of opinion 
led to arguments and quarrels among the citizens themselves. 

With the introduction of the railway travelling became quicker 
and the transport of goods easier, and somehow at about the same 
time events too quickened their pace The townspeople did not notice 
this, for the quickening was gradual and all of them were involved 
in it. They became accustomed to sensations; exciting news was no 
longer something rare and unusual but an everyday food and a real 
need. The whole of life seemed to be hastening somewhere, suddenly 
speeded up, as a freshet quickens its pace before it breaks into rapids, 
rushes over steep rocks and becomes a cascade. 

Only four years had passed since the arrival of the first train in the 
town when, one October morning, a huge white proclamation was 
posted on the kapia, beneath the plaque with the Turkish inscrip- 
tion. It was put up by the municipal official Drago. At first only the 
idlers and children gathered round it and then, later, the rest of the 
citizens. Those who knew how to read deciphered the proclamation, 
spelling it out and halting at the foreign expressions and unfamiliar 
phrasing. The others listened in silence and with downcast eyes and 
after listening for a while dispersed without looking up, stroking 
their beards and moustaches as if to brush away words which had 
never been spoken. 

After the noon prayer Alihodja too came, placing a bar across his 
shop front as a sign that the shop was closed. This time the proclama- 
tion was not written in Turkish also, so that the bodja could not read 
it. A boy was reading the proclamation aloud, quite mechanically, 
as if at school. 

‘PROCLAMATION 
to the People of Bosnia and Herzegovina. 

‘We, Franz Joseph, Emperor of Austria, King of Bohemia etc. and 
Apo-apo-apo-stolic King of Hungary, to the inhabitants of Bosnia and 


217 



Herzegovina: When a gen-gener-generation ago Our Annies crossed 
the frontiers of Your lands. . . 

Alihodja felt his nght ear tingling beneath his white turban and, 
as if it had been the day before, his quarrel with Karamanli flashed 
before his eyes, the outrage then committed on him, the red cross 
which swam before his eyes filled with tears, while the Austrian 
soldier carefully extracted the nail, and the white placard with the 
proclamation then addressed to the people. 

The youth went on: 

‘An ass-ass-assurance was then given You that they had not come 
as enemies but as Your friends with the avowed intention of rooting 
out all the evils which had for years op-op-oppressed You. 

‘That word given to You in that crit-critical moment . . .’ 

Everyone shouted at the inexpert reader who, blushing and em- 
barrassed, slipped away into the crowd. In his place came some im- 
known man in a leather jacket, who seemed as if he were only wait- 
ing for his chance, who began to read quickly and fluently as if it 
were a prayer that he already knew by heart. 

‘That word given to You in that critical moment has been honestly 
kept. Our Government has always seriously concerned itself and 
worked to maintam peace and order, to lead Your Fatherland to- 
wards a happier future. 

‘And We, to Our great joy, dare freely to say the seed which has 
been sown in the furrows of the soil so prepared has produced a nch 
harvest. You too must feel those facts as a blessing; that in place of 
violence and tyranny have come order and security, that work and 
life have developed continuously, that the ennobling influence of its 
work has multiplied opportunities for culture and that under the 
protection of a regular administration every man may enjoy the 
fruits of his labours. 

‘It is the solemn duty of all of Us to continue along this way. 

‘Having this aim constantly before Our eyes. We hold that the 
time has come to give the inhabitants of these two lands a fresh proof 
of Our faith in their political maturity. In order to raise Bosnia and 
Herzegovina to a higher level of political life. We have decided to 
grant constitutional institutions— such as will answer to their pre- 
sent conditions and their common interests— to both these lands and 
to give in this manner a legal basis for the representation of their 
wishes and interests. 

‘Let Your voices also be heard when in the future decisions will 
be made touching the affairs of Your country which will have have, 
as it has had up till now, its separate administration. 

*But the first necessary condition for the introduction of this 


2i8 



national constitution is the clear and indubitable definition of the 
legal position of both these lands. Starting from this principle and 
bearing in mind those bonds which in olden times existed between 
Our glorious predecessors on the Throne of Hungary and these lands. 
We extend Our rights of sovereignty over Bosnia and Herzegovina 
and We desire that these lands accept the order of succession which 
IS valid for Our House 

Thus the inhabitants of both lands will become participators in 
all these benefits which will assure them the lasting consolidation 
of those bonds which, up to the present, have linked them to Us. The 
new state of affairs will be the guarantee that culture and prosperity 
will continue to find a sure home in Your country. 

'Bosnians and Herzegovinians! 

'Among the countless cares which surround Our Throne, that 
which We shall have for Your material and moral prosperity will not 
be the least. The supreme conception of the equality of all before 
the law, the participation in the making of laws and the administra- 
tion of the country, an equal protection afforded to all faiths, 
languages and national characteristics— all these supreme benefits 
You will enjoy in full measure. 

'The freedom of the individual and the good of the community 
will be the guiding star of Our Government for both these lands. . . / 

With mouth half open and head lowered, Alihodja listened to 
these words, for the most part unfamiliar or unknown to him, and 
even those words which were not of themselves unfamiliar became 
in that context in some manner queer and incomprehensible. 'Seed 
, , . sown in the furrows of the soil so prepared . . , first and neces- 
sary condition for the introduction of this local constitution; clear 
and indubitable definition of legal position . . . guiding star of Our 
Government!* Yes, those were the ‘Imperial words* once again! Each 
one of them opened before the hod]a*s inner vision now some dis- 
tant, extraordinary and dangerous horizon, now some sort of cur- 
tain which fell, black and leaden, j'ust before his eyes. So, first one 
thing and then the other; either he saw nothing or he saw something 
that he did not understand and which presaged no good. In this life 
nothing is impossible and every wonder possible It could even hap- 
pen that a man might listen carefully and yet understand nothing in 
detail while at the same time, when all those details were taken to- 
gether, he could realize completely and understand perfectly! That 
seed, that star, those cares about the throne; all those things might 
just as well have been in some foreign language, yet none the less 
the hodja, or so it seemed to him, could understand what they were 
intended to mean and what they wished to convey. These Emperors 


219 



had for the past thirty years shouted across the lands and aties and 
over the heads of the peoples; yet every word in every proclamation 
of every Emperor was pregnant with meanmg. For these countries 
were broken into fragments and in these countries heads rolled be- 
cause of these words. So they spoke of ‘seed . . . stars . . . cares of the 
throne’ lest they call things by their real names and speak what was 
the fact; that lands and provinces and, with them, living men and 
their habitations passed from hand to hand like small change; that a 
well-intentioned true-believing man could no longer find peace on 
this earth, no more than he could find the little he needed for this 
short life; that his position and his goods changed independently of 
himself and contrary to his wishes and his best intentions. 

Alihodja listened and he had continually the impression that these 
words were the same words of thirty years ago; he felt the same 
leaden heaviness in his breast, the same message that the Turkish 
times were ended and that ‘the Turkish candle was burned out’, but 
that it was necessary to repeat them for they would not understand 
or realize them, but deceived themselves and pretended to know 
nothing of them. 

‘You will therefore show Yourselves worthy of the confidence 
placed in You, so that the noble harmony existing between ruler and 
people, that most precious gage of all state progress, will always 
accompany Our common labours 

‘Given in our Royal and Capital City of Budapest. 

Franz Joseph.' 

The man in the leather jacket suddenly ceased reading and 
shouted unexpectedly: 

‘Long live His Majesty the Emperor!’ 

‘Long life,’ shouted tall Ferhat, the municipal lamplighter, as if by 
order. 

All the others dispersed at the same moment in silence. 

Before dark that day the great white proclamation was tom down 
and thrown into the Drina. The next day some Serbian youths were 
arrested on suspicion and a fresh copy of the white proclamation 
was put up on the kapia and a local gendarme posted there to guard 
it. 

Whenever a government feels the need of promising peace and 
prosperity to its citizens by means of a proclamation, it is time to 
be on guard and expect the opposite. Towards the end of October, the 
army began to arrive, not only by train but also along the old deserted 
road. As it had done thirty years before, it came down the steep 
slope from Sarajevo and crossed the bridge into the town, with arms 
and commissariat. There were units of all kinds except cavalry. All 


220 



the barracks were full. They camped under canvas Fresh units were 
continually arriving, stayed a few days m the town and were then 
posted to the villages along the Serbian frontier. The soldiers were 
mainly reservists, of vanous nationalities, with plenty of money. 
They made their minor personal purchases in the shops and bought 
fruit and sweetmeats at the street-corners. Prices leapt. Hay and oats 
completely disappeared. Fortifications began to be built on the hills 
surrounding the town And on the bridge itself a very strange task 
began. In the middle of the bridge, just beyond the kapia as one came 
from the town to go to the left bank of the Drina, workmen specially 
brought for the job began to drill a hole about a yard square in one 
of the piers. The spot where they worked was concealed under a 
green tent, from beneath which continual hammering could be 
heard as they went deeper and deeper. The stone excavated was at 
once thrown over the parapet into the river. But however much the 
work was concealed, it was soon known in the town that the bridge 
was being mined, that is to say that a deep opening was being dug 
through one of the piers, right to the foundations, and that explosives 
would be placed in it in case war broke out and it was found neces- 
sary to destroy the bridge Long iron ladders led down into the open- 
ing and when everything was finished an iron manhole cover was 
placed over it. Within a few days this cover could no longer be dis- 
tinguished from the stones and dust. Carts passed over it, horses 
trotted by, and the townsmen hurried on their business without 
giving a thought to the mine and the explosives beneath. Only the 
children on their way to school halted for a moment at this spot, 
tapped inquisitively at that iron cover, trying to guess what was be- 
neath it. They made up tales of some Arab hidden in the bridge, and 
argued among themselves about what an explosive was, what it did 
and whether it could ever destroy so ^eat a building. 

Among the grown-ups, only Ahhodja prowled around and gazed 
sombrely and suspiciously both at the green tent while the work was 
going on and at the iron cover which remained on the bndge after it 
had been finished. He listened to all that was said or whispered; that 
a hole as deep as a well had been made in that pier and explosives 
placed in it, and that it was connected by an electrical lead to the 
bank so that the commandant could at any time of the day or night 
destroy the bridge right in the middle as though it were made of 
sugar and not of stone. The hodja listened, shook his head, thought it 
over by day when he retired to his ‘coffin’ and by night in bed when 
he should have been asleep: now he believed, now he rejected such 
an idea as mad and godless, but he worried about it continually so 
that even in his sleep the one-time mutevehs of Mehmed Pasha’s 


221 



vakuf appeared before him and asked him severely what all this was 
and what were they doing to the bndge. He turned his troubles over 
and over in his mind. He did not want to ask anyone in the market, 
considenng that for a long time past there had been no one with 
whom a sensible man could consult or converse reasonably, since all 
the people had either lost their senses and their reputations or were 
]ust as embittered and confused as he himself was. 

None the less, he soon found an opportunity to learn more about 
It. One of the Brankovid begs from Crn^e, Muhamed, who had done 
his army service in Vienna, had stayed there as a long-service man 
and been promoted to sergeant-major (he was the grandson of that 
Shemsibeg who after the occupation had shut himself up in CrnCe 
and died of sorrow, and who was still quoted by the older Turks as 
an unattainable example of moral grandeur and logic). Muhamed- 
beg had that year come home on leave. He was a big tall man of red- 
dish complexion, dressed in an impeccable dark-blue uniform with 
yellow rank-badges, red piping and little silver stars on his lapel, 
with white kid-gloves on his hands and red fez on his head. 
Courteous, smiling, irreproachably clean and neat, he walked in the 
market-place, his long sword tapping gently on the cobbles, greet- 
ing everyone amiably and confidently like a man who has eaten 
the bread of the Emperor, who has no doubt of his own importance 
or any reason to be afraid of others. 

When this Muhamed-beg came to his shop, asked about his health 
and sat down to drink a cup of coffee, Alihodja took the opportunity 
of asking him, as an ‘imperial man’ who lived far from the town, for 
an explanation of the cares that oppressed him. He told him what 
the trouble was, what had been done on the bridge and what they 
were saying in the town, and asked him if such a thing were possible 
and whether they could plan the destruction of a bequest of such 
universal benefit as this one. 

As soon as he had heard what was in question, the sergeant-major 
suddenly became serious. His broad smile disappeared and his ruddy 
clean-shaven face took on a wooden expression as if he were on 
parade at the moment of the command: attention. He was silent for 
a moment as if in indecision and then replied in a sort of hushed 
voice. 

‘There is something in all you say. But if you really want my ad- 
vice, then it is best not to inquire about this or speak of it, for it 
comes under the head of military preparedness, official secrets and 
so forth and so on.' 

The hodja hated all the new expressions and especially that ‘and 
so forth and so on’. It was not only that the words grated on his ears. 


222 



but he felt clearly that, in the speech of these strangers, it took the 
place of an unspoken truth and that all that had been said before 
meant nothing at all. 

*In the Name of God, don’t stuff me up with their . . . “and so forth 
and so on”, but tell me and explain, if you can, what they are doing 
to the bridge. There can be no secret about that. In any case what 
sort of a secret is that, if even the schoolchildren talk about it?’ the 
hodja interrupted angrily. ‘What has the bridge to do with their war?’ 

‘It has, Ahhodja; it has very much to do with it,’ said Brankovid, 
once again smiling. 

And he explained to Alihodja amiably but a little condescendingly, 
as if speaking to a child, that all this was provided for in the rules of 
the service, that this was the duty of engineers and bridge-builders, 
and that in the Imperial Army everyone knew only his own job and 
did not concern himself in the affairs of some other branch. 

The hod]a listened to him, listened and watched, but did not under- 
stand very much Finally, he could no longer hold himself in. 

‘All that IS very fine, my fine fellow, but do they know that this is 
a Vezir's bequest, built for the good of his soul and the glory of God 
and that it is a sin to take even a stone from it?’ 

The sergeant-major only waved his hands, shrugged his shoulders, 
pursed his lips and closed his eyes, so that his whole face assumed a 
crafty and obsequious expression, unmoving, blind, deaf, such as 
men can only achieve by long years of practice in old-fashioned and 
decaying administrations in which discretion has long degenerated 
into insensibility and obedience into cowardice. A page of white un- 
sullied paper is eloquent compared with the dumb caution of such a 
face. A moment later, the Emperor’s man opened his eyes, let fall his 
hands, composed his face and once again resumed his usual appear- 
ance of confidence and serenity in which Viennese good-humour and 
Turkish courtesy met and mingled like two waters. Changing the sub- 
ject and praising with well-chosen words the hodja* s health and 
youthful appearance, he took his leave with the same inexhaustible 
amiability with which he had come. The hodja remained confused 
and uncertain in himself but in no way less troubled than he had 
been before. Lost in his thoughts he looked out from his shop at the 
shining loveliness of that first day of March. Opposite him, a little 
to the side, stood the eternal bridge, everlastingly the same; through 
its white arches could be seen the green, sparkling, tumultous waters 
of the Drina, so that they seemed like some strange diadem in two 
colours which sparkled in the sun. 


225 



XVIII 




T he tension known to the outside world as ‘the annexation 
crisis’, which had thrown its ill-omened shadow over the 
bridge and the town beside it, rapidly subsided. Somewhere 
out there, by diplomacy and discussions between the 
mterested parties, a peaceful solution had been found. 

The frontier, always so inflammable, for once did not flare up. 
The army which had filled the town and the frontier Adllages in the 
first days of spring began to withdraw. But as always the changes 
which the crisis had brought remained after it had passed. The per- 
manent garrison in the town was much larger than it had been be- 
fore. The bridge remained mined But no one gave it a thought ex- 
cept Alihodja Mutevelid. The piece of land on the left flank of the 
bridge above the ancient retaining wall, which had been the town 
park, was taken over by the military authorities. The fruit trees in 
the centre of the park were cut down and a fine building erected 
That was the new officers' mess, for the former mess, a small one- 
storied building up at Bikavac, was now too small for the increased 
number of officers. So that now, on the right of the bridge was Lotte’s 
hotel and on the left the officers’ mess, two white almost identical 
buildings and between them the square, surrounded by shops and, 
on a small rise above the square, the great barracks which the people 
still called the Stone Han in memory of Mehmed Pasha’s caravan- 
serai which had once been there but had now disappeared without 
trace. 

Prices, which had leapt up the previous autumn because of the 
large number of soldiers, remained unchanged, with much greater 
likelihood of further rises than of returning to their former level. 
That year a Serbian and a Moslem bank were opened. The people 
made use of money-orders like medicines. Now everybody incurred 
debts more freely. But the more money a man had the more he 
needed Only to those who spent more than they gained did life seem 
easy and good. But the merchants and business men were worried. 
Terms of payment become shorter than ever. Good and reliable cus- 


224 



tomers were fewer and fewer. The number of articles whose price 
was higher than the people could afford to pay was ever greater. 
Business was on a small scale, and cheaper and cheaper types of goods 
were in demand Only bad payers bought freely. The only sure and 
safe business was army contracting or work for some government 
institution, but not everyone could get it. State taxes and municipal 
dues became larger and more numerous; the strictness of the collec- 
tors increased. One could feel from afar the unhealthy fluctuations 
of the exchanges. The profits which arose from them went into un- 
seen hands, while the losses reached even the most remote corners 
of the monarchy and struck the retail traders, both as sellers and 
consumers. 

The general feeling in the town was neither more serene nor more 
calm. That sudden slackening of tension did not result in a real 
appeasement either among the Serbs or the Moslems; it left to the 
first a concealed disillusionment, to the second distrust and fear of 
the future. The expectation of great events began to grow once more, 
without visible reason or direct cause. The people hoped for some- 
thing or were afraid of something (in actual fact some hoped while 
others feared) and looked on everything in the light of those hopes 
and fears. In a word, men's hearts were disturbed, even among the 
simple and illiterate, especially among the younger people, and no 
one was any longer satisfied with the monotonous sort of life which 
had dragged on for years. Everyone wanted more, asked for better or 
trembled m fear of worse. The older people still regretted that ‘sweet 
tranquillity* which in Turkish times had been regarded as the main 
aim of existence and the most perfect expression of public and pri- 
vate life, and which had still existed in the first decades of the Aus- 
trian administration. But there were few of these. All the others de- 
manded an animated, noisy and exciting life. They wanted sensations 
or the echo of sensations or at least variety, noise and excitement 
which would give the illusion of sensation. That desire changed not 
only the state of men's minds but even the external appearance of 
the town. Even that time-honoured and established life on the kapia, 
that life of quiet conversation and peaceful meditations, simple jokes 
and lovesick songs between the waters, the sky and the mountains, 
began to change. 

The coffee merchant obtained a gramophone, a clumsy wooden 
box with a big tin trumpet in the shape of a bright blue flower. His 
son changed the records and the needles and was continually wind- 
ing this raucous contraption which echoed from both banks and 
made the kapia quiver. He had been forced to get it in order not to 
be left behind by his competitors, for now gramophones could be 

H 225 



heard not only at meetings and m the reading rooms but even in the 
humblest cafes where the guests sat under a lime tree, on the grass or 
on brightly-ht balconies, and talked with few words and in low 
voices Everywhere the gramophone ground and churned out 
Turkish marches, Serbian patriotic songs or arias from Viennese 
operettas, according to the tastes of the guests for whom it played. 
For men would no longer go where there was neither noise, glitter 
nor movement. 

Newspapers were read avidly, but superficially and hastily; every* 
one looked only for the sensational news printed m large type on the 
front page. There were few who read the articles or the news in small 
type All that took place was accompanied by clamour and the bril- 
liance of big words. The younger people did not think that they had 
lived that day if by the evening their ears were not singing or their 
eyes had not been dazzled by what they had heard or seen in the 
course of the day. 

The agas and eSendis of the town came to the kapid, serious and 
outwardly indifferent, to listen to the latest news about the Turco- 
Italian war in Tripoli. They listened avidly to all that was written 
in the papers about the heroic young Turkish major, Enver Bey, who 
beat the Italians and defended the Sultan’s lands like a descendant 
of the Sokollis or the Kuprulus. They frowned at the raucous music 
of the gramophone, which prevented their thinking, and, without 
showing it, trembled deeply and sincerely for the fate of the distant 
Turkish province in Africa. 

It chanced that just then Pietro the Italian, Maistor-Pero, return- 
ing from work clothed in his linen overall, white with stone-dust 
and stained with paint and turpentine, crossed the bridge. He had 
grown old and bent and even more humble and timid. As at the time 
when Lucchieni assassinated the Empress, it seemed, by some logic 
incomprehensible to him, that he was again guilty of something 
which his Italian fellow-countrymen, with whom for many years 
he had had no contact, had done somewhere in the outer world. One 
of the Turkish youths shouted: 

*So you want Tripoli, you bastard! You there, I mean!’ and made 
obscene gestures at him. 

But Maistor-Pero, bent and tired, with his tools under his arm, only 
pulled his hat further over his eyes, feverishly bit on his pipe-stem 
and hurried home to Mejdan 

There his Stana was waiting for him She too had grown older 
and had lost some of her physical strength, but she was still a for- 
midable and outspoken woman. He complained bitterly to her about 
the young Turks who said things they should not have said and had 

226 



asked him about Tripoli, which until a few days ago he had not even 
known existed But Stana, as always, would not understand him or 
console him, but went on saying that it was he himself who was at 
fault and even deserved to have insults shouted at him. 

‘If you were a real man, which you are not, you would have hit 
their ugly phizzes with your chisel or your hammer. Then those 
ragamuffins would not even think of jeering at you but would get 
to their feet when you cross the bridge * 

‘Eh, Stana, Stana,* said Maistor-Pero good-humouredly and a little 
sadly, ‘how could a man hit another in the face with a hammer?* 

So those years passed in a succession of greater or lesser sensations, 
or m the constant need of them So it came to the autumn of 1912, 
then 1913 with the Balkan wars and the Serbian victories. By a 
strange exception, just these things which were of such great im- 
portance to the fate of the bridge and the town and all who lived in 
it came silently and almost unnoticed. 

Flushed with red at sunrise and sunset, golden at midday, the 
October days passed over the town, which was waiting for the maize 
crop and the new season's plum brandy. It was still pleasant to sit on 
the kapia in the noonday sun. Time, it seemed, was holding its breath 
over the town It was just then that it happened 

Even before the literates in the town could find their way through 
the contradictory newspaper reports, the war between Turkey and 
the four Balkan States had already broken out and followed the well- 
worn paths across the Balkans Before the people had fully grasped 
the sense and import of this war it was practically over as a result of 
the victories of the Serbian and Christian armies; all was ended far 
from ViSegrad, without fires on the frontiers, without the grumble 
of the guns and without heads on the kapia. As it had been with trade 
and money, so it was with those more important things also; every- 
thing happened far away and unbelievably quickly. Somewhere far 
away in the world the dice had been thrown, the battles fought, and 
it was there that the fate of each one of the townsfolk was decided. 

But if the outward appearance of the town remained peaceful and 
imchanged, these events stirred up in the minds of men whole tem- 
pests of the greatest enthusiasm and the deepest depression. As in the 
case of everything else that had happened in the world in recent 
years, they were looked on in the town with diametrically opposed 
feelings by the Serbs and the Moslems; only in their intensity and 
depth were they perhaps equal. These events surpassed all the hopes 
of the one; all the fears of the others appeared justified. Those desires 
which for hundreds of years had flown before the slow pace of his- 
tory could now no longer keep pace with it but outdistanced it by 


227 



some fantastic flight along the road to the most daring realization 

Everything that the town could see or feel directly of that fateful 
war took place inciedibly simply and with the swiftness of an 
arrow. 

At Uvce where the frontier between Austro-Hungary and Turkey 
followed the little river Uvac, and where a wooden bridge separated 
the Austrian gendarmerie barracks from the Turkish blockhouse, the 
Turkish officer with his small guard crossed to the Austrian side. 
There, he broke his sword with a theatrical gesture on the parapet 
of the bridge and surrendered to the Austrian gendarmes. At that 
moment the grey-clad Serbian infantry came down from the hills 
They replaced the old-fashioned askers along the whole frontier be- 
tween Bosnia and the Sanjak. The triangle between Austria, Turkey 
and Serbia disappeared The Turkish frontier which only the day be- 
fore had been about nine miles from the town was suddenly with- 
drawn more than 600 miles, somewhere far beyond Jedrene 
(Adnanople). 

So many and such important changes, earned out in so short a 
time, shook the town to its foundations. 

For the bridge on the Drina this change was fateful. The railway 
link with Sarajevo had, as we have seen, reduced its connection with 
the West and now, in a moment, its connection with the East also 
ceased. In fact the East, which had created it and which had up to 
the day before still been there, greatly shaken and weakened no 
doubt, but still as permanent and real as sky and land, had now 
vanished like an apparition. Now the bridge in reality no longer 
linked anythmg save the two parts of the town and those dozen or 
so villages on one or the other side of the Dnna 

The great stone bridge which, according to the ideas and the pious 
intentions of the Grand Vezir from Sokolovidi, was meant to link the 
two parts of the Empire, and ‘for the love of God’ make easier the 
passage from West to East and from East to West, was now in fact 
cut off from both East and West and abandoned like a stranded ship 
or a deserted shrine For three whole centuries it had endured and 
experienced everything and, unchanging, had truly served its pur- 
pose, but human needs had altered and world conditions changed, 
now its task had betrayed it. By i^s size, its solidity and its beauty, 
armies might pass across it and caravans follow one another for cen- 
turies to come, but thus, by the eternal and unforeseen play of human 
relations, the Vezir’s bequest suddenly found itself abandoned and, 
as if by some magic spell, outside the main stream of life. The present 
role of the bridge in no way corresponded to its eternally young 
appearance and its gigantic but harmonious proportions. But it still 

228 



stood the same as when the Grand Vezir had seen it in his inward 
vision behind closed eyes and as when his masons had built it; power- 
ful, beautiful and enduring, beyond all possibility of change. 

It needed time, it needed effort, before the townspeople understood 
all that has been said here in a few lines and what had in fact taken 
place in a few months. Not even in dreams did frontiers change so 
quickly or go so far away. 

All that had lain quiescent in men, as ancient as that bridge and 
equally dumb and motionless, now suddenly came alive and began 
to influence their everyday life, their general mood and the personal 
fate of every individual 

The first summer days of 1913 were rainy and oppressive. On the 
kapia by day sat the Moslems of the town, morose and disconsolate, 
about a dozen elderly men grouped around a younger one who read 
to them from the newspapers, interpreting foreign expressions and 
unusual names and explaining the geography. All smoked peacefully 
and gazed unwaveringly in front of them but could not completely 
conceal that they were anxious and shaken. Hiding their emotion, 
they bent over the map which showed the future partition of the 
Balkan Peninsula They looked at the paper and saw nothing in those 
curving lines, but they knew and understood everything, for their 
geography was in their blood and they felt biologically their picture 
of the world. 

‘Who will get Uskub (Skoplje)?* asked one old man, apparently in- 
differently, to the youth who was reading 

‘Serbia * 

‘Uh!’ 

‘And who will get Salonica?* 

‘Greece.* 

‘Uh! Uh** 

‘And Jedrene’* asked another in a low voice. 

‘Bulgaria, probably ' 

‘Uh! Uh! Uh!* 

These were not loud and mournful wailings, like women or weak- 
lings, but deep and stifled sighs which were lost with the tobacco 
smoke which drifted through their moustaches into the summer air 
Many of these old men had passed their seventieth year In their 
childhood, the Turkish power had stretched from the Lika and the 
Kordun right to Stambul and from Stambul to the uncertain desert 
frontiers of far off and illimitable Arabia (that Turkish power 
had been the great, indivisible and indestructible unity of the Moslem 
faith, all that part of the terrestrial globe where the muezzin called 
the faithful to prayer). They remembered that well, but they also 


229 



remembered how, later on, in the course of their lives, that Turkish 
power had withdrawn from Serbia into Bosnia and then from Bosnia 
into the Sanjak. And now, now they lived to see that power hke 
some fantastic ocean tide suddenly withdraw and pass away some- 
where far out of sight, while they remained here, deceived and 
menaced, like seaweed on dry land, left to their own devices and 
their own evil fate. All this came from God and was, without doubt, 
envisaged in the ordinances of God, but it was hard for men to under- 
stand; their breath came short, their consciousness was troubled, 
they felt as if the solid earth was being drawn irresistibly away from 
under their feet as if it were a carpet, and how frontiers which should 
have been firm and lasting had become fluid and shifting, moving 
away and lost in the distance hke the capricious rivulets of spring. 

With such thoughts and feelings the old men sat on the kapia and 
listened vaguely to all that the newspapers wrote. They listened 
silently though the words in which the papers spoke of kingdoms 
and states seemed to them mad, impudent and out of place, and their 
whole manner of writing as something godless, contrary to the eter- 
nal laws and the logic of life, something which would ‘get no better’ 
and with which no decent or honourable man could become recon- 
aled Above their heads floated clouds of tobacco smoke, and in 
the skies cruised white, fleecy clouds of a rainy summer, casting 
quick broad shadows on the earth. 

At night on the kapia youths from the Serbian houses sat till the 
small hours, singing loudly and provocatively the song about the 
Serbian gun and no one came to fine or punish them. Amongst them 
could often be noticed students from the universities or secondary 
schools. They were mostly thin, pale youths with long hair and black 
shallow hats with wide brims. That autumn they came very often, 
though the school year had already commenced. They came by train 
from Sarajevo with instructions and recommendations, passed the 
night here on the kapia, but were no longer in the town at dawn 
next day for the young men of ViSegrad sent them on by under- 
ground routes to Serbia. 

With the summer months, at the time of the school holidays, the 
town and the kapia became lively with schoolboys and students, 
born in the town and returning to their homes. They influenced the 
whole life of the tovra. 

At the end of June a group of students from the Sarajevo secon- 
dary school arrived in the town and in the first half of July students 
of law, medicine and philosophy from the Universities of Vienna, 
Prague, Graz and Zagreb, began to arrive one by one. With their 
arrival even the outward aspect of the town began to change. Their 

250 



young faces could be seen in the market-place and on the kapia and 
they were easily distinguishable by their bearing, their speech and 
their clothes from the established customs and unchanging clothing 
of the townspeople. They wore clothes of dull colours and the latest 
cut. This was the 'Glockenfagon' then considered the height of 
fashion and the best of taste in all Central Europe. On their heads 
they wore soft Panama hats with turned down brims and ribbons of 
six different but discreet colours; on their feet wide American shoes 
with sharply turned up toes Most of them carried very thick bamboo 
canes and in the lapels of their coats they wore metal Sokol badges 
or those of some student organization. 

The students brought with them new words and jokes, new dances 
from the balls of the previous winter, and especially new books and 
pamphlets, Serbian, Czech and German. 

It had happened earlier too, m the first years of the Austnan occu- 
pation, that young men from the town had gone away to study, but 
not in such large numbers nor inspired by this sort of spirit. In those 
first few decades a few of them had finished at the Teachers’ Train- 
ing College at Sarajevo, and two or thiee had even read philosophy 
at Vienna, but these had been rare exceptions, modest youths who 
had passed their examinations quietly and without advertisement 
and once their studies had been completed had been lost in the grey 
and countless ranks of the state bureaucracy But for some time past 
the number of students from the town had suddenly increased. By 
the help of national cultural institutions even peasants’ sons and the 
children of petty artisans went to the university The spirit and 
character of the students themselves changed. 

These were no longer those one-time students of the first years 
after the occupation, mild and timid youths devoted to their studies 
in the closest sense of the word. But neither were they the ordinary 
town dandies and goodfellows of an earlier time, future landowners 
and shopkeepers who at a certain period in their lives wasted their 
excess of youth and strength on the kapia till their families said of 
them- ‘Marry him off and stop his squalling!’ These were a new sort 
of young men, educated in various cities and states and under various 
influences. From the great cities, from the universities and schools 
which they attended, these young men came back intoxicated with 
that feeling of proud audacity with which his first and incomplete 
knowledge fills a young man, and carried away by ideas about the 
rights of peoples to freedom and of individuals to enjoyment and 
dignity. With every summer vacation they brought back with them 
free-thinking views on social and religious questions and an 
enthusiastically revived nationalism which recently, especially after 

231 



the Serbian victories in the Balkan wars, had grown to a universal 
conviction and, in many of these youths, to a fanatical desire for 
action and personal sacrifice. 

The kapia was the main scene of their meetings They would meet 
there after supper. In the darkness, under the stars or in the moon- 
light, above the boisterous river, echoed their songs, jests, noisy con- 
versation and endless arguments, new, bold, naive, sincere and unself- 
conscious 

With the students were also their childhood friends who had 
studied with them in the local elementary school, but had remained 
in the town as apprentices, shop assistants or clerks in the municipal 
offices. There were two types. Some were satisfied with their destiny 
and the life of the town in which they would pass their days. They 
looked with curiosity and sympathy at their educated comrades, ad- 
mired them and never thought of comparing themselves with them, 
and, without the slightest jealousy, followed their development and 
their career. There were others who were dissatisfied with life in the 
town to which they were condemned by force of circumstances and 
who longed for something that they considered higher and better 
and which had escaped them, becoming every day farther away and 
more inaccessible. Though they used to meet together with their 
student comrades, these youths usually kept apart from their edu- 
cated fellows either by some crude form of irony or by their un- 
friendly silence. They could not take part as equals in their conver- 
sations. Therefore, constantly tormented by their feeling of in- 
feriority, they now exaggerated and stressed in conversation their 
crudeness and ignorance by comparison with their more fortunate 
comrades or, from the height of their ignorance, mocked at all that 
they could not understand. In either case, envy breathed out of them 
as an almost visible and tangible force. But youth easily bears with 
even the worst instincts, and lives and moves freely and easily 
amongst them. 

There had been and there would be again starlight nights on the 
kapia and rich constellations and moonlight, but there had never 
been, and God alone knows whether there would be again, such 
young men who in such conversations and with such feelings and 
ideas would keep vigil on the kapia. That was a generation of rebel 
angels, in that short moment while they still had all the power and 
all the rights of angels and also the flaming pride of rebels. These 
sons of peasants, traders or artisans from a remote Bosnian town- 
ship had obtained from fate, without any special effort of their own, 
a free entry into the world and the great illusion of freedom. With 
their inborn small-town characteristics, they went out into the 

232 



world, chose more or less for themselves and accordmg to their own 
inclinations, momentary moods or the whims of chance, the subject 
of their studies, the nature of their entertainments and the circle of 
their friends and acquaintances. For the most part they were unable, 
or did not know how, to seize and make use of what they succeeded 
in seeing, but there was not one of them who did not have the feel- 
ing that he could take what he wished and that all that he took was 
his. Life (that word came up very often m their conversations, as it 
did in the literature and politics of the time, when it was always 
written wth a capital letter). Life stood before them as an object, 
as a field of action for their liberated senses, for their intellectual 
curiosity and their sentimental exploits, which knew no limits. All 
roads were open to them, onward to infinity; on most of those roads 
they would never even set foot, but none the less the intoxicating 
lust for life lay in the fact that they could (m theory at least) be free 
to choose which they would and dare to cross from one to the other. 
All that other men, other races, in other times and lands, had 
achieved and attained m the course of generations, through centuries 
of effort, at the cost of lives, of renunciations and of sacrifices greater 
and dearer than life, now lay before them as a chance inheritance 
and a dangerous gift of fate. It seemed fantastic and improbable but 
was none the less true, they could do with their youth what they 
liked, and give their judgments freely and without restriction; they 
dared to say what they liked and for many of them those words were 
the same as deeds, satisfying their atavistic need for heroism and 
glory, violence and destruction, yet they did not entail any obliga- 
tion to act nor any visible responsibility for what had been said. The 
most gifted amongst them despised all that they should have learnt 
and underestimated all that they were able to do, but they boasted 
of what they did not know and waxed enthusiastic at what was be- 
yond their powers to achieve. It is hard to imagine a more dan- 
gerous manner of entering into life or a surer way towards excep- 
tional deeds or total disaster. Only the best and strongest amongst 
them threw themselves into action with the fanaticism of fakirs and 
were there burnt up like flies, to be immediately hailed by their fel- 
lows as mart3^s and saints (for there is no generation TOthout its 
saints) and placed on pedestals as inaccessible examples. 

Every human generation has its own illusions with regard to civi- 
lization, some believe that they are taking part in its upsurge, others 
that they are witnesses of its extinction In fact, it always both flames 
up and smoulders and is extmguished, according to the place and the 
angle of view^ This generation which was now discussing philo- 
sophy, social and political questions on the kapia under the stars, 

233 



above the waters, was richer only m illusions; in every other way 
It was similar to any other It had the feeling both of lighting the 
first fires of one new civilization and extinguishing the last flickers 
of another which was burning out. What could especially be said of 
them was that there had not been for a long time past a generation 
which with greater boldness had dreamed and spoken about life, en- 
joyment and freedom and which had received less of life, suffered 
worse, laboured more hardly and died more often than had this one 
But in those summer days of 1913 all was still undetermined, unsure. 
Everything appeared as an exciting new game on that ancient bridge, 
which shone in the moonlight of those July nights, clean, young and 
unalterable, strong and lovely in its perfection, stronger than all that 
time might bring and men imagine or do. 


234 



XIX 




J ust as one warm summer night in August is like another, so the 
discussions of these schoolboys and students on the kapia were 
always the same or similar. 

Immediately after a good supper hurriedly eaten (for the day 
had passed in bathing and basking in the sun) they arrived one by 
one on the kapia. There was Janko Stikovid, son of a tailor from 
Mejdan, who had already been studying natural science at Graz for 
two years. He was a thin young man with sharp features and smooth 
black hair, vain, sensitive, dissatisfied with himself but even more 
with everyone about him. He read much and wrote articles under a 
pen-name which was already well known in revolutionary youth 
papers published in Prague and Zagreb. He also wrote poems and 
published them under another pen-name. He was preparing a book 
of them which was to be published by Zora, the Nationalist Edition. 
He was also a good speaker and a fiery debater at students' meetings. 
Velimir Stevanovid was a healthy, well-built youth, an adopted child 
of uncertain parentage; he was ironic, down to earth, thrifty and in- 
dustrious; he had completed his medical studies at Prague There was 
Jacov Herak, son of the good-natiued and popular Visegrad post- 
man, a small, dark law student, of piercing eyes and swift words, a 
socialist of polemical spirit, who was ashamed of his kind heart and 
concealed every trace of emotion. Ranko Mihailovid was a taciturn 
and good-natured youth was was studying law at Zagreb and was al- 
ready thinking of a career as a civil servant He took little part and 
that half-heartedly in his comrades' arguments and discussions on 
love, politics, views on life and social conditions. On his mother's 
side he was the great grandson of that Pop Mihailo whose head, with 
a cigar stuck between its lips, had been put on a stake and exposed 
on that very kapia. 

There were also a few Sarajevo secondary school students who 
listened avidly to their older colleagues and their tales of life in the 
great cities, and with the imagination that whips up the vanity and 
hidden desires of children thought of everything as even greater and 


235 



more beautiful than it really was or ever could be. Among them was 
Nikola Glasicanin, a pale stiff youth who because of poverty, poor 
health and lack of success had had to leave the secondary school 
after the fourth class and return to the town and accept a post as 
clerk to a German timber exporting firm He came from a decayed 
landowning family at Okoliste His grandfather, Milan GlasiJanin, 
had died a short time after the occupation, in the Sarajevo lunatic 
asylum, after gambling away in his youth the greater part of his 
property His father, Peter, a sickly creature without will, force or 
reputation had died some time ago Now Nikola spent all day long 
on the river bank with the workmen who poled the heavy pine logs 
and made them into rafts He measured the cubic meterage of the 
wood and afterwards, in the office, entered it in the books This 
monotonous task among such people, without ideals and without 
wider views, he felt as a torture and a humiliation, and the absence 
of any likelihood of being able to change his social status or get on 
in the world had created of the sensitive youth a man old before 
his time, bilious and taciturn. He read much in his spare time, but 
that spiritual food did nothing to give him force or exalt him, for 
everything in him took a sour turn His bad luck, his loneliness and 
his suffering opened his eyes and sharpened his senses to many 
things, but even the most beautiful thoughts and most precious 
knowledge could only discourage and embitter him the more, for 
they threw an even stronger light on his lack of success and his lack 
of prospects in the town. 

There was also Vlado Marid, a locksmith by trade, a merry and 
good-humoured man whom his colleagues from the higher schools 
loved and invited, as much for his strong and lovely baritone as for 
his simple-heartedness and goodness This vigorous young man with 
his locksmith’s cap on his head was one of those humble men who 
are always sufficient to themselves and do not think of comparing 
themselves with others, but calmly and thankfully accept whatever 
life offers to them and give simply and naturally all they can. 

There were also the two local schoolmistresses, Zorka and 
Zagorka. both born in the town. All the youths competed for their 
favours and around them played that naive, complicated, brilliant 
and tormenting game of love. In their presence the discussions raged 
like a court of love in earlier centuries; because of them young men 
would later sit on the kapia smoking in the darkness and solitude or 
singing with others after an evening spent drinking somewhere else; 
because of them there were hidden enmities between comrades, 
badly concealed jealousies and open quarrels. About ten o’clock the 
girls would go home: but the young men remained for long, though 

236 



the mood on the kapia slackened and the nval eloquence diminished. 

Stikovid, who usually took the lead in these discussions, that even- 
ing sat silent, smoking He was troubled and out of humour with 
himself, but he concealed it as he always concealed all his true feel- 
ings, though he never succeeded in concealmg them completely. That 
afternoon he had had his first rendezvous with the schoolmistress 
Zorka, an attractive girl with a full figure, pale face and fiery eyes 
On Stikovid’s insistence, they had been able to do the most difficult 
of all things in a small town; that is for a youth and a girl to meet in 
a hidden place where no one could see them or know anything about 
it They had met in her school which was deserted at that time be- 
cause of the holidays. He had gone in from one street, through the 
garden, and she from another by the mam entrance They had met 
in a dimly-lit, dusty room piled almost to the ceiling with benches. 
It is thus that the passion of love is often compelled to look for re- 
mote and ugly places They could neither sit nor he down. Both of 
them were embarrassed and awkward Too full of desire, too im- 
patient, they embraced and mingled on one of those benches which 
she knew so well, without looking at or noticing anything around 
them He was the first to recover. Abruptly, without transition, as 
young men do, he stood up to arrange his clothing and go away. The 
girl burst into tears. Their disillusion was mutual When he had more 
or less calmed down he went out, almost as if escaping, by a side 
door. 

At home he met the postman who had brought the youth-paper 
with his article The Balkans, Serbia and Bosnia-Herzegovina*. Read- 
ing the article again turned his thoughts away from the incident of 
a few moments before. But even in that he found reason for dissatis- 
faction There were printers' errors m the article and some of the 
sentences sounded silly to him; now, when it was no longer pos- 
sible to make alterations, it seemed to him that many things could 
have been better expressed, more clearly and more concisely. 

The same evening they sat on the kapia discussing his article in the 
presence of Zorka herself. His prinapal adversary was the talkative 
and aggressive Herak who looked at everything and criticized every- 
thing from an orthodox socialist viewpoint. The others only inter- 
vened m the discussion from time to time. The two schoolmistresses 
remained silent, preparing an unseen wreath for the victor. Stikovid 
defended himself weakly, firstly because he himself now saw many 
weaknesses and illogicalities in his own article, though he would 
never admit this before his colleagues; and secondly because he was 
troubled by the memory of the afternoon in the dusty and stuffy 
classroom, a scene which now seemed to him both comic and ugly 


257 



but which had long been the aim of his most intense desires and his 
most ardent feelmgs towards the pretty schoolmistress. She herself 
was sitting there in the summer darkness looking at him with shining 
eyes. He felt like a debtor and a criminal and would have given much 
not to have been in the school that day and not to be here with her 
now. In such a mood, Herak seemed to him like an aggressive gadfly 
from whose attacks he could only defend himself with difficulty It 
seemed to him that he must answer not only for his article but also 
for all that had happened that day in the school. Above all he wanted 
to be alone, somewhere far away, so that he could think calmly of 
something other than the article or the girl. But self-love drove him 
on to defend himself. Stikovid quoted Cvijid and Strosmajer, Herak 
Kautsky and Babel. 

‘You are putting the cart before the horse,’ shouted Herak, 
analysing Stikovid’s article. ‘It is not possible for the Balkan peasant, 
plunged in poverty and every sort of misery, to found a good and 
lasting state organization. Only the preliminary economic liberation 
of the exploited classes, the peasants and the workers, that is to say 
the greater number of the people, can create real conditions for the 
formation of independent states. That is a natural process and the 
road we all must take, and in no way the other way round. There- 
fore both national liberation and unification must be carried out in 
the spirit of socialist liberation and renascence. Otherwise it will 
happen that the peasant, worker and ordinary citizen will introduce 
their pauperism and their slavish mentality, like a mortal contagion, 
into the new state formations and the small number of exploiters will 
instil into them their parasitical, reactionary mentality and their 
anti-social instincts. Therefore enduring states or a healthy society 
cannot exist.’ 

‘All that is foreign book-learning, my good fellow,’ answered 
Stikovid, ‘which vanishes before the living impetus of awakened 
nationalist forces among the Serbs and then among the Croats and 
Slovenes also, though tending to one aim. Things do not come to pass 
according to the forecasts of German theoreticians but advance in 
complete accord with the deep sense of our history and our racial 
destiny. From Karageorge’s words: ‘Let each kill his Turkish chief 
the social problem in the Balkans has always solved itself by the way 
of national liberation movements and wars. It all moves beautifully 
lo^cally, from the less to the great, from the regional and tribal to 
the national and the formation of the State. Were not our victories 
at Kumanovo and on the Bregalnica also the greatest victories of 
progressive thought and social justice?’ 

‘That remains to be seen,’ broke in Herak. 

238 



‘Who does not see it now, will never see it. We believe . . 

‘You believe, but we believe nothing, but want to be convinced by 
actual proofs and facts,* answered Herak. 

‘Surely the disappearance of the Turks and the weakening of 
Austro-Hungary as the first step towards her annihilation are really 
the victories of small, democratic peoples and enslaved classes in 
their aspiration to find a place m the sun?* Stikovid developed his 
idea. 

‘If the realization of nationalist aims brings with it the creation of 
social justice, then in the Western European states which have for 
the most part achieved all their nationalist ideals and are in that 
matter satisfied, there should no longer be any major social prob- 
lems, or movements, or conflicts. Yet we see that that is not so. On 
the contrary.* 

‘And I keep telling you,* Stikovid answered weariedly, ‘that with- 
out the creation of independent states on the basis of national unity 
and modern conceptions of personal and social liberty, there can be 
no talk of “social liberation** For, as some Frenchman once said, 
politics come first. . . .* 

‘The stomach comes first,* interrupted Herak 

The others too became heated and the naive students' discussion 
became a youthful squabble with everyone talking at once and inter- 
rupting one another and which, at the first quips, degenerated into 
laughter and shouting. 

That was a welcome excuse for Stikovid to break off the argument 
and remain silent, without having to give the impression of a with- 
drawal or a defeat. 

After Zorka and Zagorka who went home about ten o'clock, es- 
corted by Velimir and Ranko, the others too began to disperse. At last 
only Stikovid and Nikola Glasidanin were left. 

These two were about the same age. At one time they had gone to 
school together and had shared the same lodgings in Sarajevo. They 
knew one another down to the last detail and just for that reason 
they could neither of them make up their mind whether they really 
liked one another. With the years the distance between them 
naturally became wider and harder to bridge. Every vacation they 
met again here in the town and each took the other's measure and 
looked on the other as an inseparable enemy. Now the beautiful and 
wayward schoolmistress Zorka had also come between them. In the 
long months of the previous winter she had gone about with Glasi- 
danin who had never concealed, or been able to conceal, that he was 
in love. He had plunged head over heels in love with all the fire that 
embittered and dissatisfied persons can put into such an emotion. 


239 



But as soon as the summer months came and the students began to 
appear, the sensitive Glasicanm was unable to avoid seeing the in- 
terest that the schoolmistress showed in Stikovid For that reason the 
old tension between them, which had always been kept hidden from 
others, had greatly increased. All this vacation they had not once 
been alone together as they were now. 

Now that chance had so arranged it, the first thought of each of 
them was to separate as soon as possible without conversation which 
could only be unpleasant for both. But some ridiculous considera- 
tion, known only to youth, prevented them from doing as they 
wished. But in this embarrassment chance again helped them and 
lessened at least for a moment the heavy silence that oppressed them. 

In the darkness could be heard the voices of two youths who were 
walkmg on the bndge. They were moving slowly and ]ust then halted 
by the kapia behind the angle of the parapet, so that Stikovid and 
Glasidanin could not see them, or be seen by them, from their seat on 
the sofa. But they could hear every word and the voices were well 
known to them. They were two of their younger comrades, Toma 
Galus and Fehim Bahtijarevid. These two kept themselves a little 
apart from the group which comprised most of the other students 
and which gathered every evening on the kapia around Stikovid and 
Herak, for, although younger, Galus was a rival of Stikovid both as 
a poet and as a nationalist speaker. He did not like Stikovid nor ad- 
mire him, while Bahtijarevid was exceptionally silent, proud and re- 
served as befitted a true grandchild of a family of begs. 

Toma Galus was a tall youth with red cheeks and blue eyes His 
father, Alban von Galus, the last descendant of an ancient family of 
the Burgenland, had come to the town as a civil servant immediately 
after the occupation. He had been for twelve years a forestry inspec- 
tor and now lived in the town on pension. At the very beginning, he 
had married the daughter of one of the local landowners, Hadji Toma 
Stankovid, a robust and full-blown young woman of dark skin and 
strong will. They had had three children, two daughters and one son, 
all of whom had been christened into the Serbian Orthodox Church 
and had grown up like real townsmen’s children and grandchildren 
of Hadji Toma. 

Old Galus, a tall and formerly a very handsome man, with a 
pleasant smile and masses of thick white hair, had long become a 
real townsman, ‘Mr Albo’, whom the younger generation could not 
think of as a foreigner and a newcomer. He had two passions which 
harmed no one; hunting and his pipe, and had made many old and 
true friends, both among the Serbs and among the Moslems, through- 
out the whole district who shared his passion for the chase. He had 


240 



completely assimilated many of their customs as if he had been born 
and bred amongst them, espeaally their habit of cheerful silence and 
calm conversation, so characteristic of men who are passionate 
smokers and who love hunting, the forests and life in the open. 

Young Galus had matriculated that year at Sarajevo and that 
autumn was due to go on to Vienna to study But in the matter of 
these studies there was a division of opinion in the family. The father 
wanted his son to study technical sciences or forestry and the son 
wanted to study philosophy. For Toma Galus only resembled his 
father in appearance and all his desires led him in a completely oppo- 
site direction. He was one of those good scholars, modest and ex- 
emplary in everything, who pass all their examinations with ease as 
if playing at them, but whose real and sincere interests are taken up 
with satisfying their somewhat confused and disordered spiritual 
aspirations outside school and outside the official curriculum These 
are students of serene and simple heart but of uneasy and inquisitive 
spirit. Those difficult and dangerous crises of the life of the senses 
and emotions through which so many other young men of their age 
pass, are almost unknown to them, therefore they find difficulty 
in stilling their spiritual anxieties and very often remain all their 
lives dilettantes, interesting eccentrics without stable occupation or 
definite interests. As every young man must not only fulfil the eternal 
and natural demands of youth and matunty and also pay tribute to 
the current spiritual moods and fashions of his time, which for the 
moment reign amongst youth, Galus too had written verses and was 
an active member of the revolutionary nationahst student organiza- 
tions. He had also studied French for five years as an optional sub- 
ject, taken an interest in literature and, more especially, philosophy 
He read passionately and indefatigably. The main body of reading 
of the young men at school in Sarajevo at that time consisted of 
works from the well-known and enormous German publishing list 
Reclams Universal-Bibhotek. These small, cheap booklets with yel- 
low covers and exceptionally small print were the main spiritual 
food available to the students of that time: from them they could be- 
come acquainted not only with German literature, but with all the 
more important works in world literature in German translation. 
From them Galus drew his knowledge of modern German philoso- 
phers, especially Nietzsche and Stimer, and in his walks in Sarajevo 
along the banks of the MiljaJka held endless discussions about them 
with a sort of cold passion, in no way linking his reading with his 
personal life, as so many youths often do. This type of young scholar 
just through his examinations, ripened too early and overloaded 
with all kinds of varied, chaotic and unco-ordinated knowledge, was 


241 



not rare among the students of that time A modest youth and a good 
student, Galus knew the freedom and the unrestraint of youth 
only in the daring of his thoughts and the exaggerations of his 
reading. 

Fehim Bahtijarevid was a townsman on his mother’s side only. 
His father had been born in Rogatica and was now kadi (Moslem 
judge) there, but his mother was from the great local family of 
Osmanagid. From his earliest childhood he had passed a part of the 
summer vacation in the town with his mother and her relatives. He 
was a slender youth, graceful and well formed, fine-boned but strong. 
Everything about him was measured, restrained, controlled. The fine 
oval of his face was sunburnt, his skin browned with light touches 
of a dark bluish shade, his movements few and abrupt; his eyes were 
black with blue shadings in the whites and his glance burning but 
without sparkle. He had thick eyebrows which met, and a fine black 
down on his upper lip. Such faces are reminiscent of Persian 
miniatures. 

That summer he too had matriculated and he was now waiting to 
get a state grant to study oriental languages in Vienna. 

The two young men were continuing some conversation begun 
earlier. The subject was Bahtijarevid’s choice of studies. Galus was 
proving to him that he would be making a mistake in taking up 
oriental studies In general Galus spoke much more, and more ani- 
matedly, than his companion for he was accustomed to be listened 
to and to lay down the law, while Bahtijarevid spoke shortly, like a 
man who has his own fixed ideas and feels no need to convince any- 
one else. Like most young men who have read much, Galus spoke 
with a naive satisfaction in words, picturesque expressions and com- 
parisons, and with a tendency to generalize, whereas Bahtijarevid 
spoke dryly, curtly, almost indifferently. 

Hidden in the shadows and reclining on the stone seats, Stikovid 
and Glasidanin remained silent as if they had tacitly agreed to listen 
to the conversation of their two comrades on the bridge. 

Finishing the conversation about studies, Galus said belligerently: 

‘In that you Moslems, you begs’ sons, often make a mistake. Dis- 
concerted by the new times, you no longer know your exact and 
rightful place in the world. Your love for everything oriental is only 
a contemporary expression of your “will to power”; for you the 
eastern way of life and thought is very closely bound up with a social 
and legal order which was the basis of your centuries of lordship. 
That is understandable. But it in no way means that you have any 
sense for orientalism as a study. You are orientals but you are making 
a mistake when you think that you are thereby called upon to be 

242 



orientalists. In general you have not got the calling or the true in- 
clination for science.’ 

‘Really!’ 

'No. you haven’t. And when I say that. I am not saying anything in- 
sulting or offensive. On the contrary. You are the only nobles in this 
country, or a least you were; for centuries you have enlarged, con- 
firmed and defended your privileges by sword and pen, legally, reli- 
giously and by force of arms; that has made of you typical warriors, 
admmistrators and landowners, and that class of men nowhere in the 
world worries about abstract sciences but leaves them to those who 
have nothing else and can do nothing else. The true studies for you 
are law and economics, for you are men of practical knowledge. Such 
are men from the ruling classes, always and everywhere ’ 

‘You mean that we should remain uneducated?’ 

‘No, it does not mean that, but it means that you must remain 
what you are or, if you like, what you have been; you must, for no 
one can be at the same time what he is and the contrary of what he 
is.’ 

‘But we are no longer a ruling class today. Today we are all equal,’ 
Bahtijarevid broke in once more with a touch of irony, in which was 
both bitterness and pride. 

‘You are not, naturally you are not. The conditions which at one 
time made you what you were have changed long ago, but that does 
not mean that you can change with the same speed. This is not the 
first, nor will it be the last, instance of a social caste losing its reason 
for existence and yet remaining the same. Conditions of life change 
but a class remains what it is, for only so can it exist and as such it 
will die.’ 

The conversation of the two unseen youths broke off for a 
moment, stifled by Bahtijarevid’s silence. 

In the clear June sky, above the dark mountains on the honzon, 
the moon appeared. The white plaque with the Turkish inscription 
suddenly shone in the moonlight, like a dimly lit window in the blue- 
black darkness. 

Bahtijarevid then said something, but in so low a voice that only 
disjointed and incomprehensible words reached Stikovid and Glasi- 
danin. As so often in young men’s discussions, in which changes of 
subject are rapid and bold, the conversation was now about another 
matter. From the study of oriental languages, they had now passed on 
to the content of the inscription on the white plaque before them 
and to the bridge and he who had built it. 

Galus’s voice was the louder and more expressive. While agreeing 
with Bahtijarevid’s praises of Mehmed Pasha Sokolovid and the Tur- 

243 



kish administration of his times, which had made possible the build- 
ing of such a bridge, he now developed his nationalist views on the 
past and present of the people, their culture and civilization (for in 
such student discussions each follows his own train of thought). 

‘You are right,’ said Galus. ‘He must have been a man of genius 
He was not the first nor the last man of our blood who distinguished 
himself in the service of a foreign empire. We have given hundreds 
of such men, statesmen, generals and artists, to Stambul, Rome and 
Vienna. The sense of our national unification in a single, great and 
powerful modern state lies just in that Our own forces should re- 
main in our own country and develop there and make their contri- 
bution to general culture in our name and not from foreign centres ’ 
‘Do you really think that those “centres” arose by chance and that 
it is possible to create new ones at will whenever and wherever one 
likesr 

‘Chance or not, that is no longer the question; it is not important 
how they arose, but it is important that today they are disappeanng, 
that they have flowered and decayed, that they must make way for 
new and different centres, through which young and free nations, 
appearing for the first time on the stage of history, can express them- 
selves directly.’ 

‘Do you think that Mehmed Pasha Sokolovid, had he remained a 
peasant’s child up there yonder at Sokolovidi, would have become 
what he became and would, among other things, have built this 
bridge on which we are now talking?’ 

‘In those times, certainly, he would not. But, when you come to 
think of it, it was not hard for Stambul to put up such buildings, 
when It took from us, and from so many other subject peoples, not 
only property and money, but also our best men and our purest 
blood. If you stop to think what we are and how much has been 
stolen from us through the centuries, then all these buildings are 
merely crumbs. But when we finally achieve our national freedom 
and our independence, then our money and our blood will be ours 
alone, and will stay ours Everything will be solely and uniquely for 
the improvement of our own national culture, which will bear our 
mark and our name and which will be mindful of the happiness and 
prosperity of all our people.’ 

Bahtijarevid remained silent, and that silence, like the most lively 
and eloquent speech, -provoked Galus. He raised his voice and con- 
tinued in a sharper tone. With all his natural vivacity and all the 
vocabulary then prevalent in nationalist literature, he set out the 
plans and aims of the revolutionary youth movement. All the living 
forces of the race must be awakened and set in action. Under their 


244 



blows the Austro-Hungarian monarchy, that prison of the peoples, 
would disintegrate as the Turkish Empire had disintegrated. All the 
anti-national and reactionary forces which today hinder, divide and 
lull to sleep our national forces will be routed and trampled under- 
foot. All this can be done, for the spirit of the times in which we live 
IS our strongest ally, for all the efforts of all the other small and 
oppressed nations support us Modem nationalism will triumph over 
religious diversities and outmoded prejudice, will liberate our people 
from foreign influence and exploitation. Then will the national state 
be born. 

Galus then described all the advantages and beauties of the new 
national state which was to rally all the Southern Slavs around 
Serbia as a sort of Piedmont on the basis of complete national unity, 
religious tolerance and civil equality His speech mixed up bold 
v/ords of uncertain meaning and expressions that accurately ex- 
pressed the needs of modern life, the deepest desires of a race, most 
of which were destined to remain only desires, and the justified and 
attainable demands of everyday reality It mingled the great truths 
which had ripened through the generations but which only youth 
could perceive in advance and dare to express, with the eternal illu- 
sions which are never extinguished but never attain realization, for 
one generation of youth hands them on to the next like that mytho- 
logical torch In the young man's speech there were, naturally, many 
assertions which could not have stood up to the criticism of reality 
and many suppositions which could not, perhaps, have borne 
the proof of experience, but in it too was that freshness, that 
precious essence which maintains and rejuvenates the tree of 
humanity. 

Bahtijarevid remained silent 

Tou will see, Fehim,’ Galus enthusiastically assured his friend as 
if it were a matter of the same night or the next morning, you will 
see We shall create a state which will make the most precious con- 
tribution to the progress of humanity, in which every effort will be 
blessed, every sacrifice holy, every thought original and expressed in 
our own words, and every deed marked with the stamp of our name. 
Then we will carry out work which will be the result of our free 
labour and the expression of our racial genius, put up buildings in 
comparison with which all that has been done in the centuries of 
foreign administration will appear like silly toys We will bridge 
greater rivers and deeper abysses We will build new, greater and 
better bridges, not to link foreign centres with conquered lands but 
to link our own lands with the rest of the world There cannot be any 
doubt any longer We are destined to realize all that the generations 



before us have aspired to; a state, bom in freedom and founded on 
justice, like a part of God’s thought realized here on earth.’ 

Bahtijarevid remained silent. Even Galus’s voice lowered in 
As his ideas became more exalted, his voice became lower and lower, 
hoarser and hoarser, till it became a strong and passionate whisper 
and was finally lost in the great silence of the night. At last both 
young men were silent. But none the less Bahtijarevid’s silence 
seemed a thing apart, heavy and obstinate in the night. It seemed like 
an impassable wall in the darkness which by the very weight of its 
existence resolutely rejected all that the other had said, and ex- 
pressed Its dumb, clear and unalterable opinion. 

The foundations of the world and the bases of life and human rela- 
tionships in it have been fixed for centuries. That does not mean that 
they do not change, but measured by the length of human existence 
they appear eternal. The relation between their endurance and the 
length of human existence is the same as the relation between the 
uneasy, moving and swift surface of a river and its stable and solid 
bed whose changes are slow and imperceptible. The very idea of the 
change of these ‘centres’ is unhealthy and unacceptable. That would 
be as if someone wished to change and measure the sources of great 
rivers or the sites of mountains. The desire for sudden changes and 
the thought of their realization by force often appears among men 
like a disease and gains ground mainly in young brains; only these 
brains do not think as they should, do not amount to anything in the 
end and the heads that think thus do not remain long on their 
shoulders. For it is not human desires that dispose and administer the 
things of the world Desire is like a wind; it shifts the dust from one 
place to another, sometimes darkens the whole horizon, but in the 
end calms down and falls and leaves the old and eternal picture of 
the world. Lasting deeds are realized on this earth only by God’s will, 
and man is only His blind and humble tool A deed which is bom of 
desire, human desire, either does not live till realization or is not 
lasting; in no case is that good. All these tumultuous desires and 
daring words under the night sky on the kapia will not change any- 
thing basically; they will pass, beneath the great and permanent reali- 
ties of the world and will be lost where all desires and winds are 
stilled. In truth great men and great buildings rise and will rise only 
where they are appointed to arise in God’s thought, in their right 
place independent of empty transient desires and human vanity.’ 

But Bahtijarevid did not utter a single one of these words. Those 
who, like this Moslem youth of noble family, carry their philosophy 
in their blood, live and die according to it, do not know how to ex- 
press it in words, or feel the need to do so. After this long silence 

246 



Stikovid and Glasi^anin only saw one or other of the pair of unseen 
comrades throw a cigarette stub over the parapet and watched it fall 
like a shooting star in a great curve from the bridge into the Drina. 
At the same time they heard the two friends slowly and softly 
moving away towards the market-place. The sound of their foot- 
steps was soon lost. 

Alone once more, Stikovid and Glasifanin started and looked at 
one another as though they had only just met. 

In the pale moonlight their faces showed in bright and dark sur- 
faces sharply defined, so that they seemed much older than in fact 
they were The glow from their cigarettes had a sort of phosphores- 
cence Both were depressed. Their reasons were quite different, but 
the depression was mutual. Both had the same wish; to get up and go 
home. But both seemed as if nailed to the stone seats still warm from 
the day’s sunlight. The conversation of that pair of young comrades 
which they by chance overheard had been welcome to them as a 
postponement of their own conversation and mutual explanation. 
But now It could no longer be avoided 

‘Did you hear Herak and his arguments’’ Stikovid spoke first, re- 
ferring to the evening’s discussion, and at once felt the weakness of 
his position. 

Glasidanin, who for his part felt the momentary advantage of his 
position as arbiter, did not reply at once. 

‘I ask you,’ went on Stikovid impatiently, ‘in these days to speak 
of class struggle and recommend small measures, when it is clear to 
every last man amongst us that national unity and liberation carried 
out by revolutionary methods is the most pressing aim of our com- 
munity! Why, that is downright silly!’ 

His voice held both a question and an appeal. But again Glasidanin 
did not reply. In the hush of that revengeful and vindictive silence, 
the sound of music came to them from the officers’ mess on the river 
bank. The ground-floor windows were wide open and brightly lit. A 
violin was playing with a piano accompanying it. It was the military 
doctor, Regimentsarzt Balas, who was playing, accompanied by the 
wife of the commander of the garrison. Colonel Bauer. They were 
practising the second movement of Schubert’s Sonatina for violin 
and piano They played well together but before they were halfway 
through the piano was ahead and the violinist stopped playing. After 
a short silence, during which they were doubtless arguing about the 
disputed passage, they began again. They practised together almost 
every evening and played until late at night, while the Colonel sat in 
another room playing endless games of preference or simply dozing 
over Mostar wine and tobacco while the younger officers joked 


247 



among themselves at the expense of the enamoured musicians. 

Between Madame Bauer and the young doctor a complicated and 
difficult story had m fact been building up for months Not even the 
keenest-eyed among the officers had been able to decide on the real 
nature of the relationship Some said that the tie between them was 
wholly spiritual (and naturally laughed at it), while others said that 
the body had its due share in the matter also The two were, however, 
inseparable, with the full fatherly approval of the Colonel who was 
a good-natured man, already blunted by long service, the weight of 
years, wine and tobacco 

The whole town looked on these two as a couple. Otherwise, the 
whole officers’ mess lived a completely isolated life, without any 
connection with the local people and citizens or even the foreign 
officials At the entrance to their parks, filled with beds of rare 
flowers laid out in circles and stars, a notice announced impartially 
that it was forbidden to bring dogs into the parks and that civilians 
were not allowed to enter. Their pleasures and their duties were alike 
inaccessible to all who were not in uniform Their whole life was in 
fact that of a huge and completely exclusive caste, which cherished 
Its exclusiveness as the most important aspect of its power and which 
beneath a brilliant and stiff exterior concealed all that life gave to 
other men of greatness and poverty, sweetness and bitterness 

But there are things which by their very nature cannot remain 
hidden, which break down every barrier however strong and cross 
even the most strictly guarded frontier. There are three things which 
cannot be hidden,’ say the Osmanlis, ‘and these are* love, a cough and 
poverty.' This was the case with this pair of lovers. There was not 
an old man or a child, man or woman, in the town who had not come 
across them on one of their walks on unfrequented paths around the 
town, lost in conversation and completely blind and deaf to every- 
thing about them. The shepherds were as used to them as to those 
pairs of beetles than can be seen in May on the leaves by the wayside, 
always two by two in loving embrace. They were to be seen every- 
where; along the Drina and the Rzav, by the ruins of the old fortress, 
on the road leading from the town, or around Stra2iste, and that at 
any time of the day For time is always short to lovers and no path 
long enough. They sometimes rode or drove in a light carriage, but 
for the most part walked, and walked at that pace usual to two per- 
sons who exist only one for the other, and with that characteristic 
gait which shows that they are indifferent to everything in the world 
save what each has to say to the other. 

He was a Hungarianized Slovak, son of a civil servant and educated 
at state expense, young and genuinely musical He was ambitious 

248 



but over-sensitive about his origins which prevented him from feel- 
ing at ease with the Austrian or Hungarian officers from rich and 
famous families She was a woman in her forties, eight years older 
than he. She was tall and blonde, already a little faded but her skin 
was still a clear pink and white. With her large shining dark-blue 
eyes, in appearance and beanng she looked like one of those portraits 
of queens which so enchant young girls. 

Each of them had personal, real or imagined but deep, reasons for 
dissatisfaction with life. Furthermore they had one great reason in 
common; both felt themselves to be unhappy and like outcasts m 
this town and this society of officers, for the most part frivolous and 
empty-headed. So they clung to one another feverishly like two sur- 
vivors of a shipwreck They lost themselves in one another and for- 
got themselves in long conversations or, as now, in music. 

Such was the invisible pair whose music filled the troubled silence 
between the two youths. 

A few moments later the music which had been pouring into the 
peaceful night again ran into difficulties and stopped for a time In 
the silence that followed, GlasiJanin began to speak in a wooden sort 
of voice, picking up Stikovid’s last words. 

‘Silly? There was much that was silly in that whole discussion, if 
we look at it fairly.' 

Stikovid suddenly took the cigarette from his lips, but Glasif anin 
went on slowly but resolutely to express views which were clearly 
not based on that night only but which had long troubled him 

‘I listen carefully to all these discussions, both those between you 
two and other educated people in this town; also I read the news- 
papers and reviews But the more I listen to you, the more I am con- 
vinced that the greater part of these spoken or written discussions 
have no connection with life at all and its real demands and prob- 
lems. For life, real life, I look at from very close indeed; I see its in- 
fluence on others and I feel it on myself. It may be that I am mistaken 
and that I do not know how to express myself well, but I often think 
that technical progress and the relative peace there is now m the 
world have created a sort of lull, a special atmosphere, artificial and 
unreal, in which a single class of men, the so-called intellectuals, can 
freely devote themselves to idleness and to the interesting game of 
ideas and ‘views on life and the world'. It is a sort of conservatory of 
the spirit, with an artificial climate and exotic flowers but without 
any real connection with the earth, the real hard soil on which the 
mass of human beings move. You think that you are discussing the 
fate of these masses and their use in the struggle for the realization 
of higher aims which you have fixed for them, but in fact the wheels 

249 



which you turn in your heads have no connection with the life of the 
masses, nor with life m general. That game of yours becomes dan- 
gerous, or least might become dangerous, both for others and for you 
yourselves ’ 

Glasicanin paused Stikovid was so astonished by this long and con- 
sidered exposition that he had not even thought of interrupting him 
or answering him Only when he heard the word ‘dangerous’ he made 
an ironical gesture with his hand. That irritated GlasiJanin who con- 
tinued even more animatedly. 

‘For heaven’s sake! Listening to you, one would think that all ques- 
tions were settled happily, all dangers for ever removed, all roads 
made smooth and open so all we have to do is to walk along them. 
But in life there is nothing solved, or which can easily be solved, or 
even has any chance of being solved at all. Everything is hard and 
complicated, expensive and accompanied by disproportionately high 
risk; there is no trace either of Herak’s bold hopes or of your wide 
horizons. Man is tormented all his life and never has what he needs, 
let alone what he wants. Theories such as yours only satisfy the eter- 
nal need for games, flatter your own vanity, deceive yourself 
and others. That is the truth, or at least that is how it appears to 
me.’ 

‘It IS not so. You have only to compare various historical periods 
and you will see the progress and meaning of man’s struggle and 
therefore also the “theory” that gives sense and direction to that 
struggle.’ 

Glasi2anin at once took this to be an allusion to his interrupted 
schooling and as always in such a case quivered inwardly. 

‘I have not studied history. . . .’ he began. 

‘You see. If you had studied it, you would see. . . .’ 

‘But neither have you.’ 

‘What? That is . . . well, yes of course I have studied ’ 

‘As well as natural sciences?’ 

His voice quivered vindictively. Stikovid was embarrassed for a 
moment and then said in a dead sort of voice: 

‘Oh well, if you really want to know, there it is; besides natural 
sciences, I have been taking an interest in political, historical and 
social problems.’ 

Tou are lucky to have had the chance. For as far as I know, you 
are an orator and an agitator also, as well as being a poet and a lover.’ 

Stikovid smiled unnaturally. That afternoon in the deserted 
schoolroom passed through his mind as a distant but irritating thing. 
Only then he realized that Glasidanin and Zorka had been close 
friends until his arrival in the town. A man who does not love is in- 


250 



capable of feeling the greatness of another’s love or the force of 
jealousy or the danger concealed in it. 

The conversation of the two young men changed without transi- 
tion into that bitter personal quarrel that had from the very begin- 
ning been hovering in the air between them. Young people do not 
try to avoid quarrels, even as young animals easily take part in 
rough and violent games among themselves. 

‘What 1 am and what I do is none of your business. I don’t ask 
you about your cubes and your tree-trunks.’ 

That spasm of anger which always gripped Glasicanin at any men- 
tion of his position made him suffer. 

‘You leave my cubes alone. I live from them, but I don’t trick 
people with them. I deceive no one. I seduce no one.’ 

‘Whom do I seduce’’ broke in Stikovid. 

‘Anyone who will let you.’ 

‘That is not true.’ 

‘It is true. And you know it is true. Since you force me to speak, 
then I will tell you.’ 

‘I am not inquisitive.’ 

‘But I will tell you, for even leaping about tree-trunks all day long 
a man may still see something and learn how to think and feel. I 
want to tell you what I think about your countless occupations 
and interests and yom daring theories and your verses and your 
loves.’ 

Stikovid made a movement as if to rise but none the less remained 
where he was. The piano and violin from the officers’ mess had re- 
sumed their duet some time ago (the third movement of the Sonatina, 
gay and lively) and their music was lost in the night and the roar 
of the river. 

‘Thank you. I have heard all that from others more intelligent than 
you are.’ 

‘Oh no! Others either do not know you or lie to you or think as I 
do but keep silent. All your theories, all your many spiritual occupa- 
tions, like your loves and your frien^hips, all these derive from your 
ambition, and that ambition is false and unhealthy for it derives 
from your vanity, only and exclusively from your vanity.’ 

‘Ha, hal’ 

‘Yes, Even that nationalist idea which you preach so ardently is 
only a special form of vanity. For you are incapable of loving your 
mother or your sister or your own blood brother, so how much less 
an idea. Only from vanity could you be good, generous, self- 
sacrificing. For your vanity is the main force that moves you, the 
only thing you revere, the one and only thing that you love more 


251 



than yourself One who doesn’t know you might easily be mistaken, 
seeing your force and your industry, your devotion to the nationalist 
ideal, to science, to poetry or to any other great aim which is above 
personal feelings But you cannot in any case serve it for long or re- 
main with It for long, for your vanity will not let you. The moment 
your vanity is no longer in question, everything becomes meaning- 
less to you Yo do not want anything and would not even move a 
finger to obtain it Because of it you will betray yourself, for you are 
yourself the slave of your own vanity You do not know yourself 
how vain you are I know your very soul and I know that you are a 
monster of vanity/ 

Stikovid did not reply. At first he had been surprised at the con- 
sidered and passionate outburst of his comrade who now suddenly 
appeared to him in a new light and an unexpected role. Therefore 
that caustic, even speech which at first irritated and insulted him, 
now seemed interesting and almost pleasant Individual phrases had, 
it is true, hit home and hurt, but on the whole all that sharp and pro- 
found exposure of his character had flattered and pleased him in a 
special sort of way For to tell a young man that he is a monster 
merely means to tickle his pride and his self-love In fact he wanted 
Glasiianin to continue this cruel probing into his inner self, that clear 
projection of his hidden personality, for in it he found only one more 
proof of his exceptional superiority. His eyes fell on the white 
plaque opposite him which shone in the moonlight He looked 
straight at the incomprehensible Turkish inscription as if he were 
reading it and trying to decipher the deeper sense of what his friend 
beside him had been saying penetratingly and consideredly 

‘Nothing is really important to you and, in fact, you neither love 
nor hate, for to do either you must at least for a moment stand out- 
side yourself, express yourself, forget yourself, go beyond yourself 
and your vanity. But that you cannot do; nor is there anything for 
which you would do so even were you able. Someone else’s sorrow 
cannot move you, how much less hurt you; not even your own sor- 
row unless it flatters your vanity. You desire nothing and you find joy 
in nothing. You are not even envious, not from goodness but from 
boundless egoism, for you do not notice the happiness or unhappiness 
of others. Nothing can move you or turn you from your purpose 
You do not stop at anything, not because you are brave, but because 
all the healthy impulses in you are shrivelled up, because save for 
your vanity nothing exists for you, neither blood ties nor inward 
considerations, neither God nor the world, neither kin nor friend. 
You do not esteem even your own natural capacities. Instead of con- 
science it is only your own wounded vanity that can sting you, for 

252 



It alone, always and in everything, speaks with your mouth and dic- 
tates your actions/ 

‘Is this an allusion to Zorka?* Stikovid suddenly asked 

‘Yes, if you like, let us talk of that too. Yes, because of Zorka also. 
You do not care a jot for her. It is only your inability to stop and 
restrain yourself before anything which momentarily and by chance 
IS offered you and which flatters your vanity Yes, that is so. You 
seduce a poor, muddled and inexperienced schoolmistress just as you 
write articles and poems, deliver speeches and lectures And even 
before you have completely conquered them you are already tired 
of them, for your vanity becomes bored and looks for something be- 
yond. But that is your own curse too, that you can stop nowhere, 
that you can never be sated and satisfied. You submit everything to 
your vanity but you are yourself the first of its slaves and its 
greatest martyr It may well be that you will have still greater glory 
and success, a greater success than the weakness of some love-crazed 
girl, but you will find no satisfaction in any one thing, for your vanity 
will whip you onwards, for it swallows everything, even the greatest 
successes and then forgets them immediately, but the slightest 
failure or insult it will remember forever. And when everything is 
withered, broken, soiled, humiliated, disintegrated and destroyed 
about you, then you will remain alone m the wilderness you have 
yourself created, face to face with your vanity and you will have 
nothing to offer it. Then you will devour yourself, but that will not 
help you, for your vanity accustomed to richer food will despise and 
reject you. That is what you are, though you may seem different m 
the eyes of most men and though you think differently of yourself 
But I know.* 

Glasicanin ceased suddenly. 

The freshness of the night could already be felt on the kapia and 
the silence spread, accompanied by the eternal roar of the waters. 
They had not even noticed when the music from the bank had ceased. 
Both youths had completely forgotten where they were and what 
they were doing. Each had been earned away by his own thoughts 
as only youth can be. The jealous and unhappy ‘cube-measurer' had 
spoken only of what he had so many times thought over passion- 
ately, deeply and intensely, but for which he had never before been 
able to find suitable words and expressions and which that night had 
come easily and eloquently, bitterly and exaltedly Stikovid had 
listened, motionlessly looking at the white plaque with the inscrip- 
tion as if It had been a cinema screen. Every word had hit home. He 
felt every harsh comment but he no longer found in all that this 
scarcely visible friend beside him had said any insult or any danger. 

255 



On the other hand, it seemed to him that with every word of Glasi- 
£anin he grew, and that he flew on invisible wings, swift and un- 
heard, exulting and daring, high above all men on this earth and their 
ties, laws and feelings, alone, proud and great, and happy or with 
some feeling akin to happiness. He flew above everything. That 
voice, those words of his nval, were only the sound of the waters 
and the roar of an invisible, lesser world far below him; it mattered 
little to him what it was, what it thought and what it said, for he 
flew above it as a bird. 

The momentary silence of Glasicanin seemed to bring them both 
to their senses. They did not dare to look at one another. God alone 
knows in what form the quarrel would have continued had there 
not appeared on the bndge a crowd of drunkards coming from the 
market-place, shouting loudly and singing snatches of songs. Loudest 
among them was a tenor who sang in falsetto an ancient song: 

Thou art wise as thou art lovely. 

Lovely Fata Avdagma! . ’ 

They recognized the voices of a number of young merchants’ and 
landowners’ sons. Some were walking slowly and sedately, others 
wavered and tottered. From their noisy jests it could be concluded 
that they had come from ‘Under the Poplars’. 

More than fifteen years earlier, even before the building of the 
railway had begun, a certain Hungarian and his wife had settled in 
the town. He was called Terdik and his wife Julka. She spoke Serbian 
for she had been born in Novi Sad. It soon became known that they 
had come with the intention of opening a business in the town for 
which the local people had no name They opened it on the outskirts 
of the town, under the tall poplars which grew on the StraiiSte slopes, 
in an old Turkish house which they completely rebuilt. 

This was the town’s house of shame. All day long the windows re- 
mained shuttered. As dusk fell a white acetylene lamp was lit in the 
doorway which burned there all night. Songs and the tinkle of an 
automatic piano echoed from the ground floor. Young men and dis- 
solute idlers bandied about among themselves the names of the girls 
whom Terdik had brought and kept there. At first there were four of 
them: Irma, Ilona, Frieda and Aranka. 

Every Friday ‘Julka’s girls’ could be seen going in two cabs up to 
the hospital for their weekly inspection. They were heavily rouged 
and powdered, with flowers in their hats and with long-handled sun- 
shades with streamers of floating lace. When these cabs went by, the 
women of the town hustled their daughters out of sight and averted 

254 



their eyes with mixed feelings of shame, disgust and pity 

When work began on the railway and there was an influx of 
money and workers, the number of girls was increased. Besides the 
old Turkish house, Terdik built a new ‘planned’ one with a red-tiled 
roof which could be seen from afar. ’There were three rooms; the 
general room, the extra-zimmer and the officers’ salon. In each of 
them were different prices and different guests. At ‘Under the Pop- 
lars’, as It was known m the town, the sons and grandsons of those 
who had once drunk at Zanje’s inn, or later at Lotte’s, could leave 
their inherited or hard-won money. The grossest practical jokes, the 
most notorious quarrels, wild dnnking parties and sentimental 
dramas took place there. Many personal and family misfortunes had 
their origins in that house. 

The centre of that group of drunkards who had spent the first part 
of the night ‘Under the Poplars’ and had now come to cool off on the 
kapia was a certain Nikola Pecikoza, a silly good-natured youth 
whom they made drunk and on whom they played their jokes. 

Before the drunkards reached the kapia they halted by the parapet. 
A loud and drunken argument could be heard. Nikola Pecikoza bet 
two litres of wine that he would walk along the stone parapet to the 
end of the bridge. The bet was taken and the young man climbed on 
to the parapet and set out with arms outspread, placing one foot 
carefully before the other like a sleepwalker. When he reached the 
kapia he noticed the two late visitors; he said nothing to them but 
humming some song and wavering in his drunkenness continued on 
his dangerous way, while the merry party accompanied him. His 
great shadow in the weak moonlight danced on the bridge and broke 
into fragments on the opposite parapet. 

The drunkards passed by in a frenzy of disconnected shouts and 
stupid comments. The two young men rose and, without saying 
goodnight, each went his own way to his own house. 

Glasi£anin disappeared into the darkness towards the left bank 
where was the path which led to his house up at OkoliJte. Stikovid 
made his way with slow steps in the opposite direction towards the 
market-place. He walked slowly and irresolutely. He did not want to 
leave that place which was lighter and fresher than in the town He 
halted by the parapet. He felt the need to catch hold of something, 
to lean on something. 

The moon had set behind the Vidova Gora. Leaning on the stone 
parapet at the end of the bridge the young man looked long at the 
huge shadows and few lights of his native town as if he now saw 
It for the first time. Only two windows were still lighted in the 
officers’ mess. The music could no longer be heard. Probably the un- 


2SS 



h^ppy lovers were there, the doctor and the colonel’s lady, holding 
their discussions on music and on love or about their personal fates 
which would not permit them to be at peace with themselves or with 
one another 

From the spot where Stikovid was now standing he could see that 
one window was still lighted in Lotte’s hotel. The young man looked 
at those lighted windows on each side of the bndge as if he expected 
something from them He was tired out and melancholy. The verti- 
ginous walk of that idiot Pecikoza suddenly reminded him of his 
earliest childhood, when on his way to school he had seen in the mict 
of a winter’s morning the squat figure of Corkan danang on that 
same parapet Every memory of his childhood aroused sorrow and 
uneasiness in him. That sentiment of fateful and exalted greatness 
and universal flight above everyone and everything which Glasi- 
Janin’s bitter and fiery words had excited in him was now lost. It 
seemed to him that he had suddenly fallen from the heights and that 
he was crawling on the darkened earth with everyone else. The 
memory of what had happened with the schoolmistress, and should 
not have happened, tormented him as if someone else had done it in 
his name; so too did the article which now seemed to him weak 
and full of faults, as if another had written it and had published 
it in his name and against his will. He thought of the long conversa- 
tion with Glasi^anin which now all of a sudden seemed to him 
full of malice and hate, of bitter insults and real perils. 

He shivered inwardly and from the chill which arose from the 
river As if suddenly awakened he noticed that the two windows in 
the officers’ mess were no longer lighted. The last guests were leaving 
the building. He could hear the clink of their swords as they crossed 
the darkened square and the sound of loud, artificial chatter. The 
young man regretfully left the parapet and, looking at the solitary 
window still alight in the hotel, the last light in the sleeping town, 
made his way slowly towards his simple house up there at Mejdan. 


256 



XX 




T he only lighted window in the hotel, which remained as the 
last sign of life that night in the town, was that small 
window on the first floor where Lotte’s room was Even at 
night Lotte sat there at her overladen table It was just as 
it had been earlier, more than twenty years before, when she had 
come to this little room to snatch a moment of respite from the 
bustle and noise of the hotel. Only now everything downstairs 
was dark and quiet. 

At ten o’clock that night Lotte had withdrawn to her room to 
sleep. But before she lay down she went over to the window to 
breathe in the freshness from the nver and to take a last glance 
at that arch of the bridge which was the only and eternally the 
same view from her window Then she remembered some old 
account and sat down to look for it. Once she began looking through 
her accounts she became absorbed and remained for more than 
two hours at her table. 

Midnight had long passed while Lotte, wakeful and absorbed, 
entered figure after figure and turned paper after paper. 

Lotte was tired. In the da)^ime, in conversation and at work, she 
was still animated and talkative, but at night when she was alone 
she felt all the weight of her years and her fatigue. She had grown 
old. Of her onetime beauty only traces remained. She had grown 
thinner and yellow in the face; her hair was without lustre and 
was growing thin on her scalp, and her teeth, once shining and 
strong, were yellow and showed gaps. The glance of her black 
and still shining eyes was hard and at times sad. 

Lotte was tired, but not with that blessed and sweet tiredness 
which follows heavy work and great gains, such as at one time 
had driven her to search for rest and respite in that room. Old age 
had come upon her and the times were no longer good. 

She would not have been able to express in words, nor could 
she explain it to herself, but she felt at every step that the times 
were out of joint, at any rate for one who had always kept only 

257 



her own good and that of her family before her eyes. When, 
thirty years before, she had come to Bosnia and begim work there, 
life had seemed all of a piece. Everyone was moving in the samf 
direction as she was; work and family. Everyone was in his right 
place and there was a place for everyone. And over everyone 
reigned one order and one law, an established order and a strict 
law. So had the world then appeared to Lotte. Now every thing 
had changed and was topsy-turvy Men were divided and separated 
without, it seemed to her, rhyme or reason The law of profit and 
loss, that divine law which had always controlled human activities, 
seemed as if it were no longer valid, for so many men worked, 
spoke or wrote about things of which she could not see the aim 
or the sense and which could only end in misfortune and damage. 
Life was bursting asunder, was crumbling, was disintegratmg. It 
seemed to her that the present generation attached more importance 
to Its views on life than to life itself. It seemed to her mad and 
completely incomprehensible, yet it was so. Therefore life was 
losing its value and wastmg away in mere words. Lotte saw this 
clearly and felt it at every step. 

Her business affairs, which at one time had seemed to gambol 
before her eyes like a flock of spring lambs, now lay inert and 
dead like the great tombstones m the Jewish cemetery. For the 
past ten years the hotel had done little business The forests around 
the town had been cut down and felling was moving farther and 
farther away, and with it the best of the hotel’s customers and 
the greater part of its profits. That shameless and insolent boor, 
Terdik, had opened his house ‘under the poplars’ and enticed away 
many of Lotte’s guests, offering them easily and immediately all 
that they had never been able to get in her hotel however much 
they paid. Lotte had long revolted against this unfair and shameless 
competition and said that the last days had come, those days in 
which law and order existed no longer or the chance of making an 
honest hving. At first she had bitterly referred to Terdik as ‘the 
whoremaster’; but he had brought her before the courts and Lotte 
had been sentenced to pay a fine for defamation of character. But 
even now she never referred to him by any other term, though 
she took care before whom she was speaking. The new officers’ mess 
had its own restaurant, a cellar of good wines and its own guest- 
rooms where distinguished visitors could be put up. Gustav, the 
sullen and bad-tempered but skilful and reliable Gustav, had left 
the hotel after many years of service and opened his own caf^ 
in the most frequented part of the market-place, and so instead 
of a colleague he had become a competitor. The choral society 

258 



and the various reading-rooms which had been opened in the 
town in the past few years had their own caf6s and attracted many 
guests. 

There was no longer the former animation either in the main 
room or, still less, in the extra-zimmer. An occasional unmarried 
civil servant had his lunch there, read the newspapers and took 
coffee. Alibeg Pasid, the taciturn and impassioned fnend of Lotte’s 
youth, still went there every afternoon Still as careful and discreet 
as ever, both in speech and actions, still correct and carefully 
dressed, he had grown grey and ponderous. His coffee was served 
with saccharine because of the severe diabetes from which he 
had been suffering for years He smoked quietly and, silent as 
ever, listened to Lotte’s chatter. When the time came he rose 
just as quietly and silently and went home to Crude. There was 
also another daily visitor, Lotte’s neighbour Pavle Rankovid. He 
had long left off wearing national costume and now wore the ‘tight’ 
civilian dress, but he still stuck to his shallow red fez. He always 
wore a starched shirt with a stiff collar, and cuffs on which he noted 
down figures and accounts He had long ago succeeded in taking 
over the leading place in the ViSegrad trading community. His 
position was by now consolidated and assured, but not even he 
was without his cares and difficulties. Like all the older men who 
had a certain amoxmt of property he was bewildered by the new 
times and the clamorous onrush of new ideas and new ways of 
life, thought and expression. All these things were embraced for 
him by the single word ‘politics’. It was those ‘politics’ that con- 
fused and angered him and embittered those years which should 
have been years of respite and satisfaction after so much work 
and thrift and renunciation. He in no way wanted to stand aside 
or withdraw himself from the majority of his fellow countiymen, 
but at the same time he had no wish to come into conflict with 
the authorities with whom he wished to remain at peace and at 
least outwardly in agreement. But that was difficult, almost impos- 
sible, to achieve. He could not even understand his own sons as 
he should. Like all the rest of the younpr generation they were 
simply baffling and incomprehensible to him; yet many older people 
either from necessity or weakness followed their example Their 
bearing, behaviour and actions seemed to Pavle rebellious as if 
they thought that to hve and die in present conditions was no 
better than to spend their lives like brigands in the mountains. 
Young people did not think what they said, paid no heed to what 
they did, did not count the cost and were careless in their work; 
they ate their bread without stopping to think whence it came and 

259 



talked, talked, talked, ‘baying at the moon’ as Pavle expressed it 
in his arguments with his sons. 

This way of thinking without limits, this speech without con- 
sideration, and this life without calculation and hostile to every 
calculation, drove Pavle, who had worked all his life by and with 
calculation, to frenzy and desperation He was filled with fear 
whenever he heard or saw them; it seemed to him that they 
imprudently and irresponsibly hacked away at the very foundations 
of life, at all that was dearest and most sacred to him. When he 
asked them for an explanation which would convince and reassure 
him they replied disdainfully and haughtily with vague and high 
sounding words; freedom, future, history, science, glory, greatness. 
His skin crawled at all these abstract words. Therefore he liked 
to sit and drink coffee with Lotte, with whom he could talk 
about business and events, always based on a sure and admitted 
calculation, very different from the ‘politics’ and the big, dangerous 
words that questioned everything, explained nothing and affirmed 
nothing. Dunng the conversation he often took out his pencil stub, 
not that of twenty-five years back but one just as shiny and almost 
equally invisible, and put all that was said to the infallible and 
irrefutable proof of figures. They often recalled in their talk some 
long ago happening, or some jest in which nearly all the partici- 
pants were now dead, and then Pavle, bowed with cares, would 
go to his shop in the market-place and Lotte remained alone with 
her worries and her accounts. 

Lotte’s personal speculations were in no better shape than the 
hotel’s business. In the first years after the occupation it had been 
enough to buy any share in any enterprise and one could be sure 
that the money was well invested and the only question that could 
arise was the amount of the profit. But at that time the hotel 
had only just started work and Lotte had neither the ready money 
at her disposal nor the credit which she later enjoyed. When she 
had achieved both money and credit the state of affairs on the 
exchanges had completely changed. One of the most serious of 
the cyclic crises had hit the Austro-Hungarian Monarchy at the 
end of the nineteenth and the beginning of the twentieth century. 
Lotte’s stocks and shares began to play like dust in a high wind. 
She would weep with rage when she read the most recent quota- 
tions each week in the Vienna Merkur, All the profits of the hotel, 
which at that time was still doing good business, were not enough 
to cover the losses caused by the general decline in values. At 
that time too she had had a severe nervous breakdown which 
lasted a full two years She was almost mad with pain. She chatted 

260 



to people without hearing what they said or thinking what she 
herself was saying She looked them full in the face but did not 
see them but the small-print columns of the Merkur which were 
to bring her good or evil luck Then she began to buy lottery 
tickets Since everything was in any case only a game of chance, 
she might as well do it properly. She had lottery tickets from every 
country. She even succeeded in getting hold of a quarter share 
in a ticket of the great Spanish Christmas Lottery whose first prize 
amounted to fifteen million pesetas She prayed God for a miracle 
and that her ticket should draw the first prize But she never 
won anything. 

Seven years before, Lotte’s brother-in-law Zahler had gone into 
partnership with a couple of wealthy men on pension and founded 
the 'Modern Milk Co-operative’ in the town Lotte provided three- 
fifths of the capital Business on a large scale was envisaged It 
was reckoned that the initial successes, which could not fail to 
eventuate, would attract capital from outside the town and even 
outside Bosnia. But just at the moment when the enterprise was 
in Its critical phase the annexation crisis took place This destroyed 
every hope of attracting fresh capital. These frontier districts 
became so unsafe that capital already invested in them began to 
flee. The Co-operative went into liquidation after two years, with 
the total loss of all the invested capital Lotte had to mortgage 
her best and safest shares, like those of the Sarajevo Brewery and 
the Solvaj Soda Factory at Tuzla, to cover the deficit. 

Parallel with these financial misfortunes and allied to them 
were family troubles and disappointments. It was true that one 
of Zahler’s daughters, Irene, had married unexpectedly well (Lotte 
had provided the dowry). But the elder daughter, Mina, remained. 
Embittered by the marriage of her younger sister and unfortunate 
in her suitors she had become before her time a vinegary and 
sharp-tongued old maid to whom life at home and work in the 
hotel seemed even heavier and more unbearable than in fact they 
were. Zahler who had never been lively or quick-witted grew even 
more ponderous and indecisive and lived at home like a dumb 
but good-natured guest from whom there was neither harm nor 
profit. Zahler’s wife, Deborah, though sickly and in advanced years, 
had given birth to a son, but the boy was backward and nckety. 
He was now ten years old and still could not speak clearly or 
stand upright, but expressed himself in vague sounds and crawled 
about the house on his hands and knees But this miserable creature 
was so pitiable and good and clung so desperately to his Aunt 
Lotte, whom he loved far more than his mother, that Lotte, despite 

261 



all her worries and duties, looked after him, fed him, dressed him 
and sang him to sleep. With this cretin ever before her eyes, her 
heart contracted at the idea that busmess was now so bad that 
there was not enough money to send him to the famous doctors 
in Vienna or into some mstitution, and at the thought that the days 
of miracles were past and that such creatures could not grow 
healthy by God’s will or by man’s good works and prayers. 

Lotte’s Galiaan dependents, whom she had educated or given 
in marriage during the good years, also caused her no little worry 
and disappointment. Some amongst them had founded families, 
extended their business and acquired property. Lotte got regular 
news from them, letters filled with respect and gratitude and 
regular reports of the progress of their families. But the Apfelmaiers 
to whom Lotte had given a start in life, had educated or proidded 
homes for, did not help her or take any responsibility for new 
relatives born and growing up in poverty in Galiaa but, once 
settled in distant cities, only bothered about themselves and their 
awn children. For them the greater part of their success lay in 
forgetting Tarnow and the cramped and wretched circumstances 
m which they had grown up and from which they had had the 
luck to liberate themselves, as qmckly and as completely as possible; 
and Lotte herself was no longer able to set aside money as she 
had once done to give that black poverty of Tarnow its chance 
in life. She never went to sleep or woke now without the thought 
that someone of hers in Tarnow was forever sunk in the slough 
of hopeless poverty, condemned forever to ignorance and filth, in 
that shameful poverty which she knew so well and which she had 
fought against all her life. 

Even amongst those whose lot she had already improved there 
was reason enough for complaint and dissatisfaction. Even the 
best among them had turned from the right path and made mistakes 
after their first successes and most shining hopes. One niece, a 
gifted pianist, who by Lotte’s help and encouragement had com- 
pleted her studies at the Vienna Conservatoire, had poisoned herself 
a few years earlier at the time of her first and best successes; no 
one knew why. 

One of her nephews, Albert, Lotte’s pride and the hope of the 
family, had completed all his studies, both at secondary school and 
university, with outstanding success and only because he was a 
Jew had not recdved his diploma ‘sab auspiciis regis’ or obtained 
the Imperial signet as Lotte had secretly hoped. None the less, Lotte 
had imag^ed him at least as a leading lawyer in Vieima or Lwow, 
since being a Jew he could not become a senior dvil servant which 

262 



would best have accorded with her ambitions. In such dreams 
she reaped the reward for all her sacrifices for his education. But 
there too she had had to suffer a painful disillusionment The young 
doctor of law went into journalism and became a member of the 
Socialist Party, and of that extremist wing which became notorious 
in the Vienna general stnke of 1906 Lotte had to read with her 
own eyes in the Viennese newspapers that ‘during the cleaning up 
in Vienna of subversive foreign elements, the well-known Jewish 
agitator Dr Albert Apfelmaier has been expelled, after first purging 
a sentence passed against him of twenty days' imprisonment’ That, 
in the language of the town, meant the same as if he had been a 
haiduk, a brigand. A few months later Lotte received a letter from 
her dear Albert in which he told her that he was emigrating to 
Buenos Aires 

In those days she could not find peace even in her own room. With 
the letter in her hand she went to her sister and brother-in-law 
and desperately, senselessly, flew into a passion with her sister 
Deborah who could only weep She shouted with rage* 

‘What is to become of us^ I ask you, what is to become of us, 
when no one knows how to make his way and stand up for 
himself? Unless they are propped up they all fall. What is going 
to happen to us? We are accursed, that is all there is to it.’ 

‘Gott, Gott, Gott,' wailed poor Deborah with tears flowing down 
her cheeks, naturally quite unable to answer Lotte's questions 
Nor did Lotte herself find an answer but clasped her hands and 
lifted her eyes to heaven, not weeping and frightened like Deborah, 
but furious and despairing. 

‘He has become a Socialist! A Soc - ial - isti Isn’t it enough that 
we are Jews, but he must be that as well! O Great and Only God, 
how have I sinned that You must punish us thus^ A Socialist!’ 

She wept for Albert as though he were dead and then never 
spoke of him again. 

Three years later one of her nieces, sister of that same Albert, 
married well in Pest. Lotte took charge of the trousseau and took 
a leading part in the moral crisis that this marriage provoked in 
the great Apfelmaier family of Tarnow, rich only in children 
and an unsullied religious tradition. The man whom this niece 
was to marry was a rich speculator on the Bourse, but a Christian 
and a Calvinist, and he made it a condition that the girl should be 
converted to his faith. The relatives all opposed this but Lotte, with 
the interest of the whole family in mind, said that it was hard to 
keep afloat with so many persons in the boat and that it was 
sometimes necessary to throw something overboard for the salva- 

263 



tion of all the rest. She supported the girl and her word was 
decisive The girl was baptized and married. Lotte hoped that with 
the help of her new relative she would be able to introduce at 
least one of those cousins or nephews now of suitable age into the 
business world of Pest. But bad luck had it that the rich Pest 
speculator died in the first year of marriage. The young wife went 
almost mad with grief Months passed and her great grief did not 
lessen The young widow had now been living in Pest for four 
years, given over to her unnatural grief which amounted to a 
mild form of madness. The great, richly furnished apartment was 
swathed in black cloth She went every day to the cemetery, 
sat by her husband’s grave and read softly and devotedly to him 
the list of market quotations for the day from beginning to end. 
To all suggestions made that she should awake from the lethargy 
into which she had fallen she answered softly that the dead man 
had loved that above all and that it had been the sweetest music 
he had ever known. 

Thus many destinies of all kinds accumulated in that little room 
There were many accounts, many doubtful bills, many others 
written off and expunged for ever in that great, many-sided book- 
keeping of Lotte’s; but the great principle of work remained the 
same Lotte was tired but she was not discouraged. After every 
loss or failure, she would call on her resources, set her teeth and 
go on with the struggle In recent years she had been fighting a 
rearguard action but she went on struggling with the same aim 
before her eyes and with the same resolution as she had shown 
when she made money and went forward in the world. She was 
the ‘man’ of that household and ‘Aunt Lotte’ to the whole township. 
There were still many both in the town and in the outside world 
who waited for her aid. her advice or at least her encouragement, 
and who did not ask and could not imagine that Lotte was tired 
But she was really tired, more than anyone suspected and more 
than she herself knew. 

The little wooden clock on the wall struck one. Lotte rose with 
difficulty, her hands on her hips. She carefully extinguished the 
great green lamp on the wooden side-table and with the short steps 
of an old woman, steps she used only when she was in her own 
room and even then only when going to bed. she went to lie down. 

There was complete and universal darkness over the sleeping 
town. 


264 



XXI 




I t IS now 1914, the last year in the chronicle of the bridge on the 
Drina. It came as all earlier years had come, with the quiet 
pace of winter but with the sullen roar of ever new and ever 
more unusual events which piled upon one another like waves 
So many years had passed over the town and so man> more would 
still pass over it There had been, and there still w^ould be, years of 
every sort, but the year 1914 will always remain unique. So at 
least It seemed to those w^ho lived through it To them it seemed 
that never would they be able to speak of all that they had seen 
then of the course of human destinies, however much, still con- 
cealed by time and events, might be said or written about it later. 
How could they explain and express those collective shudders 
which suddenly ran through all men and which from living beings 
were transmitted to inert objects, to districts and to buildings? 
How could they describe that swirling current among men which 
passed from dumb animal fear to suicidal enthusiasm, from the 
lowest impulses of bloodlust and pillage to the greatest and most 
noble of sacrifices, wherein man for a moment touches the sphere 
of greater worlds with other laws’ Never can that be told, for 
those who saw and lived through it have lost the gift of words 
and those who are dead can tell no tales. Those were things which 
are not told, but forgotten. For were they not forgotten, how 
could they ever he repeated? 

In that summer of 1914, when the rulers of human destinies 
drew European humanity from the playing fields of universal 
suffrage to the already prepared arena of universal military service, 
the town of Visegrad provided a small but eloquent example of 
the first symptoms of a contagion which would in time become 
European and then spread to the entire world That was a time on 
the limits of two epochs in human history whence one could 
more easily see the end of that epoch which was closing than the 
beginning of that new one which was opening Then one sought 
for a justification for violence and found some name borrowed 

265 



from the spiritual treasury of the past century for savagery and 
bloodlust. All that took place still had the outer semblance of 
dignity and the attraction of novelty, a terrible, short-lived and 
inexpressible charm which later disappeared so completely that 
even those who then felt it so strongly could no longer evoke 
its memory 

But these are all things which we recall only in passing and 
which poets and scientists of coming ages will investigate, interpret 
and resurrect by methods and manners which we do not suspect 
and with a serenity, freedom and boldness of spirit which will be 
far above ours Probably they will succeed m finding an explana- 
tion even for that strange year and will give it its true place in the 
history of the woild and the development of humanity. But here 
It is unique for us, for above all that was the fatal year for the 
bridge on the Drina 

The summer of 1914 will remain in the memory of those who 
lived through it as the most beautiful summer they ever remembered, 
for in their consciousness it shone and flamed over a gigantic and 
dark horizon of suffering and misfortune which stretched into 
infinity. 

That summer did in fact begin well, better than so many earlier 
summers The plums ripened as they had not done for long before, 
and the wheat promised a good harvest After ten years or so of 
troubles and commotions, the people hoped for at least a lull and 
a good year which would recompense in every way for the harms 
and misfortunes of earlier years (The most deplorable and tragic 
of all human weaknesses is undoubtedly our total incapacity for 
seeing into the future, which is m sharp contrast to so many of 
our gifts, our skills and our knowledge.) 

Sometimes there is such a year when the heat of the sun and 
the moisture of the earth combine, and the whole Visegrad valley 
trembles from the suberabundance of its force and the universal 
urge towards fecundity The earth swells and everything in it 
bursts vigorously into buds and leaves and blossoms and brings 
forth fruit a hundredfold. That breath of fertility could easily be 
seen quivering like a warm blue cloud over every furrow and every 
heap of earth. The cows and goats walked with hindlegs astraddle 
and moved with difficulty because of swollen and brimming udders. 
The fish in the river which every year at the beginning of summer 
came in shoals down the Rzav to spawn at its mouth were in 
such numbers that the children scooped them out of the shallows 
in buckets and threw them on to the bank. The porous stone of 
the bridge became softer and as if it were alive swelled with the 


266 



force and abundance which beat upwards from the soil and hovered 
over the whole town in the heat of the dog-days m which every- 
thing breathed more quickly and matured more vigorously. 

Such summers were not frequent in the ViSegrad valley. But 
when one occurred, men forgot all the bad days that had been and 
did not even think of the misfortunes which might still be in store, 
but lived with the threefold intensity of the life of the valley 
upon which the blessings of fertility had fallen, themselves only 
a part in that game of moisture and heat and ripening juices. 

Even the peasants who always found occasion to complain of 
something had to agree that the year had fruited well, but to every 
word of praise they added the qualification: *If this weather 
holds. . . .’ The merchants of the market-place threw themselves 
headlong into business like bees into the cups of flowers They 
scattered into the villages around the town to make deposit pay- 
ments on wheat in the ear and plums still in blossom. The peasants, 
bewildered by this invasion of eager buyers, as well as by the 
large and exceptional yield, stood beside their fruit trees already 
bending under the weight of fruit or beside the fields which were 
like waves in the wind, and could not be sufficiently prudent and 
restrained to deal with the townsmen who had taken the trouble 
to come to visit them. That prudence and restraint gave their faces 
a shuttered and anxious expression, twin of that mask of woe 
worn by peasant faces in years of bad harvest. 

When the merchants were rich and powerful, it was the peasants 
who came to them. On market days the shop of Pavle Rankovid 
was always full of peasants in need of ready money So too was 
the shop of Santo Papo who had for long been the leading figure 
among the ViSegrad Jews, for even despite the fact that banks, 
mortgage banks and other credit facilities had long existed in the 
town, the peasants, especially the older ones, liked to commit 
themselves in the old-fashioned way with the merchants from 
whom they bought their goods and with whom their fathers before 
them had contracted obligations. 

Santo Papo's shop was one of the highest and most solid in the 
ViSegrad market. It was built of stone, with thick walls and a 
floor of stone flags. The heavy doors and window-shutters were of 
wrought iron and there were thick close grilles on the tall and 
narrow windows. 

The front part of the building served as a shop Along the walls 
were wooden shelves filled with enamel ware From the ceiling, 
which was exceptionally high, so that it was lost in the gloom, 
himg lighter goods: lanterns of all sizes, coffee-pots, traps, mouse- 

267 



traps and other objects of twisted wire All these hung in great 
bunches. Around the long counter were piled boxes of nails, sacks 
of cement, plaster and various paints; hoes, shovels and mattocks 
without handles were strung on wire in heavy garlands. In the 
comers were large tin containers with paraffin, turpentine and 
lamp-black. It was cool there even in the height of summer and 
even at noon was dark and gloomy. 

But most of the stock was in the rooms behind the shop, through 
a low entry with iron doors. The heavy goods were kept there: 
iron stoves, crowbars, ploughshares, picks and other large tools. 
They were all piled up in great heaps so that one could only walk 
between the piled goods along the narrow paths as if between high 
walls Perpetual darkness reigned there and no one entered save 
with a lantern 

A chill dank air of stone and metal, which nothing could warm 
or disperse, exuded from the thick walls, stone ceiling and piled 
up iron. That air in a few years transformed the lively and red- 
cheeked apprentices into silent, pale and puffy assistants, but made 
them skilful and thrifty. It was undoubtedly harmful also to the 
generations of shopkeepers but it was at the same time sweet and 
dear to them since it meant the feeling of property, the thought 
of gain and the source of riches 

The man who now sat in the front part of the cool, half-lit 
shop at a small table beside a great green Wertheim safe in no 
way resembled that turbulent and vivacious Santo who had once, 
thirty years before, had his own special way of shouting ‘Rum for 
Corkan!’. The passage of years and the work in the shop had 
changed him. Now he was heavy and ponderous and yellow in 
the face; dark rings about his eyes stretched half way down his 
cheeks, his eyes had grown weak, those black and protruding eyes 
which now peered out from behind spectacles with thick lenses 
and metal rims, with a severe and yet timid expression He still 
wore his cherry-coloured fez as a last remnant of his one-time 
Turkish costume His father, Mente Papo, a wizened and bald old 
man in his eighties, was still m reasonable health though his sight 
was failing. He would come to the shop on sunny days With his 
watery eyes which seemed to be melting away behind thick 
spectacles he would look at his son seated by the safe and his 
grandson at the counter, breathe in that aroma of his shop and 
then return home at a slow pace, his right hand resting on the 
shoulder of his ten-year-old great-grandson. 

Santo had six daughters and five sons, most of them married 
His eldest son, Rafo, already had grown-up children who helped 

268 



his father in the shop. One of Rafo’s sons, who bore his grand- 
father’s name, was at the Sarajevo secondary school. He was a 
pale, short-sighted and slender youth who at the age of eight had 
known perfectly how to recite the poems of the patriotic poet 
Zmaj, but otherwise was not good at his studies, did not like to go 
to the synagogue or help in his grandfather’s shop during the 
holidays and said that he was going to become an actor or some- 
thing equally famous and unusual. 

Santo sat bowed over the huge, worn and greasy counter with 
an alphabetical ledger, and in front of him, on an empty nailbox, 
squatted the peasant Ibro Cemanovid of Uzavnica. Santo was reckon- 
mg up how much Ibro already owed him and therefore how much 
and on what conditions he could obtain a fresh loan. 

‘Smquenta, sinquenta i ocho . . . sinquenta i ocho, sesienta i 
tres . . . ,’ Santo whispered, reckonmg in Ladino Spanish. 

The peasant watched him with anxious anticipation as if watching 
an mcantation and not listening to the account which he already 
knew to the last para and which ran through his head even when 
he was asleep. When Santo finished and announced the amount 
of the loan with interest, the peasant murmured slowly: ‘Will 
that be so ... ?’ merely to gain time enough to compare his own 
reckoning with Santo’s. 

‘So it is, Ibraga, and in no way different,’ replied Santo in the 
formula time-honoured in such cases. 

After they had agreed on the state of present indebtedness, the 
peasant had to demand a fresh loan and Santo to make clear the 
likelihood and the conditions. But that was no rapid or easy task. 
A conversation developed between them, similar in the minutest 
detail to the conversations which, ten years ago or more, also before 
the harvest, had been held in this same spot between the father 
of Ibro from Uzavnica and Santo’s father, Mente Papo. The main 
subject of the conversation would be broached in a torrent of 
words which meant nothing in themselves and which seemed 
entirely superfluous and almost senseless. Anyone uninitiated, 
looking at them and listening to them, might easily have thought 
that the talk had nothing to do with money or a loan, or at least 
so It often appeared. 

The plums are well forward and brought forth much fruit 
amongst us, even more than in any other district,’ said Santo. ‘It 
has been years since there was such a crop.’ 

Tes, thanks be, they have borne well enough; if Allah permits 
the weather to hold there will be fruit and bread. One cannot 
deny it. Only who knows what the price will be,’ said the anxious 

269 



peasant, rubbing his thumb along the seam of his heavy green cloth 
trousers and looking at Santo out of the corner of his eye. 

‘There is no way of telling that now, but we shall know by the 
time you bring them to Visegrad You know the saying; the price 
is in the owner’s hands.’ 

‘Yes, that is so If Allah allows them to ripen and mature,’ the 
peasant again qualified. 

‘Without God’s will, naturally, there is no gathering nor reaping; 
however much man looks to what he has sown, it will avail him 
nothing if he have not God’s blessing,’ broke in Santo, raising 
his hand to heaven to show whence that blessing should come, 
somewhere high above those heavy blackened rafters of the shop 
from which hung peasant lanterns of all sizes and bundles of other 
goods. 

‘It will avail nothing, you are right,’ sighed Ibro ‘A man sows 
and plants but it is just as if, by the Great and Only God, he had 
thrown it all into the water; one digs, hoes, prunes and picks, but 
no! If it IS not so written there will be no blessing on it But if 
God decides to give us a good harvest then no one will lack and a 
man may clear himself of debt and then become indebted once 
more. Only let him keep his health!’ 

‘Ah, yes. Health is the mam thing Nothing is as important as 
health So is man’s life; give him everything and take health from 
him and it is as if he were given nothing,’ affirmed Santo, turning 
the conversation in that direction. 

Then the peasant also expressed his views on health, which 
were just as general and commonplace as Santo's. For a moment 
it seemed as if the whole conversation would be lost in futilities 
and generalizations. But at a favourable moment, as if by some 
ancient ritual, he returned to the opening question. Then began 
the bargaining for a new loan, over the amount, the interest, the 
terms and the methods of payment They discussed it for long, 
now vivaciously, now quietly and anxiously, but in the end they 
came to an agreement Then Santo rose, took a bunch of keys on 
a chain from his pocket and without removing them from the 
chain, unlocked the safe which began by creaking, opened slowly 
and solemnly and then, like all large safes, closed with a fine 
metallic noise like a sigh. He counted out the money to the peasant, 
down to the copper hellers, all with the same care and attention, 
with a solemnity that seemed a little sad. Then in a changed and 
more animated voice: 

‘Well, is that all right by you, Ibraga? Are you satisfied?’ 

‘Yes, by God,’ the peasant replied quietly and pensively. 



‘May God send you blessing and profit! Till we meet again 
in good health and good friendship/ said Santo, now quite lively 
and gay; and he sent his grandson to the cafe across the way for 
two coffees, ‘one bitter, one sweet*. 

A second peasant was already awaiting his turn in front of the 
shop bound on the same errand and similar reckonings. 

With these peasants and their reckoning about the coming harvest 
and the gathenng of the plums, the warm and heavy breath of 
an exceptionally fruitful year penetrated into the twilit gloom 
of Santo’s shop The green steel safe sweated from it and Santo 
stretched the collar around his fat, soft, yellowish neck with his 
forefinger and wiped the steam off his spectacles with a hand- 
kerchief. 

So did summer begin. 

But none the less at the very beginning of that year of blessing 
there fell a tiny shadow of fear and sorrow In the early spring, 
at Uvac, a small place on the former Turco-Austrian frontier and 
the new Serbo- Austrian border, a typhus epidemic broke out. As 
the place was on the frontier and two cases had occurred in 
the gendarmerie station, the Vlsegrad military doctor. Dr Balas, 
went there with one male nurse and the necessary medicines. The 
doctor skilfully and resolutely did all that was necessary to isolate 
the sick, and himself undertook their treatment. Of fifteen who 
had been taken ill only two died and the epidemic was limited 
to the village of Uvac and stamped out at its source The last 
man to take ill was Dr Balas himself. The inexplicable manner in 
which he had caught the disease, the shortness of his illness, the 
unexpected complications and sudden death, all bore the stamp of 
genuine tragedy. 

Because of the danger of infection the young doctor had to be 
buried at Uvac. Madame Bauer with her husband and a few other 
officers attended the funeral. She gave some money for a tombstone 
of roughly hewn granite to be erected over the doctor’s grave. 
Immediately afterwards she left both the town and her husband 
and it was rumoured that she had gone to some sanitonum near 
Vienna. This was the story current among the girls in the town; the 
older people, as soon as the danger had passed and the measures 
against the epidemic ceased, forgot both the doctor and the coloneTs 
lady. Inexperienced and uneducated, the town girls did not know 
exactly what the word sanatorium meant, but they had known 
very well what it meant when two persons walked about the paths 
and foothills as the doctor and the colonel’s wife had done until 
lately. Pronouncing that strange word in their confidential dis- 


271 



cussions about the unhappy pair, they loved to imagine that sana- 
torium as some sort of mysterious, distant and melancholy place 
in which beautiful and sinful women expiated their forbidden loves. 

That exceptionally lovely and fruitful summer grew and matured 
over the fields and summits around the town. In the evening the 
windows of the officers' mess, over the river and by the bridge, 
were lighted and wide open as in the previous year, only the sound 
of the piano and the violin no longer came from them. Colonel 
Bauer sat at his table with a few of his senior officers, good- 
humoured, smiling and sweating from the effects of the red wine 
and the heat of the summer. 

The young men sat on the kapia on warm nights and sang. It 
was nearly the end of June and the students were shortly expected 
to arrive, as they did every year. On such nights on the kapia 
it seemed as if time had stopped, while life flowed on endless, 
rich and easy and one could not foresee how long it would con- 
tinue thus. 

At that time of the night the main streets were illuminated, for 
the town had had electric light since spring that year. About a 
year earlier an electrically driven sawmill had been built on the 
river bank about a mile from the town and beside it a factory for 
extracting turpentine from pine refuse; it also produced resin. 
This factory had made an agreement with the municipality to 
light the town streets fiom its private power station. So the green 
lamp-standards with their petroleum lights disappeared, and with 
them tall Ferhat who used to clean and light them. The main 
street which stretched the whole length of the town, from the 
bridge to the new quarter, was lit by powerful lamps of white 
milky glass, while the side-streets which branched off to right and 
left and meandered around Bikavac or climbed upwards to Mejdan 
and OkoliSte were lighted by ordmary bulbs Between these lines 
of similar lights stretched long irregular patches of darkness. These 
were courtyards or large gardens on the slopes. 

In one of these dark gardens Zorka the schoolmistress was sitting 
with Nikola GlasiJanin. 

The dissension which had arisen between these two last year, 
when Stikovid had appeared at the time of the vacation, had lasted 
for long, right up to the beginning of the new year. Then, as every 
winter, preparations for the Festival of St Sava had been begun 
in the Srpski Dom. A concert and a play were being prepared. 
Both Zorka and Glasidanin took part and returning home after 
the rehearsals they had spoken together for the first time since 
the previous summer. At first their talks had been short, reserved 

272 



and distant. But they did not stop seeing one another, for young 
people prefer even the most bitter and hopeless of lovers’ quarrels 
to the boredom and loneliness of a life without the play and 
thoughts of love Somewhere in the course of their endless argu- 
ments they had made peace, they themselves knew not how or 
when. Now, on these warm summer nights, they met regularly. 
From time to time the figure of the absent Stikovi(5 rose between 
them and the whole pointless argument flamed up again, but it did 
not drive them apart, while every reconcihation drew them closer 
and closer together. 

Now they sat in the warm darkness on the stump of an old 
walnut tree and wrapped in their own thoughts looked down at 
the big and little lights of the town along the river which roared 
monotonously. Glasifanin, who had been talking for a long time, 
was now silent for a moment. Zorka, who had been silent all 
evening, remained silent as only women know how when they are 
disentangling their love troubles in their minds, those troubles 
which are more intimate and more important to them than any- 
thing else in life. 

About this time last year, when Stikovid had first appeared on 
the scene, Zorka had thought that an endless paradise of happiness 
had opened before her, in which perfect affinity of feelings and 
unity of thought and desires had the sweetness of a kiss and the 
duration of a human existence. But that illusion had not lasted 
long. However inexperienced and enraptured she may have been, 
she could not fail to notice that this man quickly took fire but 
equally quickly burnt out, according to his own ideas, without 
any consideration for her and without any connection with those 
things which she considered greater and more important than 
either herself or him. He had left her almost without saying good- 
bye. She had been left a prey to indecision from which she suffered 
as from a hidden wound. The letter which had come from him had 
been perfectly phrased, a perfect example of literary skill, but 
as measured as a counsel’s opinion and as clear and as transparent 
as an empty glass jar. In it he had spoken of his love, but as if the 
pair of them had aheady been a century in their graves, like persons 
famous and long dead To her warm and vivid reply came his card: 
‘In the tasks and anxieties which harass and annoy me I think 
of you as of a peaceful ViSegrad night, filled with the sound of the 
river and the perfume of unseen grasses' And that was all. In 
vain she tried to remember when she had heard the sound of the 
river and sensed the perfume of those unseen grasses. They existed 
only on his postcard. Certainly she did not remember them, even 


273 



as he, it seemed, did not remember anything that had taken place 
between them. Her mind darkened with the thought that she had 
been deceived and that he had deceived her, and then consoled 
herself with something that she herself did not understand and 
which was less likely than a miracle. ‘It is not possible to under- 
stand him,’ she thought to herself, ‘he is strange and cold, selfish, 
moody and capricious, but perhaps all excepuonal men are like 
that.’ In any event what she felt was more like suffering than 
love. Her inner flinching and the break that she felt in the depths 
of her being made it seem to her that the whole burden of that 
love which he had provoked lay upon her alone, and that he was 
lost somewhere far in the fog and the distance which she dared 
not call by its real name. For a woman in love, even when she has 
lost all her illusions, cherishes her love like a child she has not been 
destined to bear. She hardened her heart and did not reply to his 
card. But after a silence of two months another card arrived. It 
was written from some high mountam in the Alps: ‘At a height 
of 2,000 metres, surrounded by people of various tongues and 
nationalities, I look at the boundless horizon and think of you and 
last summer.’ Even for her years and her little experience that 
was enough. Had he written: ‘I did not love you, I do not love you 
now, nor will I ever be able to love you,’ it could have been no 
clearer or more painful to her For when all was said and done, 
it was love that was in question, not far-off memories or how many 
metres above sea-level a man was writing, nor what people were 
around him nor what languages they spoke. And there was nothing 
about love! 

A poor girl and an orphan, Zorka had grown up m ViSegrad 
with some relations. After she had finished her studies at the 
Teachers’ Training College at Sarajevo, she had been posted to 
ViSegrad and had returned to the house of the well-to-do but simple 
folk to whom she felt in no way attached. 

Zorka had grown thin and pale and had withdrawn into herself, 
but she had confided in no one, and did not reply to his Christmas 
message of greetings, which was equally short, cold and faultless 
in style She wanted to come to terms with her own grief and 
shame without anyone’s help or consolation but, weak, discouraged, 
young, ignorant and inexperienced, she became more and more 
involved m that inextricable net of real events and great desires, 
of her ovm thoughts and his incomprehensible and inhuman 
behaviour. Had she been able to ask anyone or to take anyone's 
advice, it would certainly have been easier for her but shame 
held her back. Even so it often seemed to her that the whole town 


274 



knew about her disappointment and that mocking and malicious 
glances seemed to bum into her as she walked through the market- 
place. Neither men nor books gave her any explanation; and she 
herself did not know how to explain anything. If he really did 
not love her why had there been all that comedy of passionate 
words and vows during the vacation last year? What had been 
the reason for that episode on the school bench, which could only 
be justified and defended by love, without which it fell into the 
mud of unbearable humihation? Was it possible that there were 
men who respected themselves and others so little that they would 
enter lightheartedly into such a game? What drove them on if 
not love? What did his burning glances, his warm and halting 
breath, his passionate kisses mean? What could they mean, if 
not love? But it was not love! She saw that now, better and more 
clearly than she would have liked. But she could not resign herself 
truly and lastingly to such a thought (who has ever been able 
to resign themselves completely to it?). The natural conclusion of 
all these internal conflicts was the thought of death which always 
lurks on the frontiers of every dream of happiness. To die, thought 
Zorka, to slip from the kapia into the river as if by chance, without 
letters or farewells, without admissions or humiliations. To die' 
she thought to herself in the last moments before going to sleep 
and on recovering consciousness in the morning, in the midst of 
the most lively conversations and beneath the mask of every smile. 
Everything in her said and repeated those words— ‘to die! to die!’— 
but one does not die, but lives with that insupportable thought 
within one. 

Comfort came from the source she least of all expected. Some 
time about the Christmas vacation her hidden torment reached its 
height. Such thoughts and such unanswered questions destroy one 
even more than an illness. Everyone noticed changes for the worse 
in her and worried about her, her relatives, her headmaster, a 
merry man with many children, and her friends, advising her to 
see a doctor. 

Good luck had it that just at this time were the rehearsals for 
the St Sava festivities and that, after so many months, she again 
talked with GlasiCanin. Up till then he had avoided every meetmg 
or conversation with her. But that goodwill that usually reigns at 
these naive but sincere dramatic and musical shows in small places, 
and then the clear cold nights as they returned home, saw to it 
that these two young estranged persons should draw closer to one 
another. Her need to lessen her torment drove her on and his love, 
deep and sincere, drove him. 


275 



Their first words were naturally cold, defiant, double-edged, and 
their conversations long explanations without issue But even those 
brought solace to the girl For the first tune she could talk with 
a living being about her inner, shameful wretchedness without 
having to confess its most shameful and painful details. Glasifanm. 
spoke to her of it long and animatedly but with warmth and con- 
sideration, saving her pride He did not express himself more 
harshly about Stikovid than was inevitable. His explanation was 
such as v/e have already heard that night on the kapia. It was short, 
sure and unsparing Stikovid was a born egoist and a monster, a 
man who could love no one and who as long as he lived, himself 
tormented and unsatisfied, would torture all those whom he 
deceived and who were near to him. Glasicamn did not speak 
much of his own love, but it was evident in every word, every 
glance and every movement. The girl listened to him, remaining 
silent for the most part. After every such conversation she felt 
more serene, more at peace with herself. For the first time after so 
many months she had moments of respite from her internal storms 
and for the first time succeeded in looking at herself as other than 
an unworthy being. For the young man's words, filled with love and 
respect, showed her that she was not irretnevably lost and that 
her despair was only an illusion even as her dream of love the 
previous summer had been only an illusion. They had taken her 
out of that gloomy world in which she had already begun to 
lose herself and sent her back to living human reality, where there 
was healing and aid for everyone, or nearly everyone 

Their talks continued even after the St Sava celebrations. The 
winter passed and after it the spring. They saw one another almost 
every day. In time the girl came to herself, grew stronger and 
healthier, and was transformed, quickly and naturally, as only 
youth can be. So too passed that fruitful and uneasy summer. People 
were already accustomed to regard Zorka and Glasi^anin as a 
couple who were ‘walking out’. 

It was true that the long speeches of Glasiifanm to which she 
had at first listened avidly, drinking them in hke medicine, were 
now less mteresting. At times this need for mutual confession 
and confidence weighed on her. She asked herself with genuine 
wonder how this closeness between them had come about, but 
then she remembered that last winter he had ‘saved her soul’ 
and. mastering her boredom, listened to him like a good debtor, 
as carefully as she could. 

That summer night his hand was over hers (that was the ultimate 
limit of his modest daring). Through that contact the warm richness 

276 



of the night penetrated him also In such moments it was fully 
clear to him how much treasure was hidden in this woman and 
at the same time he felt how the bitterness and dissatisfaction of 
his life was being transformed into fruitful power sufficient to 
take two people to even the most distant goal, if love bound them 
and sustained them. 

Filled with those feelings in the darkness he was no longer the 
everyday GlasiJanin, a minor clerk of the great ViSegrad enterprise, 
but quite another man, strong and self-confident, who controlled 
his own life freely and far-sightedly For a man filled with a 
great, true and unselfish love, even if it be on one side only, 
there open horizons and possibilities and paths which are closed 
and unknown to so many clever, ambitious and selfish men. 

He spoke to the woman beside him. 

‘I do not think I am mistaken; if for no other reason, then just 
because I should never be able to deceive you. While some talk 
and rave and others do business and make gains, I follow every- 
thing and watch everything and I see more and more clearly that 
there is no sort of life here. For a long time there will be neither 
peace nor order nor profitable work. Not even Stikovid, not even 
Herak, can create them. On the other hand, everything will get 
worse. We must get away from here, as from a house that is 
falling down These countless and uneasy saviours who pop up at 
every step are the best proof that we are heading for a catastrophe. 
Since we cannot help, we can at least save ourselves ’ 

The girl remained silent 

‘I have never spoken to you about this, but I have thought often 
and much, and have even done a little You know that Bogdan 
Djurovid, my fnend from OkoliSte, has now been in America for 
three years. I have been in correspondence with him since last 
year. I showed you the photograph he sent me He has asked me 
to come over there and has promised me a safe job at a good 
wage. I know that it is not a simple matter to do all this, but I 
do not think it is impossible. I have thought everything over and 
calculated everything. I will sell the little property I have up there 
at OkoliSte. If you will say yes, we will get married as soon as 
possible and leave for Zagreb without saying anything to anyone. 
There is a company there which arranges for emigrants to get 
to America. We could wait there until Bogdan sends us an affidavit. 
In the interval we could learn English. If we are not successful, 
perhaps because of my military service, then we will cross over 
into Serbia and leave from there I will arrange everything to make 
It as easy as possible for you In America we will both work. There 


277 



are Serbian schools there where you could teach. I would easily 
find work there, for over there all jobs are open and unrestricted. 
We will be free and happy. 1 will arrange everything, if only you 
would ... if only you would agree.' 

The young man stopped. By way of answer she put both her 
hands on his In that he felt the expression of a great gratitude. 
But her answer was neither yes nor no She thanked him for all 
his trouble and attention and for his boundless goodness and, in 
the name of that goodness, asked for a month before she gave 
him a definite answer; until the end of the school year. 

Thank you, Nikola, thank you! You are good to me!’ she 
whispered, pressing his hands. 

From the kapia below rose the sound of young men singing. They 
were ViSegrad youths, perhaps also some students from Sarajevo. 
In a fortnight the university students were due to arrive. Until 
then she would not be able to come to any decision. Everything 
made her suffer, most of all the goodness of this man, but at that 
moment she would not have been able to say ‘yes’ even if she were 
to be cut to pieces. She no longer hoped for anything save to see 
once more ‘that man who can love no one’. Once more, and then 
let be what would! Nikola would wait; that she knew. 

They rose and, hand in hand, went slowly down the slope which 
led towards the bridge whence the singing came. 


278 



XXII 




O n Vidovdan the Serbs held their regular outing at Mezalin. 
Under the dense walnut-trees, at the the meeting of the 
two rivers Drina and Rzav, on the high green banks, tents 
were put up in which drinks were on sale and before which 
lambs were turning on spits over slow fires. Families who had 
brought their lunch with them sat in the shade. Below a canopy of 
fresh branches an orchestra was already playing On the well beaten 
open space there had been a kolo since morning Only the youngest 
and idlest were dancing, those who had come here directly after 
morning service, straight from the church. The real general outing 
only began in the afternoon. But the kolo was already lively and en- 
thusiastic, better and more vigorous than it would be later on when 
the crowd came, and married women, unsatisfied widows and young 
children began to take part and when everythmg was transformed 
into a single long and gay, but haphazard and disconnected, garland. 
That shorter kolo in which more young men than girls were taking 
part was fast and furious, like a thrown lasso. Everything around it 
seemed to be moving, swaying to the rhythm of the music, the air, 
the thick crowns of the trees, the white summer clouds and the swift 
waters of the two rivers. The earth trembled under it and around it 
and seemed only to be trying to adapt its movement to the move- 
ments of the young bodies. Young men ran in from the main road to 
take their places in the kolo, but the girls restrained themselves and 
stood for a time watching the dancing as if counting the beats and 
waiting for some secret impulse in themselves; then they would 
suddenly leap in to the kolo with lowered heads and slightly bended 
knees as if eagerly leaping into cold water. The powerful current 
passed from the warm earth into the dancing feet and spread along 
the chain of warm hands; on that chain the kolo pulsed like a single 
living thing, warmed by the same blood and carried away by the 
same rhythm. The young men danced with heads thrown back, pale 
and with quivering nostrils, while the young girls danced with red- 
dened cheeks and modestly downcast eyes, lest their glances betray 


279 



the passion with which the dance had filled them. 

At that moment, when the outmg had only just begun, a number 
of gendarmes appeared at the edge of the meadow, their black uni- 
forms and weapons shining in the afternoon light There were more 
of them than was usual for the patrol which regularly visited fairs 
and outings They went straight to the canopy where the musicians 
were playing One after the other, irregularly, the players ceased 
The kolo wavered and stopped. Young men's cries of protest could 
be heard The dancers stood hand in hand. Some were so carried away 
and filled with the ihythm that they went on dancing where they 
were, waiting for the music to begin again But the players rose m 
haste and wrapped up their trumpets and their violins The gen- 
darmes went on farther, to the tents and the families sitting on the 
grass Everywhere the sergeant said his piece, in a low harsh voice, 
and like some magic charm the gaiety faded away, the dancing 
ceased and conversations were broken off Whomever they 
approached left the place where he had been till then, forgot what- 
ever he was doing, gathered up his things as quickly as possible and 
left. The last to disperse was the kolo of youths and girls They did 
not want to abandon their dancing and could not get it into their 
heads that this was really the end of the gaiety and the outing But 
when they saw the white face and bloodshot eyes of the sergeant of 
gendarmes even the most obstinate slunk away. 

Disillusioned and perplexed, the people trailed back from Mezalin 
along the wide, white road; the farther they went into the town the 
more they heard vague and frightened whispers about the assassina- 
tion that morning at Sarajevo and the death of the Archduke Franz 
Ferdinand and his wife and the persecution of the Serbs which was 
generally expected. In front of the Municipal Offices they came upon 
the first group of arrested men, amongst them the young priest 
Mihailo, being taken to prison 

So the second part of that summer day, which should have been a 
festival, was transformed into a bewildered, bitter and frightened 
expectation. 

On the kapia, instead of a festival mood and the gaiety of men re- 
leased from work, there was the silence of the dead A guard had 
already been mounted. A soldier in a new uniform paced slowly 
from the sofa to the spot where the iron manhole covered the way 
down into the mined pier. He marched these five or six paces inces- 
santly, and at each turn his bayonet glinted in the sun like a signal. 
The next day, beneath the plaque with the Turkish inscription, a 
white official notice appeared on the wall, printed in large letters 
and surrounded by a thick black border. It announced the news of 

280 



the assassination and death in Sarajevo of the Crown Prince and ex- 
pressed the indignation roused by this evil deed. None of the passers- 
by stopped to read it, but passed in front of the notice and the guard 
as quickly as possible with lowered heads. 

From that time onward the guard remained on the bridge. The 
whole life of the town was suddenly interrupted, like the kolo at 
Mezalm and that July day which should have been a day of festivity. 

The days to come were strange, filled with the avid reading of 
newspapers, of whispers, of fear and defiance, the arrests of Serbs 
and suspect travellers and the rapid reinforcement of military 
measures on the frontiers. The summer nights passed, but without 
song, without meetings of young men on the kapia and without the 
whispering of couples in the darkness. In the town mainly soldiers 
were to be seen. At nine o’clock at night when the buglers sounded 
the melancholy notes of the Austrian last-post in the cantonments 
at Bikavac and in the great barracks by the bridge, the streets were 
almost entirely deserted. Those were bad times for young lovers 
eager to meet and have private conversations Every evening 
GlasiJanin passed Zorka’s house. She was sitting at an open window 
on the ground-floor There they talked, but only for a short time, 
since he was in haste to cross the bridge and return to OkoliSte be- 
fore nightfall. 

So it happened that evening also. Pale, hat in hand, he begged the 
girl to come out to the gate for he had something private to tell her. 
After some hesitation she came. Standing on the threshold of the 
courtyard she was now level with the youth who spoke excitedly in 
a scarcely audible whisper. 

‘We have decided to flee. This evening. Vlado Marid and two 
others. I thmk that we have foreseen everything and that we shall 
get across. But if not ... if something should happen Zorka!’ 

The young man’s whisper ceased. In her wide-open eyes he saw 
fear and embarrassment. He was deeply moved as if he regretted 
that he had spoken to her and come to say goodbye. 

'I thought it better to tell you.’ 

Thank you! Then there is nothing of our . . . nothing of America!’ 

'No, not “nothing”. Had you consented when I suggested a month 
ago that we should finish the matter at once, then perhaps we might 
already be far away from here. But perhaps it is better this way. Now 
you can see what the position is. 1 must go wdth my friends. The war 
is here already and there is need for all of us in Serbia. I must, Zorka, 
I must. It is my duty. If I come out of all this alive and if we become 
free, then it may no longer be necessary to go across the sea to 
America, for we shall have our own America here, a land in which 


281 



a man may work hard and honestly and live well and freely. There 
will be a life m it for both of us, if only you will consent. It will de- 
pend on you. I will ... I will think of you over there, and you, and 
you . . . sometimes . . 

Words failed him and he suddenly put up his hand and quickly 
stroked her rich chestnut hair. That had always been his greatest 
desire and now, like a condemned man, he felt permitted to fulfil it. 
The girl withdrew in fright and he remained with his hand in the air. 
The gate shut silently and a moment later Zorka appeared at the 
window, pale, with wide-open eyes and feverishly twisting fingers. 
The young man came close up to the window, threw his head back 
and revealed his face, laughing, carefree, almost handsome. As if 
afraid to see what would happen next, the girl drew back into the 
room which was already dark. There she sat down on her bed, bent 
her head and began to weep. 

At first she W'ept quietly and then more and more unrestrainedly 
with a feeling of heavy, universal hopelessness The more she wept, 
the more reason she found to weep as everything around her seemed 
more and more hopeless. There was no way out, no solution; never 
would she be able to love, truly and as he deserved, that good and 
honest Nikola who was going away; never would she live to see the 
day when that other one, who could love no one, should love her. 
Never again would she see those lovely, happy days which she had 
passed only last year in this town. Not a single one of the Serbs would 
ever succeed in coming alive out of that dark circle of mountains, nor 
would see America, nor would create here a land where, so they 
said, a man could work hard and live freely. Never! 

Next day the news spread that Vlado Marid, Glasidanin and a few 
other young men had fled to Serbia All the other Serbs wdth their 
families, and all that they had, remained in that overheated valley 
as in a trap. Every day the atmosphere of danger and menace could 
be felt to be growing denser over the town. Then, in the last days of 
July, the storm burst over the frontier, a storm which would in time 
spread to the whole world and decide the fate of so many lands and 
cities, as well as that of the bridge on the Drina. 

Only then began the real persecution of the Serbs and all those 
connected with them. The people were divided into the persecuted 
and those who persecuted them. That wild beast, which hves in man 
and does not dare to show itself until the barriers of law and cus- 
tom have been removed, was now set free. The signal was given, the 
barriers were down. As has so often happened in the history of man, 
permission was tacitly granted for acts of violence and plunder, even 
for murder, if they were carried out in the name of higher interests, 

282 



according to established rules, and against a limited number of men 
of a particular type and belief. A man who saw clearly and with 
open eyes and was then living could see how this miracle took place 
and how the whole of a soaety could, in a single day, be transformed. 
In a few minutes the busmess quarter, based on centunes of tradi- 
tion, was wiped out. It is true that there had always been concealed 
ennuties and jealousies and religious intolerance, coarseness and 
cruelty, but there had also been courage and fellowship and a feeling 
for measure and order, which restrained all these instincts within the 
limits of the supportable and, in the end, calmed them down and 
submitted them to the general interest of life in common. Men who 
had been leaders in the commercial quarter for forty years vanished 
overnight as if they had all died suddenly, together with the habits, 
customs and institutions which they represented. 

The day after the declaration of war on Serbia a scbutzkorps squad 
began to patrol the town. This squad, hastily armed and intended to 
assist the authorities in their hunt for Serbs, was made up of gipsies, 
drunkards and other persons of ill repute, mainly those who for long 
had been at odds with society and the law. A certain Huso Kokogar, 
a gipsy without honour or definite occupation, who had lost his nose 
in early youth as a result of a shameful disease, led the dozen or so 
ne’er-do-wells armed with old-fashioned Werndl rifles with long 
bayonets, and lorded it over the market-place 

Faced with this threat, Pavle Rankovid, as President of the Serbian 
Church and School Community, went with a number of other lead- 
ing members to the sub-prefect Sabljak. Sabljak was a pale, puffy 
man, completely bald, bom in Croatia, who had only recently been 
appointed to ViSegrad. Now he was excited and he had not slept well; 
his eyelids were reddened and his lips dry and bloodless. He was 
wearing high boots and in the lapel of his huntsman’s coat wore some 
badge in two colours: black and yellow. He received them standing 
and did not offer them seats. Pavle, yellow in the face, his eyes like 
two thin black slits, spoke in a hoarse unfamiliar voice: 

‘Sir, you see what is going on and what is being prepared, and you 
know that we. Serbs and citizens of Vifegrad, have not wanted this.’ 

‘I know nothing, sir,’ the Prefect curtly mterrupted him in a voice 
harsh with vexation, ‘and I want to know nothing. We have other, 
more important, things to do now than listen to speeches. That is all 
I have to say to you!’ 

‘Sir,’ Pavle began again calmly as if trying by his own calm to 
moderate even this irritable and angry man, ‘we have come to offer 
you our services and to assure you. . . .’ 

‘I have no need of your services and there is nothing for you to 

283 



assure me about You have shown at Sarajevo what you can do 
‘Sir,’ continued Pavle resolutely and with unchanged voice, ‘we 
would have liked within the limits of the law . .‘ 

‘So' Now you remember the law! To what laws have you the 
effrontery to appeal. . . ?’ 

‘The laws of the state. Sir, which apply to all.’ 

The Prefect suddenly became serious as if he had calmed down a 
little Pavle at once took advantage of this moment of calm 
‘Sir, permit us to ask you whether w^e may be sure that our lives 
and property and those of our families will be respected, and if not, 
what we should do?’ 

The Prefect spread out his hands, palms upward, shrugged his 
shoulders, closed his eyes and convulsively shut his thin, pale 
lips. 

Pavle knew only too well this characteristic gesture, pitiless, blind- 
deaf-dumb, which state officials adopt in important moments and 
saw at once that it was no use going on talking The Prefect, after 
lowering his hands, looked up and said more gently: 

‘The military authorities will advise everyone what they must do.’ 
Now it was Pavle’s turn to spread out his hands, close his eyes and 
shrug his shoulders for a moment, and then say in a deep, changed 
voice: 

‘Thank you. Sir.’ 

The representatives bowed stiffly and clumsily. ’Then they filed out 
like condemned men. 

The market-place was filled with aimless movement and secret 
consultations. 

In Alihodja’s shop were sitting a number of prominent Turks, 
Nailbeg Turkovid, Osmanaga Sabanovid and Suljaga Mezildjid. ’They 
were pale and worried, with that heavy, fixed expression which can 
always be seen on the faces of those who have something to lose 
when faced with unexpected events and important changes. The 
authorities had called on them to place themselves at the head of 
the schutzkorps. Now they had, as if by chance, met here to discuss 
without being overheard, what they ought to do. Some were for 
accepting, others for holding back. Alihodja, red in the face, excited, 
with the old light in his eyes, resolutely opposed any idea of partici- 
pation in the schutzkorps. He addressed himself especially to Nailbeg 
who was for taking up arms since they, as leading citizens, should 
place themselves at the head of the Moslem volunteer detachments 
instead of a bunch of gipsies. 

‘I will never mix myself up in their affairs as long as I am alive 
And you, if you had any sense, would not do so either. Can’t you see 

284 



that these Vlachs are only making use of us and that, in the end, it 
will all come back on our own heads?’ 

With the same eloquence as he had once used in opposing Osman 
Effendi Karamanli on the kapia he showed them that there was noth- 
ing good ‘for the Turkish ear’ on either side and that every interven- 
non on their part could only be harmful. 

‘For a long time past no one has asked us about anything or paid 
the least heed to our opinions. The Schwabes entered Bosnia and 
neither Sultan nor Kaiser asked: “By your leave, begs and gentle- 
men’’. Then Serbia and Montenegro, until yesterday our serfs, rose 
in revolt and took away half the Turkish Empire and still no one 
ever thought about us. Now the Kaiser attacks Serbia and once again 
no one asks us anything, but only gives us nfles and trousers to make 
us Schwabe decoy ducks and tells us to hunt the Serbs lest they should 
tear their own trousers climbing Sargan. Can’t you get that into your 
heads? Since no one has ever asked us about so many important 
things over so many years, this sudden favour is enough to make one 
burst one’s ribs laughing. I tell you; there are big things at stake and 
it is best for him who does not get himself mixed up in them more 
than he must. Here on the frontier they have already come to grips 
and who knows how far it will spread? There must be someone be- 
hind this Serbia. It could not be otherwise. But you, up at Nezuke, 
have a mountain in front of your windows and can see no farther 
than its stones. Better give up what you have begun: don’t go into 
the schutzkorps and don’t persuade others to go. Better go on milk- 
ing the dozen serfs you have left while they still bring you in some- 
thing.’ 

All were silent, senous and motionless. Nailbeg too was silent. He 
was obviously offended, though he concealed it. Pale as a corpse, he 
was turning over some decision in his mind. Save for Nailbeg, Ah- 
hodja had undecided them and cooled their ardour. They smoked 
and silently watched the endless procession of military wagons and 
laden packhorses crossing the bridge. Then, one by one, they rose 
and made their farewells. Nailbeg was the last. To his sullen greet- 
ing, Alihodja once more looked him in the eyes and said almost 
sadly 

‘I see that you have made up your mind to go. You too want to 
die, and are afraid lest the gipsies get in first. But remember that long 
ago old men said: “The time has not come to die but to let it be seen 
of what stuff a man is made”. These are such times.’ 

The square between the hodja’s shop and the bridge was crammed 
with carts, horses, soldiers of all kinds and reservists coming to re- 
port. From time to time the gendarmes would lead a group of bound 

285 



men across it; Serbs. The air was filled with dust. Everyone yelled at 
the top of his voice and moved about more quickly than the occasion 
demanded. Faces were flushed and running with sweat; curses could 
be heard in all languages. Eyes were shining with drink and from 
sleepless nights and that troubled anxiety which always reigns in the 
presence of danger and bloody events. 

In the centre of the square, directly facing the bridge, Hungarian 
reservists in brand-new uniforms were hewing some beams. Ham- 
mers sounded and saws were busy cutting. Around them a group of 
children had gathered. From his shop window Alihodja watched two 
beams being set upright. Then a mustachioed Hungarian reservist 
scrambled up them and placed a third horizontally across the top. 
The crowd pressed around them as if halva were being given away, 
forming a living circle around the gallows. Most of them were 
soldiers, but there were also some Turkish village wastrels and gipsies 
from the town. When all was ready a way was made through the 
crowd and a table was brought and two chairs for the officer and his 
clerk. Then the schutzkorps brought first two peasants and then a 
townsman. The peasants were village serfs from the frontier villages 
of Pozderci(5 and Kamenica and the townsman a certain Vajo, a man 
from the Lika, who had long ago come to the town as a contractor 
and had married there. All three were bound, haggard and covered 
with dust. A drummer was standing by, waiting to give a roll on his 
drums. In the general flurry and commotion the noise of the drum 
sounded like distant thunder. Silence fell on that circle around the 
gallows. The officer, a Hungarian reserve lieutenant, read in a harsh 
voice the sentences of death in German: they were then translated 
by a sergeant. All three had been sentenced to death by a summary 
court, for witnesses had declared on oath that they had seen them 
giving light-signals by night towards the Serbian frontier. The hang- 
ing was to be carried out publicly on the square facing the bridge. 
The peasants were silent, blinking as if in perplexity. Vajo, the man 
from Lika, wiped the sweat from his face and in a soft sad voice 
swore that he was innocent and with frenzied eyes looked around 
him for someone to whom he could still say it. 

Just at that moment when the sentence was about to be carried 
out there burst through the crowd of onlookers a soldier, small and 
reddish, with legs bowed like an X. It was Gustav, the one-time 
zablkelner in Lotte’s hotel and now a cafdowner in the lower 
market-place. He was in a new imiform with a corporal’s stripes. His 
face was flushed and his eyes more bloodshot than usual. Explana- 
tions began. The sergeant began to hustle him away but the bellicose 
caf6-owner held his gro\md. 


286 



‘I have been an intelligence agent here for fifteen years, in the 
confidence of the highest military circles,’ he shouted in German in 
a drunken voice. ‘Only the year before last in Vienna 1 was promised 
that I could hang two Serbs with my own hands when the time came. 
You don’t know with whom you have to deal. I have earned my 
right to . . . and now you . . .’ 

There were murmurs and whispers m the crowd. The sergeant 
stood in perplexity not knowing what to do. Gustav became even 
more aggressive and demanded that two of the condemned men be 
handed over to him so that he could hang them personally. Then the 
lieutenant, a thin dark man with the manner of a gentleman, as de- 
spairing as if he were himself one of the condemned men, without a 
drop of blood in his face, rose. Gustav, even though drunk, stood to 
attention but his thin red moustaches quivered and his eyes rolled 
to left and right. The officer came close to him and thrust his head 
into that flushed face as if he would spit on it. 

‘If you don’t get out of here at once, I will give orders for you to 
be bound and taken to prison. Tomorrow you will report to the 
ofiicer of the day. Do you understand? Now get out! March!’ 

The lieutenant had spoken in German with a Hungarian accent, 
quite softly, but so sharply and exasperatedly that the drunken 
caf6-owner at once thought better of it and was lost in the crowd, 
incessantly repeating his military greeting and muttering vague 
words of excuse. 

Only then did the attention of the crowd return to the con- 
demned men. The two peasants, fathers of families, behaved exactly 
alike. They blinked and frowned from the sun and the heat of the 
crowd around them as if that were all that was troubling them. But 
Vajo in a weak and tearful voice asserted his innocence, that his 
competitor was responsible for the charge, that he had never done 
any military service and never in his life ^own that one could make 
signals with lights. He knew a little German and desperatedly Imked 
word with word, trying to find some convincing expression to halt 
this mad torrent which had swept him away the day before and 
which now threatened to sweep him off this earth, innocent though 
he was. 

‘Herr Oberleutnant, Herr Oberleutnant, um Gottes vnllen. . . . Ich. 
unschuldiger Mensch . . . viele Kinder. . . . Unschuldig! Liige! Alles 
Liige! . . .’ (Lieutenant, in God’s name. ... I am innocent . . . many 
children . . . innocent! Lies! ... All lies!). Vajo chose his words as if 
searching for those which were right and could bring salvation. 

The soldiers had already approached the first peasant. He quickly 
took off his cap, turned towards Mejdan where the church was and 

287 



rapidly crossed himself twice. With a glance, the officer ordered 
them to finish with Vajo first. Then the desperate man from Lika, 
seeing it was now his turn, raised his hands to heaven imploringly 
and shouted at the top of his voice: 

‘Nein! Nein! Nicht, urn Cottes willen* Herr Oberleutnant, Sie wis- 
sen . . . alles ist Luge . . . Gott! . . Alles Ltige!’ But the soldiers had 
already seized him by his legs and waist and lifted him on to the 
trestles under the rope 

Breathlessly the crowd followed all that happened as if it were 
some sort of game between the unlucky contractor and the 
lieutenant, burning with curiosity to know who would win and who 
lose. 

Alihodja, who had up till then only heard meaningless voices and 
had no idea of what was happening in the centre of that circle of 
densely packed onlookers, suddenly saw the panic-stricken face of 
Vajo above their heads and at once leapt up to shut his shop though 
there was a specific order of the military authonties that all places 
of business must remain open. 

Fresh troops kept arriving in the town and after them munitions, 
food and equipment, not only by the overcrowded railway line from 
Sarajevo but also by the old carriage road through Rogatica. Horses 
and carriages crossed the bridge day and night and the first thing to 
meet their eyes was the three hanged men on the square. As the head 
of the column usually became wedged in the overcrowded streets, 
this meant that the bulk of the column had to halt there on the 
bridge or in the square beside the gallows until those in front had ex- 
tricated themselves. Covered with dust, red-faced and hoarse from 
furious shouting, the sergeants passed on horseback between the 
carts and laden packhorses, making desperate signals with their 
hands and swearing in all the languages of the Austro-Hungarian 
Monarchy and by all the sacred things of all recognized confessions. 

On the fourth or fifth day, early in the morning, when the bridge 
was again crammed with supply vehicles which crawled slowly to- 
wards the crowded market-place, a sharp and unusual whistling was 
heard over the town and in the centre of the bridge, not far from the 
kapia itself, a shell burst on the stone parapet. Fragments of stone 
and iron struck horses and men. There was a rush of men, a rearing 
of horses and a general flight. Some fled forward into the market- 
place, others back along the road whence they had come. Im- 
meffiately afterwards three more shells fell, two in the water and 
one more on the bridge among the press of men and horses. In a 
twinkling of an eye the bridge was deserted; in the emptiness so 
created could be seen, like black spots, dead horses and men. The 

288 



Austrian field arullery from the Butkovo Rocks tried to get the range 
of that Serbian mountain battery which was spraying the scattered 
supply columns on both sides of the bridge with shrapnel. 

From that day on, the mountain battery from Panes continually 
pounded the bridge and the nearby barracks A few days later, again 
early in the morning, a new sound was heard from the east, from 
somewhere on Gole5. This sound was more distant but deeper, and 
incendiary shells fell even more frequently over the town These 
were howitzers, two in all. The first shots fell in the Dnna, then on 
the open space before the bridge where they damaged the houses 
around, Lotte's hotel and the officers' mess, and then regular salvos 
began to centre on the bridge and the barracks. Within an hour the 
barracks was on fire. The mountain battery from Panos sprinkled 
with shrapnel the soldiers trying to put out the fire. Finally, they left 
the barracks to its fate. In the heat of the day it burned as if made 
of wood, and shells fell from time to time into the burning mass and 
destroyed the interior of the building. So for the second time the 
Stone Han was destroyed and became once again a pile of stones. 

After that the two howitzers from Goles continually and regularly 
aimed at the bridge and especially the central pier The shells fell 
sometimes in the river, right and left of the bridge, sometimes 
smashed to pieces against the massive stone piers and sometimes hit 
the bridge itself, but none of them hit the iron manhole over the open- 
ing which led into the interior of the central pier which held the 
explosive charge for mining the bridge. 

In all that ten-days-long bombardment no major damage was done 
to the bridge. The shells struck against the smooth piers and rounded 
arches, ricocheted and exploded in the air without leaving other 
marks on the stone than light, white, scarcely perceptible scratches. 
The fragments of shrapnel bounced off the smooth firm stone like 
hail. Only those shells which actually hit the roadway left little holes 
in the gravel but these could hardly be seen save when one was on 
the bridge itself. Thus in all this fresh storm which had burst over 
the town, overturning and tearing up by the roots its ancient cus- 
toms, sweeping away living men and inanimate things, the bridge re- 
mained white, solid and invulnerable as it had always been. 


K 


289 



XXIII 




B ecause of the continual bombardment all movement across 
the bridge ceased by day; civilians crossed freely and even 
individual soldiers scurried across, but as soon as a slightly 
larger group began to move they were sprayed by shrapnel 
from Panos After a few days a certain regularity was established. 
The people took note of when the fire was strongest, when less and 
when it ceased altogether, and finished their more urgent tasks 
accordingly, so far as the Austrian patrols would let them. 

The mountain battery from Panos fired only by day, but the 
howitzers from behind Golel fired at night also and tried to hinder 
troop movements and the passage of supplies on both sides of the 
bridge. 

Those citizens whose houses were in the centre of the town, 
near the bridge and the road, moved with their families to Mejdan 
or other sheltered and distant quarters, to stay with relatives or 
friends and take refuge from the bombardment. Their flight, with 
their children and their most necessary household goods, recalled 
those terrible nights when the ‘great flood’ came upon the town. 
Only this time men of different faiths were not mingled together 
or bound by the feeling of solidarity and common misfortune, and 
did not sit together to find help and consolation in talk as at those 
times. The Turks went to the Turkish houses and the Serbs, as if 
plague-stricken, only to Serbian homes. But even though thus 
divided and separated, they lived more or less similarly. Crushed 
into other people’s houses, not knowing what to do, with time 
ha n ging on their hands and filled with anxious and uneasy thoughts, 
idle and empty-headed like refugees, in fear of their lives and in 
uncertainty about their property, they were tormented by differing 
hopes and fears which, naturally, they concealed. 

As in earlier times during the ‘great floods’ the older people 
both among the Turks and the Serbs tried to cheer up those with 
them by jokes and stones, by an affected calm and an artificial 
serenity. But it seemed that in this sort of misfortune the old tricks 


290 



and jokes no longer sared, the old stories palled and the witticisms 
lost flavour and meaning, and it was a slow and painful process 
to make new ones. 

At night they crowded together to sleep, though in fact no one 
was able to close an eye. They spoke in whispers, although they 
themselves did not know why they did so when every moment 
there was above their heads the thimder of the gims, now Serbian, 
now Austrian. They were filled with fear lest they should be 
‘making signals to the enemy* although no one knew how such 
signals could be made nor what they in fact meant. But their fear 
was such that no one even dared to strike a match. When the men 
wanted to smoke they shut themselves up in suffocating little rooms 
wdthout windows, or covered their heads with counterpanes, and 
so smoked. The moist heat strangled and throttled them. Everyone 
was bathed in sweat, but all doors were fastened and all windows 
closed and shuttered. The town seemed like some wretch who 
covers his eyes with his hands and waits for blows from which 
he cannot defend himself. All the houses seemed like houses of 
mourning. For whoever wished to remain alive had to behave as 
though he were dead; nor did that always help. 

In the Moslem houses there was a little more life Much of the 
old warlike instincts remained but they had been awakened m 
an evil hour, embarrassed and pointless in face of that duel going 
on over their heads in which the artillery of the two sides, both 
Christian, were takmg part. But there too were great and concealed 
anxieties; there too were misfortimes for which there seemed no 
solution. 

Alihodja’s house tmder the fortress had been turned into a 
Moslem religious school. To the crowd of his own children had 
been added the nine children of Mujaga Mutapdiid; only three 
of these were grown up and all the rest small and weak ranged one 
after the other differing by an ear. In order not to have to watch 
them or to call them at every moment into the courtyard, they 
had been shut up with Alihodja’s children in a large room and 
there their mothers and elder sisters dealt with them amid a con- 
tinual flurry and fusillade of cries. 

This Mujaga Mutapd2i(J, known as the ‘man from UHce’, was a 
recent comer to the town (we shall see a little later why and 
how). He was a tall man in his fifties, quite grey, with a great 
hooked nose and heavily lined face; his movements were abrupt 
and military. He seemed older than Alihodja although he was in 
fact ten years younger. He sat in the house with Alihodja, smoked 
incessantly, spoke little and seldom and was wrapped up in his 


291 



own thoughts whose burden was expressed in his face and his 
every movement. He could not remain long in any one place. 
Every so often he would rise and go outside the house and from 
the garden watch the hills around the town, on both sides of 
the river. He stood thus with head raised, watching carefully as 
if for signs of bad weather. Alihodja, who never allowed him to 
remain alone, tried to keep him in conversation and followed him. 

In the garden, which was on a steep slope but was large and 
beautiful, the peace and fecundity of the summer days reigned. 
The onions had already been cut and spread out to dry; the sun- 
flowers were in full bloom and around their black and heavy centres 
the bees hummed. At the edges the small flowerets had already 
gone to seed From that elevated place one could see the whole 
town spread out below on the sandy spit of land between the two 
rivers, Drina and Rzav, and the garland of mountains around, of 
unequal height and varied shapes. On the level space around the 
town and on the steep foothills scraps and belts of ripe barley 
alternated with areas of still green maize. The houses shone white 
and the forests that covered the mountains seemed black. The 
measured cannon fire from the two sides seemed like salutes, 
formal and harmless, so gicat was the extent of the earth and 
the sky above it in the serenity of the summer day which had 
only just begun. 

The sight loose .ed the tongue even of the care-filled Mujaga. He 
thanked Alihodja for his kind words and told him the story of his 
own life, not that the hodja did not already know it, but Mujaga 
felt that here in the sunlight he could lessen the tension that 
gripped and strangled him. He felt that his fate was being decided 
here and now on this summer’s day by every roar of the guns 
from one side or the other. 

He had been not quite five years old when the Turks had had 
to leave the Serbian towns. The Osmanlis had left for Turkey 
but his father, Sulaga Mutapdiid, still a young man, but already 
respected as one of the leading Turks of U2ice, had decided to cross 
into Bosnia whence his family had come in olden times. He had 
piled the children into baskets and with all the money which 
in such circumstances he had been able to get for his house and 
lands he had left Uiice forever. With a few hundred other 
U2ice refugees he had crossed into Bosnia where there was still 
Turkish rule, and settled with his family in ViSegrad where a branch 
of the family had once lived. There he passed ten years and had 
just begun to consolidate his position in the market when the 
Austrian occupation had taken place. A harsh and uncompromising 


292 



man, he had thought it not worth his while to fly from one 
Christian rule only to live under another one. So, a year after the 
arrival of the Austrians, he had left Bosnia with his whole family, 
together with a few other families who had not wished to pass 
Aeir lives ‘within the sound of the bell', and settled in Nova VaroS 
in the Sanjak. Mujaga had then been a young man of little over 
fifteen There Suljaga had gone on with his trading and there the 
rest of the children had been born. But he was never able to forget 
all he had lost in U 2 ice, nor could he get on with the new men 
and different manner of life in the Sanjak. That was the reason 
for his early death His daughters, all pretty and of good reputation, 
had married well His sons took over and extended the small 
inheritance left them by their father. But just when they had 
married and had begun to take deeper root in their new country 
came the Balkan Wars of 1912. Mujaga had taken part in the 
resistance put up by the Turkish army against the Serbs and Mon- 
tenegrins. The resistance was short but it was neither weak nor 
unsuccessful in itself, but none the less, as if by some charm, his 
fate, like that of the war itself and of many thousands of men, was 
not decided there but somewhere far away, independent of any 
resistance, strong or weak. The Turkish army evacuated the Sanjak. 
Not willing to await an adversary from whom he had already fled 
as a child from U 2 ice and whom he had now resisted without 
success, and having nowhere else to go, Mujaga decided to return 
to Bosnia under that same rule from which his father had fled. 
So now, for the third time a refugee, he had come with his whole 
family to the town in which he had passed his childhood. 

With a little ready money and with the help of the ViSegrad 
Turks, some of whom were his relatives, he had managed to build 
up a small business over the last two years. But it was not easy 
for, as we have seen, times were hard and insecure, and profits 
diflScult to make even for those whose position was assured. He 
had been living on his capital while waiting for better and more 
peaceful times. Now, after only two years of the hard life of a 
refugee in the town, this storm had broken in which he could do 
nothing and could not even think of what to do next; the only 
thing left to him was to follow its course anxiously and await 
fearfully its outcome. 

It was of this that the two men were now talking, softly, inter- 
mittently and disconnectedly, as one speaks of things already well- 
known and which can be looked at from the end, the beginning or 
any point m the middle. Alihodja, who liked and greatly respected 
Mujaga, tried to find some words of solace or consolation, not 

293 



because he thought that anything would help, but because he felt 
it his duty in some way to partake in the misfortune of this 
honourable and unfortunate man and true Moslem. Mujaga sat 
and smoked, the very image of a man whom fate has loaded too 
heavily. Great beads of sweat broke out on his forehead and temples, 
stood there some time until they grew big and hea\y, then shone 
m the sim and overflowed like a stream down his lined face. But 
Mujaga did not feel them nor brush them away. With dull eyes he 
looked at the grass in front of him and, wrapped up in his own 
thoughts, listened to what was happening within himself which 
was stronger and louder than any words of consolation or the 
most vigorous bombardment. From time to time he moved his 
hand a little and murmured something or other which was far 
more a part of his own inward conversation than any reply to 
what was being said to him or what was takmg place aroimd him. 

This has come upon us, my Alihodja, and there is no way out. 
The One God sees that we, my father (peace be to him) and myself, 
have done everything we could to remain in the pure faith and the 
true way of life. My grandfather left his bones in U2ice and today 
we do not even know where he is buried. I myself buried my 
father in Nova Varo§ and 1 do not know if by now the Vlachs 
are pasturing their cattle over his grave. I had thought that I at 
least would die here, where the muezzin still calls, but now it 
seems that it is written that our seed will be extinguished and that 
no one knows where his grave will be. Can it be that God’s wishes 
are so? Only now I see that there is no way out The time has come 
of which it is said that the only way left for the true faith is to 
die. For what can I do? Shall I go with Nailbeg and the schutzkorps 
and die with a Schwabe rifle in my hands, shamed both in this 
and in the next world? Or shall I wait and sit here until Serbia 
shall come, and wait once more for all that we fled from as 
refugees fifty years ago?’ 

Alihodja was about to utter some words of encouragement that 
might provide a little hope, but he was interrupted by a salvo from 
the Austrian battery on the Butkovo Rocks. It was immediately 
answered by the guns from Panos. Then those behind GoleS opened 
fire. They were firing low, directly over their heads, so that the 
shells wove a web of sound above them that catches at a man’s 
entrails and tightens the blood-vessels until they hurt. Alihodja 
rose and suggested that they take refuge under the balcony, and 
Mujaga followed him like a sleepwalker. 

In the Serbian houses huddled around the church at Mejdan 
there were, on the other hand, no regrets for the past or fears 


294 



for the future; there was only the fear and burden of the present. 
There was a sort of special, dumb astonishment, that feeling which 
always remains among people after the first blows of a great terror, 
with arrests and killings without order or justice. But beneath this 
consternation everything was the same as it had been earlier, 
the same expectant waiting as before, more than a hundred years 
ago, when the insurgents’ fires had burned on Panos, the same 
hope, the same caution and the same resolution to bear everything 
if it could not be otherwise, the same faith in a good result some- 
where at the end of all ends. 

The grandchildren and great-grandchildren of those who from 
this same hillside, shut up in their houses, anxious and frightened 
but moved to the depths of their being, had listened intently trying 
to hear the feeble echo of Karageorge’s gun on the hillside above 
Veletovo, now listened in the warm darkness to the thunder and 
nimble of the heavy howitzer shells passing above their heads, 
guessmg from the sound which were Serbian and which Austrian, 
calling them endearing nick-names or cursing them. All this while 
the shells were fiying high and falling on the outskirts of the 
town, but when they were aimed low at the bridge and the town 
itself everyone fell suddenly silent for then it seemed to them, and 
they would have sworn to it, that in that complete silence, in 
the midst of so much space around them, both sides were aiming 
only at them and the house in which they were. Only after the 
thunder and roar of a nearby explosion had died away, they would 
begin talking again, but in changed voices, assuring one another 
that the shell which had fallen quite close was of a particularly 
devilish kind, worse than any other. 

The merchants from the market-place had for the most part 
taken refuge in the Ristid house. It was immediately above the 
priest’s house, but larger and finer, sheltered from the artillery 
fire by the steep slopes of the plum-orchards. There were few men 
but many women, whose husbands had been arrested or taken 
as hostages, who had taken refuge here with their children. 

In this rich and extensive house lived old Mihailo Ristid with 
his wife and daughter-in-law, a widow who had not wanted to 
marry again or return to her father’s house after the death of her 
husband, but remained there with the two old people to bring 
up her children. Her eldest son had fled to Serbia two years before 
and been killed as a volunteer on the Bregalnica. He had been 
eighteen years old. 

Old Mihailo, his wife and daughto'-in-law served their unusual 
guests as if they were at a family feast, a slava. The old man 


295 



especially was untinng. He was bareheaded, which was unusual, 
for as rule he never took off his red fez His thick grey hair fell 
over his ears and forehead and his huge silvery moustaches, yellow 
at the roots from tobacco, surrounded his mouth like a perpetual 
smile Whenever he noticed that anyone was frightened or more 
melancholy than the others, he would go up to him, talk to him 
and offer him plum brandy, coffee and tobacco 

‘I can’t, kum Mihailo. I thank you like a father, but I can’t; 
it hurts me here,’ protested a young woman, pointing to her white 
and rounded throat. 

She was the wife of Peter Gatal of Okoli?te. A few days before 
Peter had gone to Sarajevo on business There he had been caught 
by the outbreak of war and from that time onward his wife had 
had no news of him The army had driven them out of their house, 
and now she and her children had taken refuge with old Mihailo, 
to whom her husband’s family had long been related. She was 
broken down with worry about her husband and her abandoned 
home She wrung her hands, sobbing and sighing alternately. 

Old Mihailo never took his eyes off her and kept near her always 
That morning it had been learnt that Peter, on his way back from 
Sarajevo by train, had been taken as a hostage to VardiSte and 
there, after a false alarm of a revolt, had been shot in mistake. 
That was still being kept from her, and old Mihailo was doing his 
best to prevent anyone suddenly and inadvisedly telling her. Every 
few moments the woman would rise and try to go into the court- 
yard and look towards OkoliSte, but Mihailo prevented her and 
talked her out of it by every possible means, for he knew very 
well that the Gatal house in OkoliSte was already in flames and 
he wanted to spare the unfortunate woman this sight at least. 

‘Come, Stanoika, come, my lamb. Just a little glass. This is not 
plum brandy, but a real balm and cure for all ills.’ 

The woman drank it meekly. Old Mihailo went on offering food 
and drink to everyone present and his untiring and irresistible 
hospitality forced them all to take heart. Then he went back to 
Peter’s wife. The plum brandy had in fact loosened the constriction 
in her throat. Now she was calmer and only gazed pensively in 
front of her. Mihailo would not leave her side, but went on talking 
to her as to a child, telling her how all this too would pass and 
her Peter come back from Sarajevo alive and well, and they would 
all go home again to their house at OkoliSte. 

‘I know Peter. I was at his christening. They talked about that 
christening for a long time. I remember it as if it had been today. 
I was a young man then, just ripe for marriage, when I went with 

296 



my father, who was kum to Janko’s children, to christen that Peter 
of yours/ 

He told the tale of the christening of Peter Gatal which everyone 
already knew but which in these strange hours seemed as if new 
to them. 

The men and women drew closer to listen, and in listening 
forgot their danger and paid no attention to the sound of the 
guns as old Mihailo told his tale. 

In the good times of peace, when the famous Pop Nikola was 
pnest in the town, Janko Gatal of OkoliSte, after many years of 
marriage and a whole succession of daughters, had a son On the 
first Sunday after the birth, they brought the child to be christened 
and besides the joyous father and the kum, a number of relatives 
and neighbours came too Even on the way down from OkoliSte 
they stopped often and had a nip from the kum*s big flat flask 
of plum brandy When on crossing the bridge they came to the 
kapia, they sat down for a short rest and another nip. It was a 
cold day in late autumn and there was no coffee maker on the 
kapia, nor had the town Turks come there to sit and drink coffee. 
Therefore the people of OkoliSte sat down as if they were at home, 
opened their bags of food and beean a fresh flask of plum brandy. 
Toasting one another cordially and eloquently, they forgot all about 
the baby and the priest who was to christen it after the service. 
As in those days— the seventies of last century— there were still 
no bells, and dared not be, the merry party did not notice the 
passing of time and that the service had long been finished. In 
their conversations, wherein they boldly and at great length 
mingled the future of the baby with the past of its parents, time 
had no longer any importance or any measure. Several times the 
conscience of the kum smote him and he suggested that they should 
move on. but the others silenced him. 

‘Well, friends, let us ho and finish what we have to do, by the 
law and the Christian faith,' muttered the kum. 

‘Why the hurry, in God’s name; no one in this parish has ever 
stayed unchristened,' answered the others and each offered him a 
drink from his flask. 

The father too at one time tried to hurry them on, but in the 
end the plum brandy silenced and reconciled them all. His wife 
who UP till then had been holding the baby in her arms which 
were blue from cold, now put it down on the stone seat and 
wrapped it in a coloured shawl. The baby was as quiet as if it 
were in its cradle, now sleeping, now opening its eyes inquisitively 
as if to take part in the general gaiety (‘One can see that he is 

297 



a true townsman,’ said the kum. ‘He loves good company and fun.’). 

‘Your health, Janko,’ shouted one of the neighbours. “May your 
son be lucky and live long God grant that he do you honour among 
the Serbs in all good and prosperity. God grant that. . . .’ 

‘How would it be if we got on with the christening?’ interrupted 
the father. 

‘Don’t worry about the christening,’ they all cried and once 
more passed round the flask of plum brandy. 

‘Ragib Effendi Borovac has never been christened either, but 
you see what a fellow he is; his horse bends under him,’ shouted 
one of the neighbours amid general laughter. 

But if time had lost all meaning for the men on the kapia, it had 
not done so for Pop Nikola, who had till then been waiting in front 
of the church, but by this time had grown angry. He wrapped his 
fox-skin cape about him and marched down from Mejdan into 
the town There someone told him that the men with the child 
were on the kapia. He went there to give them a good browbeating, 
as he well knew how, but they welcomed him with so much heart- 
felt and sincere respect, with such solemn excuses and warm wishes 
and good words that even Pop Nikola, who was a hard and severe 
man, but a real townsman at heart, gave way and accepted a 
drink from a flask and some snacks He bent over the baby and 
called it little baby names, while the child looked up calmly at 
the huge face with its big blue eyes and broad reddish beard. 

It was not quite true, as they said, that the little one was 
christened then and there on the kapia, but it is true that they stayed 
there a long time talking, drinking and proposing many toasts. 
It was not until late in the afternoon that the whole gay company 
made its way up to Mejdan and the church was opened and the 
kum, stuttering and unsure of his words, renounced the devil in 
the name of the new townsman. 

‘It was so we christened kum Peter, may he remain safe and 
sound. He has now passed his fortieth year and as you see has lacked 
for nothing,’ old Mihailo ended. 

Everyone accepted another coffee and a glass of plum brandy, 
forgetting the reality of the moment which might sweep them all 
away. All talked more freely and easily. Somehow it now seemed 
clear to them that there were other things in life, more joyful 
and human things, than this darkness, fear and murderous shooting. 

So the night passed and with it life went on, filled with danger 
and suffering but still clear, unwavering and true to itself. Led on 
by ancient inherited instinct they broke it up into momentary 
impressions and immediate needs, losing themselves completely in 

298 



them. For only thus, living each moment separately and looking 
neither forward nor back, could such a life be borne and a man 
keep himself alive in hope of better days. 

So the day broke. That meant only that the artillery fire became 
more intense and the senseless and incomprehensible game of war 
continued. For in themselves days no longer had either name or 
sense; time had lost all meaning and value. Men knew only how 
to wait and to tremble. Save for that, words, work and movements 
had all become automatic. 

So, or similarly, did men live in the steep quarters below the 
Fortress and at Mejdan. 

Below, in the market-place itself, few citizens had remained. 
From the first day of the war there had been an order that all 
shops must remain open so that the soldiers in passing could make 
minor purchases, and even more to prove to the citizens that the 
war was far away and presented no danger to the town. That 
order had remained in force, no one knew why, even now during 
the bombardment, but everyone found some good excuse to keep 
his shop closed for the greater part of the day. Those shops which 
were near the bridge and the Stone Han, like those of Pavle Rankovid 
and Alihodja, were closed all day for they were too exposed to 
the bombardment. So too, Lotte’s hotel was completely deserted 
and closed, its roof had been damaged by shell-fire and the walls 
pitted with shrapnel. 

Alihodja only came down from his house on the hill once or 
twice a day to see if everything were in order, and then returned 
home. 

Lotte and her whole family had left the hotel on the first day 
after the bombardment of the bridge began. They crossed to the 
left bank of the Drina and took refuge there in a large new Turkish 
house. The house was some way from the road, sheltered in a 
hollow and surrounded by dense orchards from which only its 
red roof emerged Its owner vrith all his family had gone to the 
villages. 

They had left the hotel at dusk, when as a rule there was a 
complete lull in the bombardment. Of the staff, the only one who 
remained was the loyal and unchanging Milan, an old bachelor 
but always immaculately turned out. For a long time past there 
had been no one for him to throw out of the hotel. All the others, 
as often happens in such circumstances, had fied as soon as the first 
shell whistled over the town. As alwa3rs, in this transplantation 
also, Lotte had controlled and arranged eveiything, personally and 
without opposition. She decided what was most necessary and most 


299 



valuable to take with them, and what to leave behind, what each 
should wear, who was to carry Deborah’s crippled and feeble-minded 
son, who was to look after Deborah herself, weeping and sickly, 
and who take care of the portly Mina, who was out of her mind 
from fear. So, taking advantage of the darkness of the hot summer 
night, all of them— Lotte, Deborah, Zahler and Mina— crossed the 
bridge with their few belongings and the sickly child on a push- 
cart, with their cases and bundles in their hands. After thirty years 
the hotel was now for the first time completely closed and remained 
without a living soul in it Darkened, damaged by the shell-fire. 
It already looked like a ruin. They too, as soon as they made their 
first steps across the bridge, aged or weak, cnppled or fat, bow- 
legged or unaccustomed to walking, suddenly seemed like Jewish 
refugees who had been walking all the roads of the world m search 
of refuge 

So they crossed to the farther bank and came to the big Turkish 
house to spend the night. There too Lotte arranged everything 
and put everything in order, their refugee luggage and them- 
selves. But when it was time for her to lie down in that strange 
half-empty room, without her things and her papers with which 
she had spent her life, her heart failed her and for the first time 
since she had been conscious of her own existence, her forces all 
at once gave way. Her scream echoed through the empty Turkish 
house, something that no one had ever heard or suspected could 
exist. Lotte’s weeping was terrible, heavy and stifled like that 
of a man, uncontrolled and uncontrollable. The whole family was 
overcome with astonishment. At first there was an almost religious 
silence and then a general weeping and wailing. For them the 
breakdown of Aunt Lotte’s forces was a heavier blow than the 
war itself and the flight and the loss of home and property, for 
with her it was possible to surmount and overcome everything 
but without her they could think of nothing and do nothing. 

When the next day dawned, a brilliant summer day, filled with 
the singing of birds, with rosy clouds and heavy dew, instead of the 
one-time Lotte, who up to the day before had controlled the 
destinies of all her family, there remained huddled on the floor 
a weak old Jewess who could not look after or care for herself, 
who diivered from reasonless fear and who wept like a child, not 
knowing how to say of what she was afraid or tell what it was 
that pained her. Then another miracle took place. That old, cumber- 
some, drowsy Zahler, who even in his youth had never had a will 
of his own but had been content to let Lotte guide him as she did 
all the rest of the family, who in fact had never been young, now 


300 



revealed himself as the real head of the family, with much wisdom 
and resolution, capable of making the necessary decisions and 
with enough force to put them into practice. He consoled and 
looked after his sister-in-law like a sick child and took care of 
everyone as she had done nght up to the day before. He went down 
into the town during a lull in the bombardment and brought 
necessary food, goods and clothing from the deserted hotel. He 
found a doctor somewhere and brought him to the sick woman. 
The doctor diagnosed that the sick old woman had had a complete 
nervous breakdown, and said that she should be taken somewhere 
else as qiuckly as possible, outside the area of military operations, 
and prescribed some drops. Zahler arranged with the military 
authorities to get a cart and transport the whole family first to 
Rogatica and then to Sarajevo. It was only necessary to wait a 
day or two until Lotte was fit to travel. But Lotte lay as if paralytic, 
wept at the top of her voice and muttered m her picturesque and 
mangled language disconnected words of utter desperation, fear 
and repulsion. Deborah’s imlucky child crawled around her on 
the bare floor, looked inquisitively into his aunt’s face and called to 
her with those mcomprehensible cries which Lotte had once under- 
stood so well and to which she did not now reply. She refused 
to eat anything or to see anyone. She suffered terribly from strange 
hallucinations of purely physical suffenng. Sometimes it seemed 
to her that two planks beneath her suddenly opened like a trap- 
door and that she fell between them into an unknown abyss and 
that, save for her own screams, there was nothing to save her 
and support her. At other times it seemed to her that she had in 
some way become huge, but light and very strong, as if she had 
giant’s legs and powerful wmgs and ran like an ostrich, but with 
steps longer than from ViSegrad to Sarajevo. The seas and rivers 
splashed under her tread like puddles, and towns and villages 
cracked under her steps like gravel and glass. That made her heart 
beat fiercely and her breath come in gasps. She did not know where 
that winged race would take her nor where it would stop, she only 
knew that she was escaping from those deceivmg planks which 
opened beneath her with the speed of lightning. She knew that 
she trod down and left behind her a land in which it was not 
good to stay and that she stepped over villages and great towns in 
which men lied and cheated with words and figures. When their 
words became mvolved and their figures entangled, they at once 
changed their game, as a conjuror changes his scene, and contrary 
to all that had been said or was expected, guns and rifles advanced 
with other, new men with bloodshot eyes with whom there 


301 



could be no conversation, no compromise and no agreement. 
Faced with this invasion she was suddenly no longer a powerful 
and giant bird that ran, but a weak, defenceless poor old woman on 
the hard floor. And these people came in hordes, in thousands, in 
millions; they shot, they cut throats, they drowned people, they 
destroyed without mercy or reason. One of them was ben^ng over 
her; she could not see his face but felt the point of his bayonet 
pressed on that spot where the ribs separate and a person is softest. 

‘Ah . . a . . a . . a . . aah! No, don’t! Don't!’ Lotte woke with a 
shriek and tore pieces out of the thin grey shawl that covered her. 

The little cretm squatted there, leaning against the wall, and 
watched her with his black eyes in which was more curiosity 
than fear or sympathy. Mina birnst in from the next room, reassured 
Lotte, wiped the cold sweat from her face and gave her water to 
drink into which she carefully numbered the drops of valerian. 

The long summer day over the green valley seemed endless, so 
that one could not remember when it had dawned or believe that 
it would ever be dusk. Here in the house, it was warm but not 
oppressive. Steps echoed in the house; other citizens kept arriving 
from the town or some soldier or officer wandered about. There 
was food and fruit in abundance. Milan brewed coffee continually. 
It might all have seemed like some extended festival visit to the 
villages, had it not been for Lotte’s despairing scream which broke 
out from time to time and the sullen thunder of the guns which 
sounded in that sheltered hollow like howls of rage which showed 
that all was not well with the world, that imiversal and individual 
misfortune was nearer and greater than it seemed in the wide 
serenity of the day. 

That was what war had done to Lotte’s hotel and its occupants. 

Pavle Rankovid’s diop was also shut. On the second day of 
the war Pavle, with other prominent Serbs, had been taken as a 
hostage. Some of them were at the station where they answered 
with their lives for the peace, order and regular communication 
of the line, while others were not far from the bridge, in a small 
wooden shed at the far end of the square where on market days 
the municipal scales were kept and where the local octroi was paid. 
There too the hostages had to answer with their lives, should 
anyone destroy or damage the bridge. 

Pavle was sitting there on a cafd chair. With hands on knees 
and bowed head, he looked the perfect picture of a man who, 
exhausted aftor some great effort, had sat down for a moment’s 
rest, but he had been ntdng there motionless in the same position 
for several hours. At the door two soldiers, reservists, sat on a 


302 



pile of empty sacks. The doors were shut and the shed was dark 
and oppressively hot. When a shell from Panos or GoleS whistled 
overhead, Pavle swallowed and listened to hear where it fell. He 
knew that the bridge had been nuned and thought of that con- 
tmually, asking himself whether one such shell could ignite the 
explosives should it penetrate to the charge. At every change of 
guard he listened to the non-commissioned oflBicer giving instruc- 
tions to the soldiers: 'At the least attempt to damage the bridge, 
or at any suspicious sign that such a thing is being prepared, 
this man must be killed at once.’ Pavle had got used to listening to 
these words calmly as if they did not refer to him. The shells 
and shrapnel, which occasionally exploded so near the shed that 
gravel and pieces of metal struck the planks, disturbed him more. 
But what tormented him most of all were his long, his endless and 
unbearable, thoughts. 

He kept thinking what was to happen to him, to his house and 
his property. The more he thought, the more everything seemed like 
a bad dream. In what other way could all that had happened to 
him in the last few days be explained? The gendarmes had taken 
away his two sons, students, on the first day. His wife had remained 
at home, alone with her daughters. The great warehouse at Osojnica 
had been burnt down before his eyes. His serfs from the nearby 
villages had probably been killed or dispersed. All his credits over 
the whole district— lost! His shop, the most beautiful shop m the 
whole town, only a few paces from where he was now, had been 
shut and would probably be pillaged, or set on fire by the shells. 
He himself was sitting m the semi-darkness of this shed, responsible 
with his life for something that in no way depended on him; for 
the fate of that bridge. 

His thoughts whirled in his head; tumultuous and disordered 
as never before, they crossed and mingled and were extinguished. 
What sort of connection had he with that bridge, he who all his 
life had paid no attention to anything save his work and his 
family? It was not he who had mined it, nor had he bombarded 
it. Not even when he had been an apprentice and unmarried, had 
he ever sat on the kapia and wasted his time in singmg and idle 
jokes, like so many ViSegrad youths. All his life passed before 
his eyes, with many details which he had long ago forgotten. 

He remembered how he had come from the Sanjak as a fourteen- 
year-old boy, hungry and in shabby peasant sandals. He had struck 
a bargain with old Peter to serve him for one suit of clothes, his 
food and two pairs of sandals aimually. He had looked after the 
childroi, helped in the shop, drawn water and groomed the horses. 


303 



He had slept under the stairs in a dark, narrow cupboard without 
windows where he could not even lie down at full length. He 
had endured this hard life and, when he was eighteen, had gone 
into the shop ‘on salary’. His place had been taken by another 
village boy from the Sanjak. In the shop he had got to know and 
understand the great idea of thnft, and had felt the fierce and 
wonderful passion in the great power that thrift gave. For five 
years he had slept in a little room behind the shop. In five years 
he had never once lit a fire or gone to sleep with a candle beside 
him. He had been twenty-three when Peter himself had arranged 
a marriage for him with a good and well-to-do girl from Cajnicie 
She had been a merchant’s daughter and now both of them saved 
together. Then came the time of the occupation and with it livelier 
trade, easier gain and lower expenses. He made good use of the 
profits and avoided the expenses. Thus he was able to get a shop 
and began to make money. At that time it was not difficult. Many 
then made money easily and lost it even more easily. But what was 
made was hard to keep. He had kept his and every day made more. 
When these last years came and with them unrest and ‘politics’, 
he, though already advanced in years, had tried to understand 
the new times, to stand up to them and adapt himself to them, 
and to go through them without harm and without shame He had 
been Vice-President of the Municipality, President of the Religious 
Community, President of the Serbian Choral Society ‘Concord’, 
main shareholder of the Serbian Bank and member of the executive 
committee of the local Agricultural Bank. He had tried his best, 
according to the rules of the market-place, to make his way wisely 
and honestly between the contrary influences which increased daily, 
without allowing his own interests to suffer, without being regarded 
with suspicion by the authorities or brought to shame before his 
own people. In the eyes of the townsmen he passed for an inimitable 
example of industry, common sense and circumspection. 

Thus, for more than a half of a normal human existence he had 
worked, saved, worried and made money. He had taken care not 
to hurt a fly, been avil to all and looked only straight ahead of 
him, keeping silent and maWng money in his own way. And here 
was where it had led him; to sit between two soldiers like the 
lowest of brigands and wait until some shell or infernal machine 
should damage the bridge and, for that reason, to have his throat 
cut or be shot. He began to think (and that pained him most of all) 
that he had worked and worried and ill-used himself all in vain, 
that he had chosen the wrong path and that his sons and all the 
other ‘youngsters’ had been right, and that times had come without 


304 



measures or calculations or which had some sort of new measures 
and different calculations; in any case his own calculations had 
been shown to be inaccurate and his measures short. 

‘That’s the way of it,’ said Pavle to himself, ‘that’s the way; 
everyone teaches you and urges you to work and to save, the 
Church, the authorities and your own common sense. You listen and 
live prudently, in fact you do not live at all, but work and save 
and are burdened with cares; and so your whole life passes. Then, 
all of a sudden, the whole thing turns upside down; times come 
when the world mocks at reason, when the Church shuts its doors 
and is silent, when authority becomes mere brute force, when 
they who have made their money honestly and with the sweat of 
their brows lose both their time and their money, and the violent 
win the game. No one recognizes your efforts and there is no one 
to help or advise you how to keep what you have earned and 
saved Can this be? Surely this cannot be?’ Pavle asked himself 
continually, and without finding any answer went back to the 
point whence his thought had started— the loss of all that he 
possessed. 

Try as he might to think of something else, he could not succeed. 
His thoughts returned continually to the point where they had 
started. Time crept by with mortal slowness. It seemed to him 
that the bridge over which he had crossed thousands of times but 
had never really looked at, now lay with all its weight on his 
shoulders like some inexplicable and fateful burden, like a night- 
mare but in a sleep from which there was no awakening. 

Therefore Pavle went on sitting there, huddled on his chair with 
bowed head and shoulders He felt the sweat oozing from every 
pore under his thick starched shirt, collar and cuffs. It fell in 
streams from under his fez. He did not wipe it away but let it 
stream down his face and fall in heavy drops to the floor and 
it seemed to him that it was his life that was draining away and 
was leaving him. 

The two soldiers, middle-aged Hungarian peasants, remained 
silent and ate bread and ham sprinkled with paprika; they ate 
slowly, cutting off with a small penknife first a piece of bread 
and then a slice of ham as if they were in their own fields. Then 
they took a mouthful of v/ine from an army canteen and lit their 
short pipes Puffing away, one of them said softly: 

‘Eh, I have never seen a man sweat so much.’ 

Then they went on smoking in complete silence. 

But it was not only Pavle who sweated such bloody sweat and lost 
himself in that sleep from which there is no awakening. In those 


305 



summer days, on that little piece of earth between the Drina and the 
dry frontier, in the town, in the villages, on the roads and in the 
forests, everywhere men sought death, their own or others’, and 
at the same time fled from it and defended themselves from it 
by all the means in their power. That strange human game which 
is called war became more and more intense and submitted to 
its authority hvmg creatures and material things. 

Not far from that municipal shed a detachment of an unusual 
army was resting. The men were in white uniforms with white 
tropical helmets on their heads. They were Germans, the so-called 
Skadar detachment. Before the war they had been sent to Skadar 
(Scutari in Albania) where they were to maintain law and order" 
together ivith detachments from other nations, as part of an inter- 
national army. When war broke out, they had received orders to 
leave Skadar and place themselves at the disposal of the nearest 
Austrian Army command on the Serbian frontier. They had come 
the evening before and were now resting in the hollow which 
separated the square from the market-place. There, in a sheltered 
comer, they awaited the order to attack. There were about 120 
of them. Their captain, a plump reddish man who suffered from 
the heat, had just been cursing at the gendarmerie sergeant Danilo 
Repac, cursing him as only a senior officer of the German army 
can curse, noisily, pedantically and ivithout any sort of con- 
sideration. The captain was complaining that his soldiers were 
dying of thirst, that they had not even the most necessary supplies, 
since all the shops nearby, which were probably full of everything, 
were shut despite the order that all shops were to remain open. 

“What are you here for? Are you gendarmes or dolls? Must I die 
here with all my men? Or must 1 break open the shops like a 
robber? Find the owners at once and make them sell us provisions 
and something worth drinking! At once! Do you understand what 
that means? At once!’ 

At every word the captain grew more and more flushed. In 
his white uniform, his close-shaven head red as a poppy, he seemed 
to bum with anger like a torch. 

Sergeant Repac, astounded, only blinked and went on repeating: 

‘I understand, sir. At once. I understand. At once!’ 

Then, passing suddenly from his cataleptic stiffness to frenzied 
action, he turned and hurried from the market-place. It seemed as if 
the sergeant, approaching too close to that captain flaming with 
anger, had himsdf been touched by that flame, which made him run, 
curse, threaten and beat all round him. 

The first living being whom he met in the course of his mad rush 

306 



was Alihodja, who had just come down from his house to cast an 
eye on his shop. Looking closely at the once familiar ‘wachtmeistef 
Repac, now completely changed, rushing towards him, the 
astonished hodja asked himself whether this savage and maddened 
man was really the same ‘wachtmeister’ whom he had watched for 
years, calm, dignified and humane, passing in front of his shop. Now 
this sombre and infuriated Repac looked at him with new eyes which 
no longer recognized anyone and saw only their own fear. The 
sergeant at once began to shout, repeating what only a short time 
ago he had heard from the German captain. 

‘God in heaven, 1 ought to hang all of you! Weren’t you ordered 
to keep your shops open? For your sake, I have had to . . .’ 

And before the astonished hodja was able to utter a word, he 
slapped him hard on the right cheek so that his turban slid from his 
right ear to his left. 

Then the sergeant rushed frenziedly on to open other shops. The 
hodja set his turban straight, let down his door-shutter and sat on 
it, almost out of his mind from astonishment. Around the shop 
crowded a swarm of strange-looking soldiers in white imiforms such 
as he had never seen before. It seemed to the hodja as if he were 
dreaming. But in these times when slaps fell from heaven he no 
longer felt really astonished at anything. 

So the whole month passed, in preliminary bombardment of the 
bridge and in the firing from the surrotmding hills, in suffering and 
violence of every kind, and in the expectation of worse misfortunes. 
In the first days the greater number of the citizens had already left 
the town which now lay between two fires. By the end of September 
the complete evacuation of the towoi began. Even the last officials 
were withdrawn, by night along the road which led over the bridge, 
for the railway line had already been cut. Then the army was with- 
drawn little by little from the right bank of the Drina. There re- 
mained only a small number of defence squads, a few engineers’ 
units and some gendarme patrols, until the orders came for them too 
to retire. 

The bridge remained as if under sentence of death, but none the 
less still whole and imtouched, between the two warring sides. 


307 



XXIV 




D uring the night the sky clouded over as if it were autumn; 
the clouds clung to the tops of the mountains and lingered 
in the valleys between them. The Austrians had taken ad- 
vantage of the darkness of the night to effect the with- 
drawal of even the last detachments. Already before dawn they were 
all not only on the right bank of the Drina but on the heights behind 
the Lijeste chain, out of sight and out of range of the Serbian guns. 

At daybreak there was a fine, almost autumnal, rain. In that rain 
the last patrols visited houses and shops in the vicinity of the bridge 
to see if there were anyone still in them. Everything was as if dead; 
the officers’ mess, Lotte’s hotel, the ruined barracks and those three 
or four shops at the entrance to the market-place But in front of 
Alihodja’s shop they came upon the hodja who had just come down 
from his house and let down his door-shutter. The gendarmes, who 
knew the hodja as an eccentric, warned him most seriously to shut 
his shop at once and leave the market-place, for any longer stay in 
the vicinity of the bridge was most ‘dangerous to life’ and strictly 
forbidden. The hodja looked at them as if they were drunk and did 
not know what they were saying. He wanted to reply that life had 
been dangerous for a long time past and that everyone was more 
or less dead already and only waiting his turn to be buried, but he 
thought better of it, taught by the bad experience of the last few 
days, and merely told them calmly and naturally that he had only 
come to take something from the shop and would return home at 
once. The gendarmes, who were evidently in a hurry, warned him 
once more that he should move away as soon as possible, and went 
on across the square to the bridge. Alihodja watched them marching 
away, their footfalls inaudible in the dust which the morning rain 
had turned to a thick, damp carpet. He was still watching them as 
they crossed the bridge, half concealed by the stone parapet, so that 
they could see only their heads and shoulders and the long bayonets 
on their rifles. The first rays of sunlight struck on the heights of the 
Butkovo Rocks. 


308 



All their orders were like this, severe, important and yet basically 
senseless, thought Alihodja, and smiled to himself like a child who 
has outwitted his teacher. He lifted the door-shutter enough to let 
him get inside and then let it fall, so that from the outside the shop 
appeared to be shut. Alone in the darkness, he wriggled his way into 
that little room behind the shop where he had so often taken refuge 
from the obtrusive world, from conversations that poisoned and 
bored him, from his family and from his ovm worries. He sat down 
on the small hard chair and crossed his legs under him and sighed. 
His inner self was still troubled by outward impressions, but he soon 
became calm and balanced again. The narrow room quickly filled 
with the warmth of his body and the hod]a felt that sweemess of soli- 
tude, peace and forgetfulness which made of the close, dark, dusty 
little room a place of endless paradisiacal gardens with green banl^ 
between which murmured invisible waters. 

In the darkness and closeness of this narrow space he could still 
feel the freshness of the morning rain and the sunrise outside. Outside 
there was an unusual silence which, for a wonder, was not broken 
by a single shot, a single voice or footfall Alihodja was flooded with 
a feeling of happiness and gratitude. These few planks, he thought to 
himself, were enough, with God’s help, to shelter and save a true be- 
liever, like some wonder ship, from every misery and care to which 
there seemed no solution and from the guns with which the two 
enemies, both infidel and each worse than the other, were fighting 
their duel over his head. There had not been such a calm since the 
opening of hostilities, the hodja thought joyously, and silence is 
sweet and good; with it returned, at least for a moment, a little of 
that real human life which had recently groivn weaker and weaker 
and which, under the thunder of the infidel guns, had completely 
disappeared Silence is for prayer; it is itself like a prayer. 

At that moment the hodja felt the stool under him rise upward 
and lift him like a toy; his ‘sweet’ silence was shattered and suddenly 
transformed into a dull roar and a great smashing that filled the air, 
tore at the eardrums and became universal and unbearable. The 
shelves on the wall opposite cracked and the things on them leapt at 
him as he at them. Ah, shrieked the hodja: or rather he only thought 
that he shrieked for he himself no longer had voice or hearing, even 
as he no longer had any place on the earth Ever^hing was deafened 
by sound, shattered, torn up by the roots and whirled about him. Im- 
probable as it seemed, he felt as if the little tongue of land between 
the two rivers on which the town was built had been plucked out 
of the earth vnth a terrific noise and thrown into space in which it 
was still flying; that the two rivers had been tom out of their beds 


309 



and drawn upward to the skies, only to fall once more with all their 
mass of waters into the void, like two waterfalls which had not yet 
been halted or broken. Was not this kiyamet, that last Day of Judg- 
ment of which books and learned men spoke, in which this lying 
world would be burnt up in the twinkling of an eye, like one stubs 
out a spark? But what need had God. whose glance was enough to 
CTcate and to extinguish worlds, with such a chaos? This was not 
divine. But if not, how had human hands such power? How could 
he, so astonished, so deceived, so overwhelmed by this temble blow 
which seemed to destroy, break up and suffocate everything down 
to man’s very thought, give an answer to this? He did not know what 
power it was that bore him up, he did not know where he was flying 
nor where he would stop, but he knew that he. Alihodja, had always 
and in everything been right. Ah, shrieked the hodja once again, but 
this time with pain for that same force that had lifted him up now 
threw him roughly and violently back again, but not to the place 
where he had been but to the floor between the wooden wall and 
the overturned stool. He felt a dull blow on his head and a pain under 
his knees and in his back. Now he could tell only by ear, like a sound 
separate and distinct from the universal thundering, that something 
heavy had struck the roof of the shop and that, there behind the par- 
tition, had begun a clashing and breaking of wooden and metal ob- 
jects as if all the things in the shop had come alive, were flying about 
and colliding in mid-air But Alihodja had already lost consciousness 
and lay motionless in his little room, as if it were indeed his coffin. 

Outside it was by now full day. 

He could not have said even approximately how long he lay there. 
What roused him out of his deep unconsciousness was a light and at 
the same time the sound of voices. He came to himself with diffi- 
culty. He knew very well that he was lying there in complete dark- 
ness and yet through the narrow entrance a ray of light reached him 
from the shop. He remembered how the world had been filled with 
sound and uproar in which a man’s hearing was deafened and his en^ 
tr ai l s melted within him. Now there was silence once more, but no 
longer like that silence that had seemed to him so sweet before the 
cataclysm that had thrown him down where he was now, but like 
some evil sister of it. How deep was this silence he best realized by 
some weak voices which, as if from a great distance, were shouting 
his name. 

Realizing that he was alive and still in his little room, the hodja 
extricated himself from the mass of objects that had fallen on top 
of him from the shelves, and rose, groaning continually and uttering 
cries of pain. Now he could hear the voices from the street clearly. 

310 



He went down and crawled through the narrow opening into the 
shop. It was littered with fallen and broken objects, all in the full 
light of day. The shop was wide open, for the door-shutter, which he 
had left leaning but unlocked, had been knocked over by the blast. 

In the chaos and disorder of scattered goods and damaged objects 
that lay in the centre of the shop was a heavy stone about the size of 
a man’s head The hodja looked up. Clearly the stone had flovm 
through the air, breaking through the weak roof of wooden shingles. 
Alihodja looked again at the stone, white and porous, smooth and 
clean-cut on two sides but sharp and crudely broken on the other 
two. ‘Ah, the bridge!’ thought the hodja but the voices from the 
street summoned him even more loudly and peremptorily and 
would not let him think. 

Bruised and still only half-conscious, the hodja found himself face 
to face with a group of five or six young men, dusty and unshaven, 
in grey uniforms with forage-caps on their heads and peasant sandals 
on their feet. All were armed and wore crossed bandoliers filled with 
small, shining bullets. With them was Vlado Marid the locksmith, 
but without his usual cap, wearing a fur hat and with the same cart- 
ridge belts across his chest. One of the men, clearly the leader, a 
young man with thin black moustaches and a regular face with fine 
features and fiery eyes, at once addressed the hodja. He was carrying 
his rifle over his shoulder like a hunter and had a thin hazel switch 
in his right hand. 

‘Hey, you! Do you usually leave your shop wide open? If anything 
is missing you will say that my soldiers have pillaged it. Do you ex- 
pect me to look after your goods for you?' 

The man’s face was calm, almost without expression, but his voice 
was angry and the switch in his hand was raised threateningly. 
Vlado Marid came up and whispered to him. 

‘Very well, then. Perhaps he is a good and honest man, but if I find 
he has left his shop yawning wide open again, he will not get off so 
easily.’ 

The armed men went on their way. 

‘Those are the others,' said the hodja to himself, looking after 
them. ‘Why should they light on me as soon as they come into the 
town? It seems that nothing can change in this town without the 
whole lot falling on my head!’ 

He stood in front of his damaged shop, mouth open, with heavy 
head and broken body. Before him lay the square which, in the 
early morning sun, looked like a battlefield, scattered with large and 
small bits of stone, tiles and broken branches. His gaze turned to the 
bridge. The kapia was there where it had always been, but just be- 


3 “ 



yond the kapia the bridge stopped short. There was no longer any 
seventh pier; between the sixth and the eighth yawned a gulf 
through which he could see the green waters of the river. From the 
eighth pier onward the bridge once more stretched to the farther 
bank, smooth and regular and white, as it had been yesterday and 
always. 

The hodja blinked his eyes several times in unbelief: then he 
closed them Before his inward sight appeared the memory of those 
soldiers whom he had seen six years before, concealed beneath a 
green tent, digging at that very pier, and he recalled the picture of 
that iron manhole which in later years had covered the entrance into 
the mined interior of the pier, and also the enigmatic yet eloquent 
face of Sergeant-Major Brankovid, deaf, blind and dumb. He started 
and opened his eyes again, but everything in front of him remained 
just as it was before; the square, scattered with large and small 
Islocks of stone, and the bridge without one of its piers and a yawn- 
ing gulf between two roughly broken arches. 

Only in dreams could one see and experience such things. Only in 
dreams. But when he turned away from this improbable sight, there 
stood before him his shop with the great stone, a tiny part of that 
seventh nier, among his scattered goods. If it was a dream, it was 
everywhere. 

Further down the square he could hear shouting, loud words of 
command in Serbian and steps hurriedly drawing nearer. Alihodja 
rapidly put up his door-shutter, locked it with a great padlock and 
began to make his way home, uphill. 

Earlier too it had happened to him that while he was thus going 
uphill his breath had failed him and he had felt his heart beating 
where it should not have been. For a long time past, from his fiftieth 
year, he had found the hill on which his house was built steeper and 
steeper and the way home longer and longer. But never so long as it 
was today when he wanted to get away from the market-place as 
quickly as possible and get home as soon as he could. His heart was 
beating as it should not have, his breath failed him and he was forced 
to halt. 

Down below there, it seemed, they were singing. Down below 
there, too, was the ruined bridge, horribly, cruelly cut in half There 
was no need for him to turn (and he would not have turned for any- 
thing in the world) to see the whole picture: in the distance the pier 
cut short like a gigantic tree-trunk and scattered in a thousand pieces 
and the arches to left and right of it brutally cut short The broken 
arches yawned painfully towards one another across the break. 

No. not for anything would he have turned round. But he could 


312 



not go forward, uphill, for his heart stifled him more and more and 
his legs refused to obey him. He began to breathe more and more 
deeply, slowly, in measure, each time more deeply. That had always 
helped him before. It helped him now. His chest seemed to grow 
easier. Between the measured deep breathing and the beating of his 
heart he established a sort of balance. He began to walk once more 
and the thought of home and bed stimulated and drove him on. He 
walked painfully and slowly and before his eyes, as if it moved along 
in front of him, was the whole scene with the ruined bridge. It was 
not enough to turn one’s back on a thing for it to cease to goad and 
torment one. Even when he shut his eyes he could still see it. 

Yes, thought the hodja more animatedly, for he was now breathing 
a little more easily, now one can see what all their tools and their 
equipment really meant, all their hurry and activity. (He had always 
been right, always, in everything and despite everybody. But that no 
longer gave him any satisfaction. For the first time it did not really 
matter. He had been only too right!) For so many years he had seen 
how they had always been concerning themselves with the bridge; 
they had cleaned it, embellished it, repaired it down to its founda- 
tions, taken the water supply across it, lit it with electricity and 
then one day blown it all into the skies as if it had been some stone 
in a mountain quarry and not a thing of beauty and value, a bequest. 
Now one could see what they were and what they wanted. He had 
always known that but now, now even the most stupid of fools could 
see it for himself They had begun to attack even the strongest and 
most lasting of things, to take things away even from God. And who 
knew where it would stop! Even the Vezir’s bridge had begun to 
crumble away like a necklace: and once it began no one could hold 
it back. 

The hodja halted again. His breath failed him and the slope sud- 
denly grew steeper before him Again he had to calm his heartbeats 
with deep breathing Again he succeeded in recovering his breath, 
felt himself revive and walked on more quickly. 

So be it, thought the hodja. If they destroy here, then somewhere 
else someone else is building. Surely there are still peaceful countries 
and men of good sense who know o^ God’s love? If God had aban- 
doned this unlucky town on the Drina, he had surely not abandoned 
the whole world that was beneath the skies’ They would not do this 
for ever. But who knows’ (Oh. if only he could breathe a little more 
deeply, get a little more air!) Who knows’ Perhaps this impure infidel 
faith that puts eveiything in order, cleans eveiything up, repairs and 
embellishes everything only in order suddenly and violently to 
demolish and destroy, might spread through the whole world; it 


313 



might make of all God’s world an empty field for its senseless 
building and criminal destruction, a pasturage for its insatiable 
hunger and incomprehensible demands? Anything might happen. 
But one thing could not happen; it could not be that great and wise 
men of exalted soul who would raise lasting buildings for the love 
of God, so that the world should be more beautiful and man live in 
it better and more easily, should everywhere and for all time vanish 
from this earth. Should they too vanish, it would mean that the 
love of God was extinguished and had disappeared from the world. 
That could not be. 

Filled with his thoughts, the hodja walked more heavily and 
slowly. 

Now they could clearly be heard singing in the market-place. If 
only he had been able to breathe in more air, if only the road were 
less steep, if only he were able to reach home, lie down on his divan 
and see and hear someone of his own about him! That was all that he 
wanted now. But he could not. He could no longer maintain that fine 
balance between his breathing and his heartbeats, his heart had now 
completely stifled his breath, as had sometimes happened to him in 
dreams. Only from this dream there was no awakening to bring 
relief. He opened his mouth wide and felt his eyes bulging in his head. 
The slope which until then had been growing steeper and steeper 
was now quite close to his face. His whole field of vision was filled 
by that dry, rough road which became darkness and enveloped him. 

On the slope which led upwards to Mejdan lay Alihodja and 
breathed out his life in short gasps. 


314 



GEORGE ALLEN & UNWIN LTD 
London 40 Museum Street, 

Auckland' 24 Wyndham Street 
Bombay 15 Graham Road, Ballard Estate, Bombay i 
Buenos Atres, Escntono 454-459^ Florida 16^ 
Calcutta: ly Chittaranjan Avenue, Calcutta 13 
Cape Town: log Long Street 
Hong Kong' F1I12 Mirador Mansions, Kowloon 
Ibadan, P.O. Box 62 

Karachi: Karachi Chambers, McLeod Road 
Madras Mohan Mansion, 38c Mount Road, Madras 6 
Mexico ' Villalongin 32'-io, Piso, Mexico 5, D,F. 
Nairobi: P, 0 , Box 12446 

New Delhi: 13-14 Ajmeri Gate Extension, New Delhi i 
Sdo Paulo: Avenida 9 de Julho 1138-Ap, 51 
Singapore: 36c Pnnsep Street, Singapore 7 
Sydney, N,S.W.: Bradbury House, 55 York Street 
Toronto: 91 Wellington Street West 



BARCELONA WITH LOVE 


CLIFFORD KING 

To all those thousands of visitors who go down Barcelona’s flowery 
Ramblas every year and who venture, with a certain trepidation, 
perhaps, into the maze of narrow alleys in that part of the town, 
their curiosity aroused by the unfamiliarity of everything and 
intrigued by what must be called local colour, this book provides 
some answers It describes the way people live down there— without 
getting too solemn about it. 

Music halls, popular revue theatres, dancers who are ten a penny, 
laughter, hot sunshine, bars with cheap wine and cheaper brandy, 
prostitutes and drunks, sellers of lottery tickets and cripples in wheel 
chairs, flower markets, processions and sardanas, the dull explosion 
of a bomb in the distance, the entire population of a city walking 
home through the ram while the lighted trams pass on their way 
without a soul inside . . 

Much of this puzzles the foreigner, but from Clifford King’s vivid 
picture of life in the narrow streets of Barcelona, where he has 
himself lived for a long time, there emerges an attitude towards 
things which is not without relevance to the general contemporary 
situation Despite the poverty, the misery and the squalor, the 
Spaniard you will find, is not sorry for himself and he does not 
want your sympathy. 

Illustrated Demy 8vo. i8s. net. 


ESMOND IN INDIA 

R. PRAWER JHABVALA 

This is a more serious book than either of its highly acclaimed pre- 
decessors, but readers of Mrs Jhabvala’s novels of Indian life cannot 
fail to be impressed by this new development, which only reinforces 
her mastery of the art of social comedy. The irony in the novel 
is far deeper than before and the author’s sense of comedy has 
acquired a satirical edge. Even her scene has widened, embracing 
new characters and new problems which she handles, however, wdth 
equal brilliance. 

This is one of the most enjoyable novels imaginable Mrs Jhabvala 
has her fun; she also makes us share her pains. "ITie division between 
East and West has never been more poignantly or as gaily described.’ 
—The Observer. 

Crown 8vo. 15 s, net. 



R. PRAWER JHABVAtA 

TO WHOM SHE WILL 

‘A bnlliant performance and a delight to read. . . . The book is con- 
tinuously funny even where it is sad. and among publishers’ dis- 
coveries this novel deserves a high and permanent place.’— Michael 

SADLEIR 

‘Not only does it depict life in present day Delhi but, in its 
subtlety and in the excellence of its writing it seems to suggest 
that at long last a real Anglo-Indian literature may be growing 
up. . . . There have surely been few better expositions of the work- 
ings of the Indian mind than this intelligent and irresistibly amusing 
novel.’— The Times. 

The literary comparison which came to my mind was Jane 

Austen R. Prawer Jhabvala has a gentle irony which she allows 

to play across her characters; they are for the most part small and 
mean and ridiculous; but however small and mean they may be, 
she does not despise them. Her laughter is the warm laughter of 
someone who has seen how absurd people are and who loves them 
for this absurdity.’— ARTHUR calder marshall in BBC European 
Service. 

Second Impression. Crown 8yo. 15s. net. 


THE NATURE OF PASSION 

The restlessness and passions of youth are not unique to New Delhi, 
but in this bustling cosmopolitan city the gulf between worldly 
parents and their idealistic sons and daughters is widened by the 
underlying struggles of tradition and franchise, reverence and 
novelty. 

Readers of Mrs Jhabvala’s highly acclaimed first novel. To Whom 
She Will, will already know the tender gravity with which she 
paints the subtle intransigencies of character. In this, her second 
novel, her mastery of the art of social comedy will be justly 
established. Once again the reader is invited to experience the 
intricacies and compromises that form the problems of hvmg and 
growing up in New Delhi. 

‘Socially as conscious as Jane Austen and satirically as exultant 
as Gogol and Goucharov, she finds in the Indian scene a rich subject 
for the comedy of manners, good and bad.’— Times Literary Supple- 
ment. 

‘No one who is interested in contemporary India should miss 
this subtle, accurate and amusing story.’— Truth. 

Crown 8vo. 13s. 6d. net. 



ADRIAN VINCENT 


THE LONG ROAD HOME 

‘By way of relief from the seemingly endless flow of war books in 
which nearly everyone is consistently heroic and team-spirited. 
The Long Road Home is a convincing and moving account of the 
effects of camp life on British prisoners-of-war, their captors, and 
the civilian populace aroimd them, ending with the grim details of 
a death march pnor to liberation. An unusually objective book.’— 
The Observer. 

‘Beneath his easy and engaging flow Mr Vincent shows both skill 
and seriousness. ... His style is deft and concise.’— Times Literary 
Supplement. 

‘His occasionally brutal candour makes his narrative bracing 
rather than depressing.’— Glasgow Herald. 

The most honest prisoner-of-war story among the scores I’ve 
read in the last ten years.’— Leicester Mercury. 

Demy 8vo. igs. net. 


THE END OF A SUMMER’S DAY 

Dick Raines persuaded himself that the memory of the lost days of 
his childhood must be treasured at all costs, because they were 
the only time m his life when the world seemed worth living in. 
But he did not realize until too late that what he really yearned 
for was the security and irresponsibility of a child. 

We are taken through his idyllic boyhood beside the sea, with 
the family life revolving around the shabby cinema his father has 
rashly bought, his adolescence, his adventures in the commercial 
jungle of the film world, his conflict with his brother over a woman 
they both love, his unhappy marriage, and his realization and final 
acceptance of the fatal flaw in his character. Almost as important 
to the story is his father, a flamboyant figure from the days of the 
silent dnema, whose refusal to be defeated by life provides moving 
sequences. Satirical glimpses into the film industry as seen in its 
Wardour Street aspect, give us something quite new in backgrounds. 

‘Written with fluency, sympathy and humour. ... Mr Vincent’s 
first novel is one of unusual and agreeable maturity.’ — Times Literary 
Supplement. 

Demy 8vo. 15 s. net. 



ICARUS 


AXEt JENSEN 

Icarus is a young man’s book: a young man’s failure either to find 
himself or to escape from the labjmnth around him. A dreamer 
and an adventurer, willing to endure but impelled by the appetites 
of youth. Axel Jensen came to Algiers and fled South. Led by the 
spirit and snared by the flesh, he arrived at Tamanrasset, an outpost 
of the avilization that nurtured him. In his pride he pressed on into 
the Sahara alone. 

There was a hermit in Thaza, where a seepage of water allowed 
life. He lived in a cave by night and practised controlled breathing 
imder the desert sun by day. He had survived Sachsenhausen, but 
sought his liberation still. To him came Jensen, and for a while strove 
to learn simplicity and independence of hfe from that austere 
recluse. 

But Jensen was young and volatile. Even at Thaza the world could 
not ultimately be renounced, as, in their different ways, he and the 
hermit discovered Jensen mistook vanity for enlightenment, and 
the sun melted the wax of his wings. 

A doctor from Tamanrasset saved him when he was close to death, 
and during the terrible march back to the fold of civilization he 
gained through suffering a measure of self-knowledge. 

Axel Jensen writes with a direct yet brooding sensitivity. The 
squalor and lusts of the Casbah, the cruelty and hostility of the 
Sahara are vividly pictured. But equally the reader will find through 
Jensen’s sensitive eye, beauty in unexpected places, and delight 
under conditions that only youth or fanaticism could find endurable 

Demy 8vo. i6s. net. 


THE LOST DAYS OF MY LIFE 

JANE SIMPSON 

This is a true story. At the age of thirteen, after years of unhappiness 
at home with a neurotic mother, the author was sent to a mental 
home without justification. Her mother wanted to be rid of her, 
the doctors took the easy way out, and to the nursing staff she 
was. only another case. 

‘A sad and at times horrifying account.’— Manchester Guardian. 
The story which she has written so vividly may well become— 
like Barbellion’s Journal oi a Disappointed Man — a minor classic.’ — 
Sunday Times. 


Demy 8vo. iss. net. 



THE EIGHTH DAY OF THE WEEK 


MAREK HLASKO 

In Poland, ruined and impoverished by the war and its aftermath, 
young men who are angry, indignant or in love have good reason 
for discontent. Their needs are small, their desires natural. They 
stnve to retain a little dignity amidst the bitter rums of a cause 
in which they have no faith. Yet material circumstances constrict 
them. The dreams of youth become an endless cycle of lack-lustre 
days and nights In the family, the moody, backbiting squalor of 
life in a single room. In the office, long hours of purposeless work. 
At dusk in the evening, a yearning for privacy, when love can 
become honest A yearning for Sunday, for the dignity and leisure 
of life, for the flowering of the individual and for mutual respect. 
But on Sunday it rains. The room is a prison, and even the beloved 
cannot escape calumny. ‘There should be an eighth day of the 
week— a day when everyone can be happy.’ 

Crown 8 vo. About los. 6d. net. 


THE LEGION OF THE DAMNED 

SVEN HASSEL 

This is the story, in the form of a novel, of a man of mixed Danish 
and Austrian descent who, having served a penod in a concentration 
camp for attempting to escape from Germany, was transferred to 
a penal regiment and fought for the Germans throughout the war, 
mainly on the Russian front. In effect it is one of the most damning 
tracts against wars and those who wage them that have ever come 
into the publisher’s hands. 

Though not without a considerable element of humour, the 
horrors of the concentration camp, the terrible discipline of the 
penal regiment and the savagery of the Russians are depicted with 
a painful realism that require of its readers a strong stomach. 

‘Strangely reminiscent of that very different and wholly delight- 
ful wartime best-seller, The Good Soldier Schweik . . . although it 
has these light-hearted moments, most of the book is only too 
savagely reafistic.’— Sphere. 